29605435
Sibbe
Sibbe (Limburgish: Sub or Sp) is the official Dutch name of a village in the municipality of aan de Geul in the province of Limburg in the Southern part of the Netherlands.HistoryIt has been proposed that the name of the village derives from the German word sippe, meaning a clan of a limited number of families. Another possibility is that the name derives from the Latin cippus, meaning young forest(J.G.M. Notten, Het Sibber Huis. Valkenburg, 1995, page 9). However, both explanations do not fit with the local pronunciation Sp.It is not known when the first inhabitants settled here. It is assumed that the Plateau of Margraten, at the edge of which Sibbe is situated, was gradually deforested and settled after the year 1000(P.J.H. Ubachs, Handboek voor de geschiedenis van Limburg. Hilversum, 2000, page 24-26, 114). The village was first mentioned (Cybde) in a document in 1307(J.G.M. Notten, Het Sibber Huis. Valkenburg, 1995, page 16). Until 1940 Sibbe was part of the municipality of Oud-Valkenburg. Population: economy, leisure, religionIn spite of some small-scale building projects, population has decreased over the last decades. This is the case for most parts of South Limburg, caused by ageing, low birthrates and negative migration.Sibbe is situated at the edge of the Plateau of Margraten, a fertile loess plain at 160 meters above NAP. Until recently, agriculture was the main means of life on the Plateau. Nowadays, most villagers commute to work in nearby towns like Valkenburg, Maastricht and Heerlen. Being close to tourist hotspot Valkenburg, the village offers some and breakfast accommodation, as well as a camping site. The last operating marl quarry in the Netherlands is situated in Sibbe. Tours on bikes and quads are offered in the underground labyrinth in parts of the quarry that are no longer used for mining.Sibbe has a very active community life with various sports clubs (football, handball, tennis, billiards), a band, a mixed choir, a young adults club (Jonkheid), and a carnival club.Although church-going has steeply declined in recent years, most of the inhabitants of Sibbe are still, at least nominally, members of the Catholic Church. The first church was built here in 1840. Before, villagers had to walk the two miles to the parish church of Oud-Valkenburg. Until 1948 the church of Sibbe remained dependent on the church in Oud-Valkenburg.Sights* Sibberhske or Villaertshof. house with a moat and a defensive tower, first mentioned in 1381(J.G.M. Notten, Het Sibber Huis. Valkenburg, 1995, page 21). Parts of the tower may be medieval but most of the existing house dates from the 17th century, built in the local Renaissance architectural style, with alternating layers of brick and marlstone. The outbuildings are partly 18th century, partly rebuilt after a damaging fire in the 1930s.* Various imposing carr farms (German: Vierkantshof), mainly along Dorpsstraat. The 17th/18th century carr farm Hellinxhof stands at Klein Linde.* Church of Rose of Lima. Neo-Romanesque parish church, begun in 1840 and enlarged in 1866 and 1927. The nave is original from the 1840s and was designed by the Maastricht architect Matthias Soiron(www.kerkgebouwen-in-limburg.nl  Sint-Rozakerk Sibbe).*The 140 kilometer long underground maze of the Sibberberg, the marlstone quarry, parts of which date from the 15th century.* French chapel inside the Sibberberg. Probably built during the years of the First Republic, when Catholic priests that did not swear allegiance to the Republic, were restricted in their religious freedom. Some of the charcoal wall drawings date from around 1865.* Neo-Gothic churchyard chapel(www.kerkgebouwen-in-limburg.nl Kerkhofkapel Sibbe).* Modern glass chapel dedicated to Saint Rose of Lima, containing the processional altar built of thousands of pieces of wood, ceramic and shells by a former mayor of the village(www.kerkgebouwen-in-limburg.nl Sint-Rozakapel Sibbe).* Chapel Daalhemerweg and other small road chapels and crosses, dotted around the village.References(GalleryImage:Sibbe-Suubberhuuske2.jpg|Villaertshof or SibberhskeImage:Sibbe-Dorpstraat 58 (6).JPG|Carr farm and gates belonging to VillaertshofImage:Sibbe-Dorpstraat 47 (2).JPG|Carr farms DorpsstraatImage:Sibbe-Klein Linde 2 (1).JPG|HellinxhofImage:Sibbe-Kerk (1).JPG|Church towerImage:Sibbe-Kapel Sibbergroeve (2).JPG|Sibberberg: French chapelImage:Sibbe-Kapel Sibbergroeve (3).JPG|Sibberberg: charcoal drawingsImage:Sibbe-Kapel Daalhemerweg.JPG|Chapel Daalhemerwegnl:Sibbefr:Sibbeli:Sub
29621833
Strip_Mining
#REDIRECT mining#Strip_mining 
29637261
Phyllonorycter_tribhuvani
Phyllonorycter tribhuvani is a moth of the Gracillariidae family. It is known from the Nepal.(Global Taxonomic Database of Gracillariidae (Lepidoptera))The wingspan is about 6.5 mm.The larvae feed on cerasoides. They mine the leaves of their host plant. The mine has the form of a tentiformed blotch occurring upon the upper surface of the leaf, usually very much elongated along the middle vein or sometimes along the lateral vein of the leaf. The upper epidermis of the leaf on the mining part is whitish with minute, brown to blackish-brown spots, much constricted longitudinally, with a single large central ridge.Referencestribhuvani
29641210
John_R._Toole
thumb|right| John R. Toole was a Montana industrialist and legislator. He served in the Montana State Legislature in 1890. BiographyToole was born in Maine on July 3, 1850, and moved to Wisconsin with his parents in 1855.  He began working in the mining industry in Utah in 1873.  Five years later, in 1878, he took his mining career to Idaho where he met his wife, Anna Hardenbrook. They had six children: Honora, Thula, Allan, Howard, Brice, and John R. Jr. The family moved to Montana, in 1884. While living in Anaconda, Toole worked for Dalys smelter and became known as Dalys right-hand man.  Toole was elected to the territorial legislature in 1886 and reelected in 1888. He was nominated to the state legislature in 1889 and was part of the Montana Constitutional Convention.(List of Montana Constitutional Convention Members)In 1900, the Toole family relocated to Montana, where Toole became president of the Big Blackfoot Milling Company.  Toole died in 1916.(John R. Toole Family Papers at the University of Montana Mansfield Library) Family thumb|right|  Toole married Anna Hardenbrook on November 2, 1882.  Their first child Thula was born in 1885.  She eventually married George Weisel.  The couples second daughter Honora was born in 1883 and married John R. Clifton.  Their first son Allan was born in 1887, followed by Howard born in 1890.  Howard would eventually marry Marjorie Ross.  The third son Brice was born in 1893, followed by John R. Jr.  Today, Missoula has a street named Toole Avenue as well as a John H. Toole Park.  John Howard Toole, for whom the Park is named was the grandson of John R. Toole, first son of Howard Toole and Marjorie Ross.  John H. was a decorated WWII veteran who became a successful businessman and eventually served as Mayor of Missoula.  He died in 1991. Big Blackfoot Milling CompanyThe Mining Company, which was owned by copper-king Daly, began expanding and established a milling company in Missoula.  The purpose of the company was to harvest timber to run Anacondas smelter. John R. Toole became president of the company shortly after he moved to Missoula.  The mill was known by various other names over the years, including Hammond-Bonner Lumber Mill, the Anaconda Mill and the Western Lumber Mill.  By 1900, the Big Blackfoot Milling Company had depleted much of its timber supply and started cutting further up the Blackfoot.  Most of the logs were floated down the river to Bonner.(Two Rivers History)  Toole house thumb|left|The neoclassical Toole home in Missoula, located on Gerald Avenue, was built in 1902 by Butte architect J.F. Everett.  Everett followed the style of the popular Chicago Worlds Columbian Exposition. Twelve-foot ceilings, pocket doors and oak columns are just a few of the features in the house. It also has seven fireplaces and, according to Toole, There was not a more attractive fireside in Montana. A Palladian window and fan lights line the main entry.   (Montana Historical Places)   Anna Hardenbrook Toole sold the house in 1931 to Kappa Gamma, giving a home to the first sorority in Missoula. Two of Tooles daughters, as well as granddaughters, great-granddaughters and a daughter-in-law, have been members of Kappa Gamma and called the house their home during their college years. Three additions have been made to the house, but it still retains its original symmetry and classical ornamentation. In 1983, the house was placed on the Register of Historic Places.(Kappa Kappa Gamma at UM)References(
29649174
Sheregesh
 Sheregesh () is a Russian resort town in the southern part of Oblast. Previously a mining town, it is now a popular sports resort.History and economyThe town is named after brothers called Sheregeshevy, who struck iron ore in 1912. Nowadays thousands of travelers, mainly from Siberia, go to Sheregesh every winter for its snowboarding and skiing. There are dozens of inns near the well-known mountain Zelenaya; many locals also rent out their flats. As a rule, the tourist season lasts from November till March.WeatherThe climate of Sheregesh is continental: winters are usually cold and snowy, summers are short and chilly. The snow mantle reaches 4 meters.(The web cam, http://www.geocam.ru/view/cam1008x8595_sheregesh_online.html 18, November 2010)thumb|center|upright2.0|alt frame|A view from Zelenaya mountain in Sheregesh. References  External links * sheregesh.su* geocam.ru* worldsnowboardguide.com* sheregesh.rude:Scheregeschit:eregenl:Sjeregesjru:
29659009
James_Dalton_(Orange,_Australia)
James Dalton (Born in 1834 in Limerick, Ireland) was a wealthy merchant and pastoralist that lived during the 19th and 20th centuries in Orange, South Wales, Australia.() He was the patriarch of the wealthy Irish Australian Dalton Family.James was the youngest of three children, the eldest, his brother, was Thomas Dalton and then his sister, Margaret Dalton, who both eventually moved to Australia.()LifeIrelandJames Dalton was born in 1834 in Duntryleague, Limerick, Ireland as the second son of James Dalton and his first wife Eleanor Dalton (ne Ryan). He lived in Duntryleague, Limerick, for the first 13 years of his life while his father had been shipped to the Colony of South Wales for kidnapping a widower, Catherine Sheehan, and imprisoning her for a week in Northern Ireland with several other men, one being his brother-in-law, Daniel Ryan, in November 1833. James Daltons father was tried on the 14 March 1835, and was at first sentenced to death on the 8 April of that year, which was shortly after changed to transportation.( He was transported to New South Wales on the convict ship the Hive on its second voyage to Australia, in 1835, while James Dalton Junior was less than a year old. When James father got to Australia, the Hive was wrecked near Bay with one fatality as it was coming along the coast. His father arrived in Sydney on Eve of the year of 1835 after the New South Wales Government sent a ship to help salvage the prisoners, soldiers and money the ship was carrying. (http://www.environment.gov.au/heritage/publications/pubs/shipwrecks-hivereport.pdf) (http://www.daltondatabank.org/videofeed.html, additional text.)His mother died some time while his father was in New South Wales, and he was left alone while his older brother, Thomas, and sister, Margaret, were in America. In 1842-43, his father had been let out of Bathurst Jail in New South Wales with a ticket of freedom to do as he pleased, including to move back to Ireland, but he chose to stay in Australia, so he did, and moved to Fredericks Valley, a small mining settlement near Lucknow. In 1847 James father petitioned for his family to be shipped to New South Wales, so James being the only one in Ireland, he was shipped aboard the Panama,() alone, to the colony.AustraliaWhen James arrived in Australia in 1847, his father was in a small mining settlement known as Fredericks Valley just out of the settlement of Orange (then known as Blackmans Swamp) near Lucknow, between Blackmans Swamp and Bathurst running a small shop for the miners. Together, father and son, they ran the small wood and bark clad shop in Fredericks Valley.In 1851, Jamess father remarries a woman known as Joanna Hogan in Marys Cathedral in Sydney, whom he goes on to have another three children with. After he is remarried, he moved into Orange (Blackmans Swamp Creek) and opened another store with his new wife and James. Jamess father then became a publican for the Daniel Oconnell Inn. Then in 1858, Thomas Dalton, Jamess older brother, returned from Canada, and arrived in Sydney and came out to Orange and ran the store in Orange with James which was now known as the Bros Store.In the same year, James Married Margaret Mary Collins, the eldest child of John, who was the proprietor of the Springside Inn, and Jane Collins, who moved to South Wales in 1841 as Bounty immigrants. James and Margaret eventually go on to have 12 children. (Listed below)Then in 1860, Margaret Dalton, James and Thomass sister, married an Irishman in America, Michael Casey. Then in 1861, Thomas Dalton Married Elizabeth Fahy and had seven children. Then in 1865 Margaret (James and Thomass sister) and Michael move to Australia, but unfortunately, James, their father, died on January 1 in 1860. So unfortunately the father never got to see all three of his children together. James Dalton Seniors widow goes on and remarries.  In 1869, James became the Mayor of Orange and an active member of the community.(http://www.orange.nsw.gov.au/client_images/929451.pdf) He was also the first captain of the Orange Volunteer Fire Brigade in 1870 and an officer of Orange District Hospital in 1866. (http://www.centralwesterndaily.com.au/news/local/news/general/james-last-will-returns-to-duntryleague/408336.aspx, http://www.centralwesterndaily.com.au/news/local/news/general/james-last-will-returns-to-duntryleague/408336.aspx.)In that year his brother Thomas joined him and the firm became known as Dalton Bros. James helped displaced miners and in 1857 promised to build a mill if they grew wheat; his flour-mill was built in 1861, which later became one of the largest and most expensive in the colony. The firms business expanded until it became the largest wholesale distributor west of the Blue Mountains. They had great success producing roasted and ground coffee and wheat on a large scale.() The Dalton Bros Flower Mill also shipped flour to Britain and was very expensive and highly regarded in prestigious shows in England.Then Thomas moved to Sydney, and opened the importing/exporting part of Dalton Bros. He built Dalton House in 1878 on Street and built stores in Lower Fort Street. Dalton Bros became such a large and influential company, they occupy a dock at Point in Sydney Harbour. Thomas then got remarried to Mary-Anne Ahern after his first wife died in 1877 at the age of 24 years.At that time, with James running the bulk of the Dalton Bros Company, it was worth approximately 125,000 pounds.( (today, with inflation and GDP changes comes to around $134,000,000.00).(http://www.measuringworth.com/ppoweruk/result.php?useCPI&useNOMINALEARN&year_early1880&pound71125000&shilling71&pence71&amount125000&year_source1880&year_result2008, http://www.measuringworth.com/ppoweruk/result.php?useCPI&useNOMINALEARN&year_early1880&pound71125000&shilling71&pence71&amount125000&year_source1880&year_result2008.)Despite exceptional enterprise and business ability James was kindly, unassuming and ever ready to help an Irishman in distress. He was a friend of Cardinal Patrick Moran and Bishop Dunne and a benefactor of Marys Cathedral. He then received a knighthood in 1877. He died aged 85 on 17 March 1919 at Duntryleague, Orange. He is buried in the Dalton Crypt at the Orange Cemetery. He was predeceased by his wife, he was survived by six sons and six daughters.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A040010b.htm, http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A040010b.htm.)Thomas, a papal knight, became mayor of Orange in 1877, represented Orange in the assembly in 1882-91 and was a member of the Council in 1892-1901. He died in Sydney on 26 June 1901. His daughter Blanche married Sir Mark Sheldon.ChildrenJames and Joanna Dalton had 12 children, 6 boys and 6 girls(Note information cannot be found on the last son of James Dalton)*Thomas Garret Dalton (Born in 1859 and was the eldest son of James Dalton Jnr. Known as Gatty he was first educated at Mr Flannagans School Orange afterwards going to Stanislaus College (Bathurst). He obtained his M A degree with honours at University. Although he studied law he joined the family Business, Dalton Bros and became Managing Director. He married May Condon in 1886 and with her had six children. May died in 1895. He then married Mary Butler and had a further two children. In 1875 James Dalton Jnr built Killarney in Kite Street for Gatty and his family (now known as Mena). He was Mayor of Orange between 1903-1905. He was also involved with the Hospital, Town Band and Rugby Union football. He died in 1911 aged 52 years.)(http://150wiki.orange.nsw.gov.au/index.php/Thomas_Garret_Dalton_1859_-_1911, http://150wiki.orange.nsw.gov.au/index.php/Thomas_Garret_Dalton_1859_-_1911.)*Joseph Dalton (Born 6 February 1861) studied Law and was an Irish nationalist Member of Parliament (MP) for Donegal from 1890 to 1892. He was the first Australian born member of the Parliament.*Elanor Redmond (Married Redmond on 24 February 1886. She died 31 January 1947, they had one son who died early in 1891 at the age of five.)*John Jack Dalton (Was married and worked at Dalton Bros and died age 35 from a shirt illness).(http://www.daltondatabank.org/Chronicles/Dalton_Bros_Orange.htm.)*Jane Jenny Dalton (Died in France)*Michael MF Dalton (Worked in rural areas until later running Gobabla and Kangaroobie and also the Dalton Bros Company)*Winifred Dalton (Sacred Heart Nun)*Elizabeth Dalton (Sacred Heart Nun)*Edward EB Dick Dalton (Involved in Dalton Bros)*Rosie Mckillop (Married William Mckillop MP, moved to Ireland, but later moved back to Orange after William died)*Patrick Dalton (became a Jesuit priest and professed in Ireland, but later moved back to Australia)Only 8 of the 12 Children could have children, but of the 8, 23 were born.(Influence in Orange and New South WalesJames Dalton was a major influence on the running of Orange and the surrounding areas. James Dalton was the mayor of Orange in 1869, he was a major influence on the train line going through to Orange, he built outstanding homes throughout the Orange area with commanding views over the whole region. James was also a key person in the construction of the famous Cook Park in Central Orange taking up an entire city block. He was also one of the major firms and families to fund the building of the band stand and the fountain(http://www.daltondatabank.org/Chronicles/Dalton_Bros_Orange.htm, http://www.daltondatabank.org/Chronicles/Dalton_Bros_Orange.htm.) Since he was Irish Catholic and very wealthy he was one of the most powerful Catholic men in the colony, he funded the construction of Oranges Josephs Catholic Church.(Buildings constructed and owned by James Dalton in OrangeHe also built many of Oranges famous buildings such as:*Duntryleague Mansion, Woodward Street (1876) When it was built it was one of the Colonys grandest homes.( It was built for approximately 50,000 pounds (Today it would be equal to 3,522,000.00 Australian Dollars (approx) or 2,285,000.00 British Pounds)(http://www.nationalarchives.gov.uk/currency/results.asp#mid, Historic Currency Converter.) It is now one of Australias most prestigious golf courses.(http://duntryleague.com.au/dguesthouse.htm, additional text.) When James became a Papal Knight, he was given a stunning stained glass window by The Vatican for his services to the church which is on display in Duntryleagues grand staircase.(http://www.centralwesterndaily.com.au/news/local/news/general/a-day-to-recall-splendid-irish-legacy/226230.aspx, Central Western Daily.)*Kangaroobie Homestead (1881)*Galbally Byng Street*Mena, Kite Street (1875). James built it for his Sons but was later turned into a maternity hospital in the 1930s. It was then turned into a block of flats but has since been renovated and converted to its former glory.(http://www.centralwesterndaily.com.au/news/local/news/general/tour-brings-back-mena-memories/1492911.aspx)*The Dalton Bros Shop buildings, Summer Street (1865)*Ammerdown Homestead*Adare*Look Out*Australia Hall (Australia Cinema)*Dalton Wool Stores*Dalton Bros first flower Mill - North East Corner of Summer and Sale Streets (The formal opening of Messrs. Dalton Bros. new flour mill took place to-day, and was celebrated with a banquet, at which over 300 persons sat down. Mr. James Dalton occupied the chair, and there were present Messers. Torps, M.L A., J. T, Lane, P. M.., the Mayors of Orange and East Orange, and most of the leading citizens. The mill was started by the Misses Jane and Winifred Dalton, daughters of the proprietors. The erection of the mill was started 12 month ago, the building being from plans by Messers. A. D. Nelson and Co., Sydney, who contracted for the erection of all the machinery. The machinery was made by Messers Hind and Lund, of Preston, Lancashire, England. In the meantime while, the construction of the mill was going on the ironwork was being constructed by Messers A. D. Nelson in Sydney. The machinery is considerably heavier than that in any other mill in New South Wales There are five brake roller mills 40in. Long and 10in. in diameter. The reduction plant contains nine sets of rollers, each 25in. long and 10in. in diameter, and each of the mills has four rollers. There are 17 acts of elevators. On the second floor is the Atlas purifiers, so constructed as to dispense with storeroom and dust collectors. On the third floor are the centrifugals and scalpers. On the floor are more centrifugals and brake reels. In the basement the shafting for driving the reduction and brake rolls extends the full length of the building. One feature of the machinery is that the motive power is in every case direct from the engine to each line of shafting. The new building contains 300,000 bricks, and 12,000 yards of earth were excavated for the foundations. The plant is said to be the largest and most expensive in the colony - from the The Sydney Morning Herald - Tuesday 19 April 1892). The mill ceased production in 1908 when the Dalton Bros new mill was opened (below).*Dalton Bros second flower Mill - Peisley Street, across from Wade Park Oval opened in 1908 to replace the earlier mill (above). The Mill ceased Production in 1956 and most of it was torn down in 1965, however a section still remains.(Historians Sketchbook of Orange, An Historians Sketchbook of Orange pg 52, .)Pastoral holdings across New South WalesBy the time of James death in 1919, the familys Orange district landholdings encompassed more than 30,000 ha extending from the town boundary to Mullion Creek, 20 km to the north. In addition, the Daltons owned the 11,000ha Gobabla at Nevertire and Belowra (20,000ha) near Nymagee, as well as interests in several stations around Condobolin. The Orange properties alone ran 40,000 sheep, which were shorn  along with sheep from other surrounding properties at a 32-stand wool shed near the Mullion Creek railway siding. The properties were run as an integrated unit as Dalton Estates, with weaners (Romney/Merino cross) sent from Kangaroobie to Gobabla to grow out, the wether portion then transferred as wool cutters to Belowra and the ewes back to Kangaroobie. Shorthorn cattle were also run on Kangaroobie and other Dalton properties, and bullocks were sent to the western stations for finishing in good seasons.(Sydney HoldingsJames Dalton was very influential throughout the colony and owned land and buildings across New South Wales. When James and his brother became partners, they built stores in lower Fort Street and had one of the largest owned wharfs and bond and free warehouses at Point on Jackson. They also built Dalton House at 25 Pitt Street (which is no longer standing) to manage the company East of the Blue Mountains and to manage the importing/exporting branch of Dalton Bros.(http://library.sl.nsw.gov.au/search~S2?/.b2588910/.b2588910/1,1,1,B/l856~b2588910&FF&1,0,,1,0.)John and William RedmondJames Dalton provided funds and leadership for the nationalist movement in New South Wales.(http://library.sl.nsw.gov.au/search~S2/?searchtypeX&searchargjames+dalton%2C+orange&searchscope2&sortdropdown-&SORTDZ&extended1&SUBMITSearch&searchlimits&searchorigargXjames+dalton%26SORT%3DD, State Library of NSW.) In 1882 his presiding over an Irish Land League meeting was questioned in the Legislative Assembly. He was closely associated with the visit of the Irish nationalists, John and William Redmond, to the colony in 1883. As president of the local branch of the National League, Dalton with two other magistrates signed an address of welcome to Redmond, which praised their resolute resistance to the oppressive proceedings of a foreign senate.()James had a lot to do John and William Redmond, and while the Redmonds were in Orange, they wanted to lecture in some of the halls in the district, but the council denied them access and they didnt want to lecture in Jamess Shop. On this note, James built the Redmonds their own hall the lecture in, it is now known as the Australian Cinema in Lords Place which was a premier cinema in Orange until late 2010, it is now in line to be converted into an evangelical church until the church raises funds to build a new facility.On 4 September 1884 Redmond married Daltons half-sister Johanna, and then Jamess eldest daughter, Elanor, On 24 February 1886 in London, married Redmond, which cemented the families bonds and they became renowned partners. Willie Redmond was Promoted to major in War I, he was killed in action on 7 June 1917 on Wytschaete Ridge, Belgium, and was buried in the garden of the hospice at Locre. Elanor returned to Orange and died in Sydney on 31 January 1947, predeceased by their only son.(See also*Orange*Redmond*Joseph DaltonSources
29662521
Porphyrosela_alternata
Porphyrosela alternata is a moth of the Gracillariidae family. It is known from Japan (Kysh), Malaysia (Pahang, Selangor), Nepal and Taiwan.(Global Taxonomic Database of Gracillariidae (Lepidoptera)) This species is a well-known pest of cotton.The wingspan is 2.6-4.3 mm.The larvae feed on Desmodium species, including heterocarpon, heterophyllum and strigillosum. They mine the leaves of their host plant. The mine has the form of an irregular linear-blotch-mine occurring upon the upper side of the leaflet; it is usually started as a linear, flat type, then suddenly widened into a blotch, nearly occupying the whole surface of a small leaflet. The mining part is whitish-green with an irregular brownish line of frass at young stage, and discoloured into brownish at mature stage. When completed, the upper epidermis on the blotch-part is strongly contracted with silken threads to form an upward-folded leaflet. The larvae are often gregarious.Referencesalternata
29685892
Murray_Basin
The Murray Basin is a Cenozoic basin in south eastern Australia.  The basin is only shallow, but extends into New South Wales, Victoria and South Australia.  It takes its name from the River which traverses the Basin from east to west.After Australia separated from Antarctica the Murray Basin was formed.  The basin floor only subsided slowly over time.()  The basin became filled with up to 600 m of sediments during the Cenozoic.()From Paleocene to Eocene the western side was flooded with sea water and deposited the Warina sand.() The sea withdrew and later in the Eocene silt and clay of the Olney Formation() were deposited.  One minor sea incursion resulted in late Eocene resulted in the Buccleuch Formation() in South Australia.  The is group of deposits is termed the Renmark Group and was earlier known as Knight Group.()The sea level rose again in Late Oligocene to Miocene forming the Murray Group of sediments, with marl and limestone in the deeper locations, and the Geera Clay() in the shallow waters. The rock units formed in the deeper water included the Ettric Formation,() the Winnanbool Formation() and the Mannum Formation limestone() with Gambier Limestone in South Australia.()() When sea level fell again in mid Miocene the deposited Geera clay and Olney Formation moved westward over the limestone.(During Miocene to Pliocene the sea rose and fell several times.  The first sea rise formed the Gulf and resulted in clay and marl in the west  called the Bookpurnong Formation,() and Calivil Formation() river and lake sand in the east.  When the sea retreated in Pliocene, the Loxton Sands() also informally known as Loxton-Parilla Sands were formed on the beach on the shore of the emergent land.  Locally heavy minerals have been concentrated by wave action including rutile zircon and ilmenite forming economic mining opportunities.() thumb|left|Lake Bungunnia around 1MyaThe River became dammed by uplift of over 250 meters in Grampians in Victoria during the Pleistocene about 2.5 Mya.  The dam formed Bungunnia, which reached 40000 km2 and deposited the Blanchetown Clay therein.()  Higher rainfall of at least 500 mm per year kept the lake filled at first, but during later times rainfall was insufficient and saline lakes formed, depositing dolomite.  Even today some saline lakes remain as a remanent of the vast lake.()  The Murray River carved out a new path to the sea via Bridge replacing its previous exit at Victoria.  The lake was gone by about 0.7 Mya.The Pooraka Formation() formed in the north west due to increased erosion resulting in colluvium depositing. The colluvium forms fans, cones and scree slopes, and often contains clay and breccia.  In the flat areas the Shepparton Formation() also resulted from river deposits of floodplain clay.(Most of the existing surface dates from Quaternary period.  The river deposits from the east have been progressively overlaying the marine deposits further west, as the shore line receded.  Within the Pleistocene deposits are three layers of sand that are aquifers, deposited during higher rainfall periods of the interglacials.  The floodplain deposits from the current rivers are the Coonambidgal Formation, however this term is used informally for the older Pleistocene flood deposits as well.() During the dryer glacial periods the area was arid.(S, Pels The Murray Basin in The Geology of NSW p506)References
29714058
William_J._Olcott
footnotes      William James Olcott (February 22, 1862 &ndash; April 29, 1935) was an football player and mining and railroad executive in the Range.   He played football for the of Michigan from 1881 to 1883 and was captain of the 1882 and 1883 teams.  After receiving his degree, he worked in the iron ore mining industry for more than 40 years.  He was president of the Oliver Iron Mining Company from 1909 to 1928 and president of the Missabe and Iron Range Railway from 1901 to 1909.Early yearsOlcott was born in Michigan, in 1862, the son of Harlow and Elizabeth Olcott.  He moved with his family to Michigans Peninsula and attended school in Michigan.()University of MichiganHe subsequently attended the of Michigan where he studied chemistry and mining.(  He played on the Wolverines football team, was the starting three-quarter back from 1881 to 1883 and served as captain of the 1882 and 1883 teams.()Mining and railroad careerOlcott graduated from Michigan in 1884.  After receiving his degree, Olcott returned to Michigans Upper Peninsula, where he worked in the mining business.  In 1885, he was employed as an assistant engineer to the Chapin Mine on the Range.( In 1890, he was reported to be living in Michigan, and working as an assistant superintendent of five mines at a salary of $3,600.()  Olcott later moved to Minnesota, where he lived for three decades.(He became superintendent of the Lake Superior Consolidated Mines on the Range.  In 1897, he was appointed first vice president of the Missabe and Iron Range Railway and in 1901 became the companys president. He served as the railroads president from 1901 to 1909.(()In 1905, Olcott was promoted to the position of vice president of the Oliver Iron Mining Company; he had previously been the general manager of the company.()   In 1909, he was appointed as the companys president.()()  The Oliver Iron Mining Company was at the time the subsidiary of the States Steel Corporation responsible for the companys iron ore mining operations.()  He testified in 1913 in a government suit seeking to break up the steel company.(  Olcott had 40,000 men working for him and reported directly to D. Rockefeller.  Rockefeller and his family stayed at the Olcotts home in 1928.Family and later yearsOn December 26, 1887, Olcott married Fannie Bailey of Arbor, Michigan.(  In 1904, Olcott and his wife built a 10,000 square foot Georgian Colonial mansion for their family in Duluth.  The house was built at a cost of $140,000 and had an estate covering five city blocks surrounded by a brick and wrought iron wall.  The Olcotts had two daughters who they raised in the house.()  The Olcott family donated the house to Duluth Teachers College in 1939, where it housed a music school.(In 1925, Olcott and his wife established the Olcott Lodge, a rest lodge for wives of the Oliver Iron Mining Company at Moon Lake in the Mesabi Range.  At the time, a newspaper account noted: The lodge itself is a charming place, and the surroundings of lake and forest attractive and restful. The Olcotts not only have caused the beautiful lodge to be built and completely furnished and equipped, but they defray all costs of maintenance, with a competent and experienced woman in charge.()  In 1931, the camp was turned over to the Girl Scouts and has been operated since that time as the Fannie Bailey Olcott Girl Scout Camp.()Olcott retired as president of the Oliver Iron Mining Co. in 1928 and traveled extensively in the seven years following his retirement, including a year in Europe and trips to Florida and California.()In April 1935, Olcott died while visiting his daughter, Mrs. Torrey Ford, in California.  He died from pneumonia following a stroke suffered several weeks earlier.  He was 73 years old at the time of his death.(()References
29744648
Wayne_State_University_Computer_Science_Department
State University Department of Computer Science(Wayne State University Department of Computer Science) is part of the College of Engineering(Computer Science Department Transfer to College of Engineering). The department offers core academic strength in many areas including intelligence, bioinformatics, mining and learning, networking, databases, distributed and computing, security, graphics and visualizations, and engineering. Undergraduate (Bachelor of Science and Bachelor of Arts) and graduate degrees (Master of Science and PhD) in Computer Science, as well as an undergraduate degree in Information Systems Technology and a certificate in Scientific Computing are offered in the department.  In addition, graduate students have the opportunity to complete their Ph.D. work in Computer Science with a concentration in Bioinformatics and Biology.Undergraduate curriculum includes a high degree of hands-on experience with real-world systems, increased personal attention; undergraduate participation in research projects. Undergraduate students have the opportunity to choose among a variety of concentrations including Engineering, Databases, Technology and Gaming.  Study abroad opportunities are available with European schools including the School of Nantes, France.The Department of Computer Science is a major focus for interdisciplinary activities within the university with annual R&D expenditures are between $2 and $3 million.  The Departments commitment to community service includes a new joint degree program with Focus: HOPE, as well as offering summer computer camps for middle and high school students.References
29762323
Baiyunkuang_District
#REDIRECT Obo Mining District
29769860
Ismal_Tour
Ismal Tour (1925/1926-8 July 1985) was a Guinean political figure and the half brother of former President Skou Tour. He was the chief prosecutor at the notorious Boiro.(Early careerIsmal Tour was born in Faranah, Guinea in 1926.(He attended school in Paris, where he met and quarreled with his compatriot Telli Diallo, who was later to die at Camp Boiro.()He was trained as a meteorologist.(  In 1956 he served on the local council in Kankan where he was also head of the weather station and was elected as a territorial adviser to the Prefecture. He was elected Minister of Public Works in 1957 and Minister of Economic Development in January 1963.(He became a member of the tight-knit group of close relatives who supported President Skou Tour and who became the primary beneficiaries of the regime.(Decisions were often based on personal interests. For example, rather than encourage mining of Guineas rich iron ore deposits, Ismal Tour preferred to transport iron ore from Liberia using the Railways.()Ismal Tour led the OSPAAAL (Organization for Solidarity for the People of Africa and Asia) when it met for the first time in Cairo, Egypt in 1957. He was president of the board responsible for solidarity funds, assisted by two vice-chairmen, Ben Barka of Morocco and Tzu-chi of the Republic of China.()However, by 1959 he was in favor of closer ties with the USA and other western countries, in opposition to Fodba who saw advantages in alignment with the communist bloc. Skou Tour maintained a non-aligned position.(In May 1969, Tour was replaced as Minister of Economic Affairs by Lansana Beavogui, who was given the newly created post of Prime Minister in April 1972.(Later careerOn 22 November 1970, Portuguese troops and Guinean fighters launched a seaborne attack on the Conakry area of Guinea in an attempt to overthrow the government, occupying key positions and releasing political prisoners held in the camps. The attack failed, and the raiders withdrew. Skou Tour used the attack as an excuse for mass arrests of political opponents, in which Ismal Tour played a leading role. Ismal was reported to have said his goal was to arrest 150,000 people, not to kill them but to shorten their lives.()Ismael Tour was the regimes chief prosecutor of the prisoners at Camp Boiro, and showed little respect for formal justice.Talking of the alleged leader of the supporters of the raid, his former leftist opponent Keta, who was tortured before he confessed, he said you have seen Fodebas confessions there was almost nothing in them, still we liquidated them.()The effect of the mass arrests in 1970 was to remove all opposition to the inner circle of power, with political life reduced to a struggle between different clans for position within the system.(The inner circle was divided into three factions, each led by a relative of the president. Skou Tour himself was leader of the centrist party, Ismal Tour leader of the pro-western party, called bourgeois degenerates by the leftist leader Keta. Ismal Tour and Mamady Keta were locked in a struggle to be named the successor to the president. The 9th party congress in 1972 resolved the contest in favor of the center-right. Skou Tour remained president and Louis Lansana Beavogui became prime minister. Ismal Tour was given the senior Ministry of Economy and Finance, Diakit became Minister of Interior and Security and Mamady Keta was relegated to the Ministry of Culture and Education.()In April 1978, as Minister of the Economy and Finance, Ismal Tour signed a protocol on non-aggression between members of ECOWAS, the Economic Community of West African States.(Fall from powerAfter his brother, President Skou Tour, died on 26 March 1984, Ismal Tour competed with Prime Minister Lansana Beavogui to take power.However, on April 3, 1984 General Cont, took control in a bloodless coup.(In 1985 Cont took advantage of an alleged coup attempt to execute several of Sekou Tours close associates, including Ismael Tour.(Others executed included Keita, Tour, former commander of Camp Boiro, and Moussa Diakit.( Ismal Tour died on 18 July 1985.(Referencesrefs()()()()()()()()() Bibliography *
29799862
Old_Mines,_Missouri
Old Mines () is the name of both an unincorporated community and the surrounding area in southeast Missouri that were settled by French colonists who mined for lead from the early 18th century when the area was a part of the Country of France.(Schroeder p.306)  Descendants of the early settlers still inhabit the area, and through a combination of geographic and cultural isolation(Schroeder pp 319-320) maintained their distinctive French culture well into the 20th century.  As recently as the late 1980s there may have been a thousand native speakers of the regions French dialect.(Stroughmatt 2007.)  This culturally distinct population has sometimes been referred to as paw-paw French(Vivrett.)(Miller p.174) and lives in an amorphous area in Washington, Jefferson, and St. Francois counties roughly  either side of a line from Potosi to De Soto.( Early history The southeast Missouri lead district is the location of the earths greatest known concentration of galena, an ore of lead.(Seeger, p.5)  Found first in surface deposits over a wide area, and now mined deep underground, the ore was known to the native Indians of the region from whom it became known to early French explorers.  Father Jaques Gravier noted in his journal in October 1700, the presence of rich lead ore twelve or thirteen leagues from the mouth of the River Miaramigoua (Meramec), that is .(Ekberg et al., p.9)  At that time the Meramec tributary Big River was considered part of the Meramec and often called the Little Meramec (French Petit Merrimac).(Schroeder, p.303)  The distance cited on the Meramec proper would not be in an especially mineralized region, but if taken to mean the Big River, it would lead to its headwaters and possibly refer to areas on the Fork or Old Mines Creek where some of the earliest mining took place.(Searching for silver, which is sometimes found with lead ore, the French sent a series of ill-equipped mining expeditions into what is now Missouri. One was led by Jacques sieur de Lochon, a Parisian and a smelter, and another was led by sieur La Renaudire.(Ekbert et al., p.10) Neither expedition produced much to show for their efforts, although Renaudire was able to smelt some poor-quality lead. In 1720 Philippe Franois Renault arrived with professional miners.  Renault found and successfully worked large quantities of lead on the Merameg in what is now the Old Mines region.(Balesi, p. 145)  Renault received a grant in 1723 for one and a half leagues along the Petit Merrimac and extending up the first tributary (la premire branche) for six leagues for a total of 9 square leagues.(  The exact location of Renaults grant and mines is not known, but the first branch could be Fourche  Renault Creek, with the mines perhaps at Ebo, or it could be Old Mines Creek with the mines at Old Mines itself.(Schroeder, p.304)  Renaults mines were worked until the 1730s, were closed for some years, and reopened in 1743.  Old Mines existed as a village of some sort by 1748 when it was listed as the residence of a coupled married at de Chartres, given as village des mines.(Discovery of Mine  Breton in the 1770s drained much of the effort from Old Mines, but as Old Mines was  only  to the north, it was close enough that some miners continued to live there while working Mine  Breton.  Some of the miners families moved back and forth between Old Mines and Mine  Breton.  It is unclear whether Old Mines was continuously inhabited through the 1790s into the first years of the 19th century.  There may have been disruptions due to raids by the Osage, and there is record of a complaint that inhabitants were forced to abandon their homes due to pollution of Old Mines Creek by animal and mining waste.(Schroeder, p.305)  Nevertheless, there were enough inhabitants in 1797 for a petition to be made for an agricultural concession, a request that was not acted on but which may have helped forestall a later request for mining concession by the American Austin who had started larger-scale mining and refining at Mine  Breton.( Land concessions and titles File:Old Mines concession surveys 1803.jpg|thumb|right|Surveys of the Old Mines land concession of 1803 show the original owners of the 400-arpent plots assigned by lotteryFile:Old Mines Missouri area map.jpg|thumb|right|Modern map of the area around the Old Mines concession.  Thin red lines show the regular grid of townships interrupted by colonial grants and concessions, including the Old Mines concession in the center.Austins success at Mine  Breton sparked increased attention from interests in Ste. Genevieve and Louis who subsequently employed hired labor and slaves to mine ore at Old Mines.  When news of the retrocession of Louisiana from Spain to France reached the area, both inhabitants and the absentee interests became more concerned about ownership.  Until around the beginning of the 19th century there was little competition for land, and the French had maintained a casual attitude concerning details of land ownership.(Ekberg et al., p.28)A new petition was drafted in 1803 by both residents and remote operators.  This time, with the help of the wealthy operators in St. Louis and Ste Genevieve, the petition was approved.  Commandant Vall, who had his agent collect signatures for the petition, perhaps as a favor for his friends in the cities, forwarded this petition to the lieutenant governor.(Schroeder, p.307) Vall himself wrote the 1803 petition, which was submitted as a single group request instead of dozens of individual requests.  The participation of the locals lent legitimacy to the request, and the participation of knowledgeable and connected outsiders moved the request through the bureaucracy.(  Though interested in lead, the petition was made for land for agriculture in the amount of 400 arpents (338 acres) per family  French law granted free land only for farming.(Ekberg et al., p.40)  Lieutenant Governor Delassus granted the request on June 4, 1803, for 13,400 arpents (17.8 square miles).(Schroeder, p.309)The concession straddled Old Mines Creek, and in the rush to get the land surveyed and titled before the Americans took over following the Purchase, it was laid out into 31 long, narrow plots with a length equal to the full width of the concession.  Ownership to individual plots was assigned through a lottery that had no relationship to where individuals had their cabins or worked the mines.  The mines worked in common at the south end were held out of the subdivision, but there was no accommodation for a usual French village with streets, clustered homes, and a commons.(Schroeder, p.310)  Most of the French ignored the assignment of ownership and continued to live where they had, mostly in the village of Old Mines near the south of the concession, and at Racola near the center.  Most had sold their lottery-assigned land within a year to outside speculators.(Schroeder, pp.313-314)After the Americans acquired control of the area there was a scramble to certify land claims with the new administration, and much of the activity was fraudulent.  It took years to sort through the competing claims.  Smith T, an entrepreneur rival to Moses Austin who lived at Bellfontaine and operated mines there and at Shibboleth, had bought some of the 400-arpent tracts at Old Mines and tried to claim more, thus clouding the ownership.  But in 1833 the original concession was officially recognized to the benefit of the initial claimants.(Schroeder, p.315)The Old Mines concession persists today as one of the many colonial-era grants recognized by and superimposed on the regular township grid of the American Land Survey System, and the pattern of long, narrow plots is visible in aerial photography as found at  Isolation File:Old Mines cemetery 1.jpg|thumb|right|Crosses of iron in St. Joachim CemeteryThough most of the lots in the Old Mines concession were bought by outsiders, those were speculators who had no permanent interest in the area, so the French continued to dig for lead when and where they wanted, as they always had, with no interference.( Meanwhile, the area and the Missouri territory in general were being overrun by newly-arrived Americans.  The area had been sparsely settled by the French, and by 1820 Missouri had been thoroughly Americanized with only isolated pockets of French culture surviving at Ste. Genevieve and Old Mines.(Ekbert et al., p.38)  French culture survived in Ste. Genevieve for a while because of its relatively large French population, some of it wealthy, but being a center of commerce it attracted its share of newcomers and eventually became more American.  But few of the Americans seeking farmland were attracted to the Old Mines region with its thin, flinty soil.(Schroeder, p.319)Easily mined surface deposits of lead were depleted by the mid-19th century,( though the state geologist reported small-scale surface mining and refining around Old Mines in 1867.(Schroeder, p.319)  When lead production escalated after the Civil War with capital-intensive deeprock mining techniques, it did so in new areas east of Potosi and Mine a Breton, drawing new economic activity even further away from Old Mines.In 1874 mining for tiff, as barite is called locally, began to replace lead digging in the Old Mines region.  It could be extracted manually from near-surface deposits in small operations much as lead had been for generations.  This provided the enclave the means to continue supporting itself while maintaining its unique way of life after the lead had been mined out.(Ekbert et al., p.68)  Men would dig tiff a couple days each week to support their families, with additional sustenance coming from home gardens.(  Eventually the wagon road that Moses Austin had built to haul ore to Herculaneum, which passed through Old Mines, was replaced by a railroad which did not, and the areas isolation became deeper.(Cultural isolation preceded geographic isolation, however.(  The Americans who developed the local lead industry during the Spanish period had no use for the French except for their labor and their ore.  Moses Austin never learned to speak French,(Shroeder, p.292) and when he platted the town of Potosi for the seat of new Washington County, he excluded the French village of Mine  Breton and did not even align the streets of the two adjacent towns.(Schroeder, p.295)  The French resented the economic dominance of the Americans to whom they had to sell their ore, and unlike the situation in Ste. Genevieve and St. Louis, there was no local wealthy French establishment to further their cause.  When the Osage attacked in 1799 and 1802 and French did not help the Americans fight them off.(Schroeder, p.292)  When geographic isolation set in at about the time of the Civil War, the French population was already living in cultural isolation, bolstered by their own language, customs, and communities.Missouri FrenchIn its isolation the Old Mines area became a center of French language and culture. This dialect had developed since the 17th century, when the upper Mississippi River Valley were part of the French colony of Louisiana, also known as the Country. It was once widely spoken in what is now Missouri and Illinois, and became one of the three major forms of French to develop in what is now the United States, along with French and French.(Ammon, pp. 306-308) However, it began to die out as the British and later the Americans began settling in the area.Speakers of the dialect called themselves Croles. They were sometimes known as paw-paw French, a term used at least sometimes in self reference. The name has been described as a fun-loving insult referring to a French creole so poor that he lived on pawpaw in the summer and possum in the winter.( Language By the 20th century, Old Mines was the only area of Missouri where Missouri French remained widely spoken. Linguists began studying the dialect at this time. American professor of French W. M. Miller made investigations in the area in the late 1920s, and reported that the local French dialect was an entirely spoken language.  Most of the people were illiteratefew could read and write English at the time, and very few, if any, had ever seen French written.  Miller also reported incursions of English into French sentences (Anyhow, je ne sais pas.), and English words adapted to modern items for which the locals French forebears had left no names (un can de maiz).  Nevertheless, the impression was that the spoken French was no less grammatical than that spoken by peasants of similar means in areas of France.(Miller, p.177) The language has been described as having a Cajun vocabulary with a Qubcois pronunciation.( Another linguist, J.-M. Carrire, came to Old Mines in the 1930s and 1940s, finding around 600 French-speaking families there at the time.(Carrire 1941a, p. 410.)  Carrire undertook a study of the dialect, recording 73 tales from local conteurs. Among other distinguishing features, he followed Miller in noting that Missouri French had been heavily influenced by English, with many English words and even entire idiomatic phrases borrowed or translated into the dialect.(Carrire 1939, pp. 113119.)Both linguists noted that French was dying out in Old Mines at the time of their studies. Miller reported that the children could not speak it, and the young people would not.(Miller, p.178) Carrire said that the influx of English and greater connection with the outside world had undermined the dialects base, and that young people were finding that speaking French was of no use to them outside of their homes.( As late as the 1980s there were perhaps as many as a thousand speakers left, but they were mostly the older generation of age 60 and above.( Today the language has all but died out as means of everyday domestic communication, and only a few elderly speakers are able to use it.( Culture Traditional French creole culture in the Old Mines area centered on the extended family and the local French community with frequent celebrations.((  Houses of family were often clustered together.(Schroeder, p.316)The distinctive type of home built by Missouri French was of a single storey with a broad roof sloping gradually into a roof for the gallery that ran along the broad side of the house, or all around for some of the wealthier French.(Ekberg et al., p.39)  The style is seen not just in old abodes, but it is still used as a common style in the area for new construction.(The French creole are predominately Catholic.(Miller, p.176)  They were originally served by a mission priest from Ste. Genevieve, and a log church was built in Old Mines in 1820.  That was replaced by the brick St. Joachim parish church in 1831.(Abeln)  Still standing and a center of community life,(Schroeder, p.318) St. Joachim is three years older than St. Louis Cathedral, making it the oldest standing church in Missouri. Assimiliation A variety of forces converged in the first part of the 20th century to break down the communitys isolation and accelerate assimilation into American culture.  Paved state highways eroded the regions physical isolation in the 1920s( - Route 21 runs from St. Louis through the center of the Old Mines region on its way to Potosi and beyond.  Cultural isolation was also assailed by War I and, especially, War II with mandatory conscription taking many young men and exposing them to the wider world.(  In the 1930s the prices offered for tiff tumbled, ending more than 200 years of subsistence based on small-scale mining.(Rossiter, p.310)Young men left for work in St. Louis and elsewhere.((  It became impractical for the archdiocese to maintain French-speaking priests for just one parish, so the sacraments were given only in English.(  Compulsory education in broader-based, English-only schools became the norm. Preservation The Old Mines Area Historical Society  La Socit Historique de la Rgion de Vieille Mine  works to preserve and promote the French culture and history of the region and has assembled an outdoor museum of historic buildings in Fertile, Missouri.  Dr. Rosemary Hyde Parker, a scholar of the region, has worked to reinforce the culture, as has the Rural Parish Workers of Christ the King in Fertile.(Ekberg et al., p.69)  Historian and musician Dennis Stroughmatt, who learned to speak French there, promotes the language and folk music of Old Mines.( Notes  References * * * ****   Note: The Pine Ford dam, for which this report was prepared, was never constructed.* * * * * Stroughmatt, Dennis.  Quoted in *   External links * Old Mines Area Historical Society* Rural Parish Workers of Christ the King* St. Joachim History
29810274
Tyrone_Generating_Station
The Tyrone Generating Station is a power plant owned and operated by Utilities near Kentucky. It is located 15 miles west of Kentucky.  Emissions data * CO2 Emissions: 468,036 tons (2005)* SO2 Emissions: 3,192 tons (2005)* SO2 Emissions per MWh: 17.94 lb/MWh (2005)* NOx Emissions: 955 tons (2005)* Mercury Emissions: See also *mining in Kentucky*warming References  External links * Official website
29820328
Hugh_L._Spurlock_Generating_Station
The Hugh L. Spurlock Generating Station is a power plant owned and operated by the Kentucky Power Cooperative in Kentucky.  Emissions data * 2006 CO2 Emissions: 8,105,061 tons* 2006 SO2 Emissions: 38,877 tons* 2006 SO2 Emissions per MWh:* 2006 NOx Emissions: 8,125 tons* 2005 Mercury Emissions: 300 lb. See also * mining in Kentucky* warming References  External links * http://www.ekpc.coop/spurlock.html
29824344
Namibia__United_Kingdom_relations
NamibiaUnited Kingdom relations refers to the bilateral relationship between Namibia and the Kingdom. Relations are considered good and a British Council operates in Namibia. In July 2006, M. Liswaniso became Namibias High Commissioner in London, replacing Nashandi. The mission is accredited to Cyprus, Greece, Ireland and Malta as well as multilateral organizations based in London. Since 2007, Bensberg has been the High Commissioner from the United Kingdom to Namibia.()EconomyThe Tinto Group, a mining company based in the United Kingdom and Australia owns 69% of the Uranium Mine in Namibia.(Country Profile: Namibia Foreign & Commonwealth Office of the United Kingdom) In 2008, the United Kingdom imported more than $700 million worth of goods from Namibia, making it the second largest importer of Namibian goods after neighboring Africa.(Trade Profile of Namibia United Nations Statistics Division)ReferencesExternal links* Namibia Seeks Ties With Leicester To Improve Education The Business Network for International Trade, 25 January 2010* High Commission of the Republic of Namibia in the United Kingdom
29835438
Gerard_Hodgkinson
Gerard William Hodgkinson OBE, MC (19 February 1883 &ndash; 6 October 1960) played first-class cricket for Somerset between 1904 and 1911.() He was born at Clifton, Bristol and died at Hole, Somerset. He was also the plaintiff in a celebrated literary libel case in the 1930s and a decorated soldier and airman who saw service in both the First and Second World Wars.Family background and cricket careerHodgkinsons family owned and operated the Wookey Hole Paper Mill, which was established in 1610 and was the last manufacturer of handmade paper in the United Kingdom.() In the early years of the 20th century, the mill employed 200 people, and local caves on the river Axe on the property had been known from early times, but the discovery in Victorian times of an extensive network of linked caves turned the business increasingly into a tourism one.(() The family home was Glencot House, a mock-Jacobean pile completed in 1887 and now a luxury hotel.()Gerard Hodgkinson was educated at College and then joined the family business. In 1904, he made the first two of 19 first-class cricket appearances for Somerset as a right-handed middle- or lower-order batsman.() He was not successful in his 1904 matches for Somerset, nor when he reappeared in two games in 1906. In 1907, he played six times for the county, the most appearances in a single season, and made 49 in the match against Worcestershire, his highest to that point: this was the match in which Bisgood, making his first-class debut, scored 82 and an unbeaten 116, the first time a Somerset batsman made 100 on debut.() Hodgkinson did not play for Somerset in 1908 or 1909, but returned for four games in 1910 and in his first match of the season, against Gloucestershire he made the highest score of his career.() Coming in with Somerset at 134 for six wickets, he hit 99 before his partner for a last-wicket stand of 68, Jack White, was out, leaving him a run short of a century. He never reached such heights again in first-class cricket: that was his only score of more than 50, though in the match against the Indians in 1911 he made 44 in the first innings and 41 in the second.() He did not appear in first-class cricket after the 1911 season.Military careerHodgkinsons Air Force record held in National Archives indicates that although in the First World War his home was at Wookey, he was also at this stage a settler in East Africa.() Hodgkinson joined the East African Mounted Rifles on 10 August 1914, six days after the war had been declared.() He later transferred to the 2nd of London Yeomanry, in the territorial cavalry division known as the Dragoons, but from 1916 he was seconded to the Flying Corps as a pilot.() In June 1917, still seconded to the Royal Flying Corps, he was promoted from second lieutenant to lieutenant and had by this time been awarded the Cross.() In February 1920, the Gazette reported that he was unemployed from March 1919 with the rank of captain.() And in 1921 he was finally officially discharged from the County of London Yeomanry.()Hand-written notes in his record from 1918 state that he has extensive knowledge of Central Africa and South Somaliland and the Swahili language and said that he was a fit GS (flying) with a strong recommendation for duty in a warm climate.( He appears to have served in the East Africa region from July 1918 until his effective discharge the following year.Later life and literary libelAn obituary in 1996 of Hodgkinsons son Colin, who was born in 1920 and who himself had an extraordinary career as a war-time pilot despite losing both legs in an air accident, gives a small portrait of Gerard Hodgkinson in the inter-war period. Colins earliest memories of his father were of a powerful man in hunting pink. As he learned later, he was an outstanding Master of Foxhounds with the Mendip, a big-game hunter and a fine shot, it says.(Colin Hodgkinson obituary from Daily Telegraph quoted on website forum.) Hodgkinson was joint master of the Farmers Hunt from 1929 to 1932.() He was also the owner and manager of the Wookey Hole caves at this time.In 1932, the novelist Cowper Powys published Glastonbury Romance, the second of his so-called Wessex novels. The plot traced the activities of a large number of people within a fictionalised small Somerset town where there is a struggle between a charismatic and mystical leader John Geard, and the local landowner, Philip Crow, whose ownership and entrepreneurial exploitation of mining at the Wookey Hole caves is a counterpoint to the folk mysticism of Geard and the activities of anarchists and revolutionaries within the town. Though the plot is clearly fantastical, Powys ingenuously blended real places and people into the novel and Hodgkinson successfully sued for libel on the basis that the person, the character and the activities of the capitalist Philip Crow were based on him.()() The libel case had a direct effect on Powyss career and output: subsequent editions of A Glastonbury Romance carried disclaimers reinforcing its status as fiction, and Powyss next novel Sands was revised and published under a different name in the UK to avoid a repetition of the lawsuit from citizens of Weymouth.Second World War service and afterAlthough he was in his late 50s, Hodgkinson was re-commissioned as a pilot officer in the Royal Air Force in January 1940.() In July 1940 he was given the rank of officer.() He was appointed of the Order of the British Empire in the 1945 Years Honours list, by which time he was a leader in the RAF Reserve.() He finally retired from the RAF on 23 July 1945 and was granted the rank of wing commander on his retirement.() A collection of material about his son, Colin, indicates that Hodgkinson was involved in intelligence work in the RAF during the war.()Hodgkinson had sold the family home at Glencot in the 1930s but continued to live and work in Wookey until his death. The mill and caves complex was sold to Tussauds in 1973, 13 years after his death.References
29853264
Cane_Run_Generating_Station
The Cane Run Generating Station is a power plant owned and operated by Gas and Electric. It is located 10 miles southwest of Downtown Kentucky, in its Pleasure Ridge Park neighborhood.  See also*mining in Kentucky*warmingReferencesExternal links*Official website
29869118
Acrocercops_zorionella
Acrocercops zorionella is a moth of the Gracillariidae family. It is known from Zealand.(Global Taxonomic Database of Gracillariidae (Lepidoptera))thumb|left|200px|MineThe larvae feed on grandiflora, lucida, retusa, robusta and tenuifolia. They mine the leaves of their host plant. The larva mines directly into the leaf through the bottom of the egg. The mine starts as a long, slender, slightly tortuous, gradually widening gallery. The first part being on the under-surface of the leaf, close against the cuticle, showing up white and silvery by reflected light. The remainder of the mine, however, is on the upper surface. In the last stage the gallery expands, more or less abruptly, into a large irregular blotch. It usually follows the midrib or margin of the leaf along its greater extent, sometimes being deflected by the coarser veins. In this manner its course may be slightly tortuous, but rarely markedly so. The midrib forms an impassable barrier except at its upper end. The colour of the mine is conspicuously white or light green, sometimes discoloured a bright reddish-brown, but patchy in character. That part of the leaf covering the blotch is, in fleshy leaves, more or less mottled in shades of green according to the closeness of the mine to the outer cuticle. The frass is exceedingly scanty, black, finely granular, occupies a thin line near one side of the gallery, sometimes abruptly changing from one side to the other. After the first moult the granules are irregularly scattered over the floor of the mine. Leaves are seldom found containing more than two mines.ReferencesExternal links* The Leaf Mining Insects of New Zealandzorionella
29874525
Equidistance_principle
The equidistance principle or principle of equidistance is a legal concept introduced in boundary claims.The phrase denotes a concept of geography and law &mdash; that a nations maritime boundaries should conform to a median line equidistant from the shores of neighboring nation-states. This concept was developed in the process of settling disputes where the borders of adjacent nations were located on a contiguous continental shelf. The principle of equidistance represents one aspect of customary international law, but its importance is evaluated in light of other factors,(Dorinda G. Dallmeyer et al. (1989). ) such as history:Historic rights or titles of some or another kind will acquire enhanced, rather than diminished, importance as a result of the narrowing of the physical rather than the legal sources of right.  It is important to remember that, although historical claims were not successful in the Gulf of Maine case, the identification of a quo or vivendi line in TunisiaLibya was of decisive importance in confirming the equitableness of the first stage of delimitation.  States will scrupulously avoid, more than ever, any appearance of acquiescence where acquiescence is not intended; prudent coordination can be expected between petroleum and mining ministries and the legal advisers of foreign ministries. &mdash; Highet, Keith. (1989). Whatever became of natural prolongation, in .HistoryThe United States used equidistance in the 1805 Act of Congress which divided public lands by measurements as close as possible to equidistant from those two corners which stand on the same line.(International law refers to equidistance.  For example, Article 6 of the 1958 Geneva Convention on the Continental Shelf explains:See also* prolongation principle* AppendageNotesReferences* Dorinda G. Dallmeyer and Louis De Vorsey. (1989). Rights to Oceanic Resources: Deciding and Drawing Maritime Boundaries. Dordrecht: Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 10-ISBN 079230019X/13-ISBN 9780792300199;  OCLC 18981568
29908385
Black_Diamond_Coal_Mining_Railroad
 The Black Diamond Coal Mining Railroad was 5.9 miles long(Map of Antioch Area Coal Mines and Their Railroads Circa 1897-99, wx4.org/to/foam/shortlines/coal/mines.html. Retrieved 2011-02-06.) and ran from Black Diamond Landing, California (now part of the city of California) to California.  It was owned and operated by the Black Diamond Coal Mining Company(History; The Company, southport-land.com/history. Retrieved 2011-02-02.) and therefore did not have its own official name.  Over the years, it has been known by at least four different names. (A report prepared by the State in the 1880s referred to it as both the Black Diamond Coal Mining Railroad Company and the Black Diamond Railroad.(Third Annual Report of the Board of Railroad Commissioners of the State of California for the Years ending December 31, 1880-81-82, pages 345-348.)  It has also been referred to as the Black Diamond Coal Company Railroad(Traci Parent and Karen Terhune, Images of America: Black Diamond Mines Regional Preserve, Arcadia Publishing, 2009, pages 115-126.) and the Black Diamond Coal and Railroad Company.(B. H. Ward, Mt. Diablo Coal Mine Railroads, The Western Railroader, Booklet 370-E.))The railroad was built by Gold Rush-era civil engineer and artist Day, and opened for service in 1868 primarily to serve the Black Diamond Coal Mine at Nortonville.  At the town of California the railroad crossed the tracks of the Pacific Railroad using an overhead tressle.(The Pacific Tourist, J. R. Bowman, Publisher, 1882, p. 335.)  It was mostly standard gauge, however there was a small segment that was narrow gauge from the mine portals to coal bunkers.(  The railroad had four locomotives, two built in San Francisco by H. J. Booth at the Iron Works,(Gilbert H. Kneiss, Locomotives of The Union Iron Works, Railway and Locomotive Historical Society Bulletin No. 68, November, 1946.)( one built in San Francisco by Vulcan Iron Works( and one from the Locomotive Works in Pennsylvania.(  Three locomotives had names: The D. O. Mills (named after Ogden Mills), the Hayward (named after Hayward), and the Black Diamond.  One locomotive was a narrow-gauge engine that was used to bring mine cars from the mine portals to the bunkers.(Trains ran by gravity from Nortonville to Black Diamond Landing because it was all downhill.(    The railroad was abandoned in about 1885 when the Black Diamond Coal Mining Company closed its mine at Nortonville and moved all of its employees to another of the Companys mines at Black Diamond, Territory.((The move of coal miners from Nortonville, California to Black Diamond, Washington Territory, 1885 by Jacqueline Byer Dial, self published, 1980.)  In 1888, two of its locomotives, the D. O. Mills and the Black Diamond were transferred to the Bay and British Columbia Railroad (BB&BC) in the state of Washington.(Fred Jukes, Philip Van Wyck and Bruce B. Cheever, The Bellingham Bay & British Columbia Railroad Company, Railway and Locomotive Historical Society Bulletin No. 84, October, 1951.)  The BB&BC was a company that had strong ties to the Black Diamond Coal Mining Company because the two companies had the same management.( The locomotive named the Hayward was sold for scrap.(Today, part of the old roadbed can still be seen along Nortonville Road between California and Nortonville.  The terminus at Nortonville is now a historic preserve managed by the East Bay Regional Park District.(( References  External links * Locomotives of the Union Iron Works* Black Diamond Mines Regional Preserve, part of the East Bay Regional Park District* History; The Company (history of the Black Diamond Coal Mining Company). * Circa 1897-99 Map of Mt. Diablo Coal Mine Railroads in a private collection.* Images of America: Black Diamond Mines Regional Preserve (Google Books preview version)  
29924772
Curt_Netto
occupation   metallurgist, educatorCurt Netto (August 21, 1847-February 7, 1909) was a German metallurgist and educator. He is regarded as a precursor for the industrial utilization of aluminium. He was active in early period Japan.()BiographyNetto was born in Saxony, where his father, Gustav Adolph Netto was a mining official. As a youth, he relocated with his family to Saxony, but returned to Freiberg by 1860. He enrolled in the Universitt Bergakademie Freiberg in 1864. He left school in 1869, and volunteered for the military, joining the troops corps. He saw combat in the War of 1870-1871, and was decorated with the Cross (second class). After the war, in 1871, he obtained a job as a chemist working with enamels at the workshop of August Geitner. In 1873, he was recruited by the Japanese government as a foreign advisor and was placed in charge of modernizing the Kosaka Mines, a lead, copper and zinc mine at Akita in northern Honshu. He was one of the co-founders of the German Society of Natural History and Ethnology of Asia (Deutsche Gesellschaft fr Natur- und Vlkerkunde Ostasiens).(The mines were privatized in 1877, and Netto travelled to Tokyo, where he obtained a job as a lecturer on metallurgy at Imperial University in 1878. He took a one year sabbatical leave from 1882-1883 for research in Europe, Mexico and the United States.() In June 1885, Meiji conferred upon him the of the Rising Sun.() Nettos contract with Tokyo Imperial University expired in November 1885, and he returned to Germany in 1886. However, soon after his return, he was forced to sell much of his large collection of Japanese woodblock prints as he lost all of his savings in a failure.(After briefly working in Paris, Netto obtained a job with Krupp from 18871889, where he invented a new patented process to produce aluminium by the sodium reduction of cryolite. The revolutionary new process promised to drastically reduce production costs for aluminium, which until that point had been valued more highly than gold due to its scarcity and difficulty to produce. However, Nettos process was quickly rendered obsolete by the development of electrolysis smelting.() In 1889, on the recommendation of noted chemist Winkler, Netto accepted a post as head of the technical department of Metallgesellschaft in am Main.(()Netto married in 1899 and had three children. He retired in 1902 due to health reasons and from 1906 resided at the resort of Nauheim in Hesse. He died February 7, 1909 in Frankfurt.(PublicationsNetto published two books from his experiences in Japan:* Papierschmetterlinge aus Japan (Paper Butterflies from Japan) 1888.* Japanischer Humor, 1901ReferencesFurther reading* Adolph NettoNettoja:
29955894
Brighterion
Brighterion is a Delaware Corporation headquartered in Francisco, California that offers software for real-time fraud prevention.The company won the 2005 EPCA/ECR award for the most Innovative and Cost-effective Payments Processing Solution launched during 2005.(EPCA)  According to the Brighterion website iPrevent received the 2006 Payment Security Product Excellence Award and the Best Analytical Solution Award by The Meta Group (acquired by Gartner).(Brighterion Company)Brighterion holds several patents for dynamic fraud prevention and abnormal behavior detection.(Patents)(Patents)Brighterion has recently released version 4.5 of its iPrevent software that is used for Real-time Acquirer/Issuer fraud prevention.(PR News Wire)HistoryBrighterion was founded in April 2000 and is headquartered in Francisco, California with offices in Europe.  Brighterions core technology is based on MindSuite.Mastercards Group Head, Fraud Management Solutions is on the of directors of Brighterion.(Bruce Rutherford)ProductsBrighterion supplies software for real-time fraud prevention (acquirer, issuer, prepaid, card, card, corporate, checks, delinquency prediction, retailers, healthcare fraud, insurance, payments, laundering, etc), security intelligence and national/international compliance.iPreventiPrevent is a real-time fraud prevention, compromised account detection  and delinquency prediction for Financial Services. iPrevent uses intelligence technologies such as Agents, Mining, Networks, Business Rules, logic, Algorithm, Simulation, programming, Case-based Reasoning to provide an enhanced score.(Brighterion Products) iPrevent evaluates behaviors specific to an individual cardholder or merchant and identifies, in real time, abnormal behavior to prevent previously unknown fraud.(iProtectiProtect is a real-time decision-support engine that can combine data from many sources to threat assessment, and allows early detection of potential terrorist threats. iProtect uses inferential reasoning to classify entities such as people and organizations and portray suspected associations between these entities. iProtect can be used in the fields of security and defense.(iComplyiComply is a browser-based service that helps institutions and other regulated companies check their clients (your customer) against all of the  worlds compliance lists. iComplys laundering module is browser-based software for monitoring and reporting suspicious activities.(iSuperviseiSupervise is a browser-based decision-management software (DMS) that can be used in real-time or batch mode.(Awards and recognitionBrighterion has received awards and recognition for its products including:* 2005 EPCA/ECR (European Payments Consulting Association) award for the most Innovative and Cost-effective Payments Processing Solution launched during 2005.(*2009 award for Fraud Innovative Solutions from the Publi-News Pay Forum (Brighterion Awards)(All Pay News)(Publi-News)*Best Analytical Solution and Best Mining Technology from the MetaGroup (Acquired by Gartner)(TechnologyBrighterion utilizes the follow Artificial Intelligence Technologies in its products(Brighterion Technology)::*agent and Agents:*Networks:*Case-based Reasoning:*Logic:*Algorithms:*Business Rules:*Constraint Programming:*Mining:*Text Mining:*Simulation:*Velocity AnalyzerReferences(External links*Brighterion Company Website*Publi-News Pay Forum*European Payments Consulting Association*Essentials of Online Payment Security and Fraud Prevention
29980546
Black_Diamond_Coal_Mining_Railroad_(California)
#REDIRECT Diamond Coal Mining Railroad
30002764
Harry_W._Child
File:Lake Yellowstone Hotel YNP2.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The Hotel in National Park, expanded by Childs Yellowstone Park Hotel CompanyHarry W. Child (18571931) was an entrepreneur who managed development and ranching companies in southern Montana. He was most notable as a founder and longtime president of the Park Company, which provided accommodation and transportation to visitors to National Park from 1892 to 1980. Child was, with park superintendent and Park Service administrator Albright, singularly responsible for the development of the park as a tourist destination and for the construction of much of the parks visitor infrastructure.Early lifeHarry W. Child was born in San Francisco in 1857. After abandoning a course of educational preparation in Massachusetts for Harvard, Child returned to San Francisco via Panama. Back in  San Francisco he helped to establish the Francisco Stock Exchange in 1882. He arrived in Montana with his proceeds from that venture and established himself in mining, transportation and banking. By 1887 Child was working as manager of the Gloster and Gregory silver mines, owned by & W. Seligman & Co.. Somewhat later, Child successfully managed the construction of a smelter in Great Falls.(Barringer, p. 36) Child became known for a bold approach to business. In 1887 he was involved in a labor dispute at the Gregory mine, negotiating a $250,000 payment to the miners, collecting the cash in Helena, and evading robbery attempts on the way back to the mine. In hindsight, the entire incident may have been set up by Child to obscure his own management error.(Barringer, p. 37) In 1887 he In 1889 formed the short-lived Helena, Hot Springs and Smelter Railroad. One of his partners in the venture was his brother-in-law Edmund Bach. In 1892 Child and Bach formed the Yellowstone Park Transportation Company along with partners Silas Huntley (another brother-in-law) and Aaron and L.H. Hershfeld.Yellowstone Park CompanyFile:Old Faithful Inn main facade.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Faithful Inn The Yellowstone Park Transportation Company had an exclusive agreement with the Pacific Railway to transport arriving railroad passengers into the park. The railroad owned a majority interest in  the Yellowstone Park Association, which ran the majority of the in-park Yellowstone hotel concessions. After the railroads minority partners and managers in the YPA left the company, Child, Huntley and Bach bought the YPA in 1898 with financing from the railroad. Child became president of the company. Huntley died and Bach suffered political scandal. Bach and Huntleys stock reverted to the Northern Pacific, but Child bought enough of the stock to own half the business by 1905, and in 1907 bought the remainder from the Northern Pacific, which sought to divest itself of the company after the Northern Securities scandal. Again, the Northern Pacific provided financing of the purchase. In 1909 Child reorganized the company, dissolving the YPA and creating the Yellowstone Park Hotel Company, with himself as president, his son Huntley as treasurer and his son-in-law William Nichols as secretary.(Barringer, p. 39)File:Canyon Hotel, Yellowstone.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The Hotel Child aggressively expanded the hotel concession. At the turn of the century, the Geyser Basin, the largest concentration of geysers in the world and home of Old Faithful, was a half-days ride from the nearest hotel. Child obtained permission to build a hotel at the Upper Geyser Basin. He had met  Reamer, a young architect from San Diego, while both wintered in Jolla, California. Child set Reamer to design and construct the Faithful Inn in 1903, which became an iconic example of rustic log construction. At about the same time Child and Reamer expanded the Hotel and another hotel at the Yellowstone Canyon.(Barringer, pp. 44-47) The same year, Child accompanied Roosevelt on his grand tour of Yellowstone. Child would also accompany Harding in 1923, Coolidge in 1927, and future president Hoover in 1928. Child also conducted the King of Sweden through the park, receiving a knighthood in return.(Barringer, pp. 82-83)In 1905, the Commerce Commission ruled against Child and the Northern Pacific in an unfair trade practices dispute  with William Wylie, operator of several tent camps in Yellowstone. Thwarted in his attempt to drive Wylie out of business, Child recruited investors to buy out Wylie, while Child remained in the background. The newly acquired company kept the Wylie name and was incorporated as the Wylie Permanent Camping Company. With improvements to services mandated by Child, the camping business expanded rapidly.(Barringer, p. 50)Reamer, by now a close family friend, accompanied Harry and Adelaide Child on a European tour in 1909. The next year he designed a new Hotel for Child, built on a scale far greater than any previous park building.  The Canyon Hotel quickly became the premier hotel in the park.(Barringer, pp. 47-48) In 1911 Child added the Yellowstone Park Boat Company to his portfolio, offering excursions on Lake.(Barringer, p. 48) However, Child gave up a portion of his share of the Wylie Permanent Campiing Company to friend and competitor F. Jay Haynes, who operated photography concessions in the park, and who held the Pacific Railroads hotel concession in the park.  Until this time the Union Pacific concession was largely theoretical, but with the extension of rail service to Yellowstone, Montana, the UP and Haynes became a threat to Childs core business. The sale effectively bought Haynes cooperation as a competitor.(Barringer, p. 53)Other venturesIn Montana, Child developed Green Meadow Ranch. Child bought the property in 1887 on behalf of investors that included executives of the Northern Pacific Railroad, selling it at a substantial markup to the St. Paul and Helena Land and Improvement Company. In 1914 Child bought back the property, by then a poultry-raising venture,(Barringer, p. 53) and brought in Reamer to design an enormous Swiss Chalet-style house, barn, blacksmith shop and granary complex. The house burned in 1924, and the barn in 1956. The granary and blacksmith shop remain, and are the object of preservation efforts.() Child also developed Oro Fino Terrace, a complex of six three-story units under one roof at 802-812 North Benton Avenue, designed by Saint Paul architect Ralph Edgerton.  Built in 1887, Oro Fino Terrace burned in 1985.In 1913 Child and partner Charles Anceney established the Flying D Ranch, covering  in Madison and Galltin counties. By 1920 the ranch comprised  and leased another .()Automobile tourismFile:Yellowstone Park Transportation Co bldg YNP1.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Yellowstone Park Transportation Company warehouse in Montana Automobiles remained banned in Yellowstone long after they were admitted in other national parks, due to the influence of Child and the Northern Pacific.(Barringer, p. 62) In 1916, as part of an effort to exert Park Service control over concessioners, Park Service director Mather dictated a settlement between Yellowstone concessioners that sold all of Haynes interests apart from his photography business to Child, while Child gave up his interest in the Wylie camping operation to a new organization, in return for the parks motorized transportation concession.(Barringer, p. 65)(Haines, pp. 364-365) As a result of this deal, Child became the beneficiary of three railroads: the Northern Pacific, the Union Pacific, and the Burlington. Child used the railroads resources to borrow money for a fleet of custom-built Motor Company touring buses and touring cars. Child closed the Fountain Hotel, which was no longer needed as a relay point.(Barringer, p. 67) Child suffered bouts of ill health beginning in 1916, the result of diabetes and other problems. Mather and assistant Albright were concerned about the future of the Yellowstone concessions should Child die, since his Childs son Huntley so angered Mather in 1916 that he was no longer permitted to conduct business with the Park Service.(Barringer, pp. 70-71) Child suffered financial difficulties in 1917 as a result of the decline in tourism that accompanied the United States entry into World War I, but emerged healthy enough to consider re-absorbing the Wylie camping concession when it became available in 1918, which had suffered more heavily in the downturn.(Barringer, p. 69) However, former Wylie employee Howard Hays arranged to purchase the concession with Park Service approval, renaming it the Yellowstone Park Camp Company in 1919. But by 1924, with Hays in ill health, Child bought the Yellowstone Park Camps Company , renaming it the Yellowstone Park Lodge and Camps Company, effectively cementing a monopoly of the major Yellowstone concessions.(Barringer, pp. 72-74)Marriage and descendentsHarry Child married Adelaide Dean in 1883. Their children included Huntley Child, who managed the Yellowstone Park Hotel Company during his fathers illness in 1916, angering Stephen Mather, which resulted in his expulsion from the company by his father.() Daughter Ellen Child Nichols married William Nichols, who started as secretary to his father-in-law in 1907 and became president of the Yellowstone Park Company at Childs death in 1931. Ellen became chairman of the company in 1963 and was treasurer in 1965, selling the Yellowstone Park Company to Goldfield Enterprises in 1966.()Child died in 1931 at his winter home in Jolla, California.ReferencesSources*Barringer, Mark Daniel. Selling Yellowstone: Capitalism and the Construction of Nature, Lawrence, Kansas: University Press of Kansas, 2002. ISBN 978-070061167-3*Haines, Aubrey L. The Yellowstone Story: A History of Our First National Park, Niwot, Colorado: University Press of Colorado, 1996. ISBN 978-070061167-3*Quinn, Ruth. Weaver of Dreams: The Life and Architecture of Robert C. Reamer, Gardiner, Montana: Leslie & Ruth Quinn, 2004. ISBN 0-87081+391-9
30022703
Riversdale_Mining
 intl                Riversdale Mining is an Australian mining company, listed on the 200. It specialises in coal mines in Africa.()()()Tata Steel owned a stake of approximately 24% in Riversdale;() Capital and Brazilian steelmaker CSN also have a stake.() In April 2010, Tinto Group gained a majority stake.()OperationsIn June 2010, Riversdale Mining signed an agreement with Iron and Steel to jointly develop Riversdales Zambeze coal reserves in Mozambique, one of the worlds largest undeveloped coking coal areas; Wuhan will also buy coal from Riversdales nearby Benga mines.() The Benga mines are expected to produce 20 million tonnnes per year.() These mines are near Moatize in Mozambique.()Riversdale also has the Zululand anthracite mine in northern Natal in Africa.()TakeoverRiversdale has been in takeover talks with Rio Tinto, valuing it at A$3.5 billion;()()() the of India has also considered bidding.()References
30047430
Charles_James_Fleming
Charles James Fleming QC (26 November 1839 &ndash; 25 December 1904)() was a British barrister and Liberal Party politician. He sat in the House of Commons from 1892 to 1895, but his parliamentary career was cut short when he fell out with the Liberal Party in his constituency. His business ventures failed, and he was made bankrupt. Career Fleming was the oldest son of Lionel Fleming of Manchester and Sale and his wife Anne, the daughter of Edward Rice Haywood from Liverpool.() He was educated privately, and then joined the Civil Service in Bombay, working in the financial department.( He was to the bar at Inn in 1872, and practised on the Circuit,( becoming a Counsel in July 1893.()()In 1869 he married Georgina Brown, the youngest daughter of James Brown from Eccles.(He unsuccessfully contested the borough of Pontefract at the 1886 general election,() and at the 1892 general election he was elected as the of Parliament (MP) for the Doncaster division() of the Riding of Yorkshire, defeating the sitting Liberal Unionist MP Wentworth-FitzWilliam.(Craig, page 434) In January 1894 the Doncaster Liberal Council decided not to adopt him as their candidate for the next election, resolving:That, after what has transpired between their member of Parliament and the executive, this meeting is of the opinion that Mr. C. J. Fleming, M.P. for the Doncaster division of Yorkshire, no longer retains the confidence of the Liberal party in the division. This Executive therefore recommend the Liberal Council at its annual meeting to adopt another candidate for the next election, while wishing Mr Fleming to retain his seat during the present Parliament and the executive to take steps to secure another candidate()At the 1895 general election he stood unsuccessfully as the Liberal candidate in the borough of Dudley.(Craig, page 107)Meanwhile, Fleming had not practised law since 1891 or 1892, and had engaged in a series of unsuccessful business ventures.()In 1891 he had become the owner of a newspaper called the Weekly Review, but it ran for only 13 weeks and he lost 1,600.(  From 1893 to 1896 he was a director of a mining exploration company in Australia, and in 1897 obtained an option to purchase on two halls in Paris. He hoped to profit from this by floating a company to take over the options, but flotation attempts failed in both London and Paris, and the options expired in November 1897.(This failure combined with a fall in the value of his Australian shares to leave him bankrupt by 1898, although the Receiver concluded that the without the speculation in Paris, Fleming would probably not have become insolvent.( In November 1898, Flemings application for discharge from bankruptcy was opposed by the Official Receiver on the grounds that the debtor had contributed to his bankruptcy by rash and hazardous speculations.( References  External links * 
30075251
Pseudopostega_conicula
Pseudopostega conicula is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It known only from the Guanacaste Province in north-western Rica in lowland, seasonal dry forests.The length of the forewings is 2.3-2.6 mm. Adults are on wing in July and August.EtymologyThe specific name is derived from the Latin coniculus (meaning cone-like, conical) in reference to the conical elongation of the male gnathos.External links*A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)conicula
30093023
Palliser_Region
The Palliser Region is an area in the southeast corner of the province of Alberta, Canada that has been delineated and is serviced by the Palliser Economic Partnership(www.palliseralberta.com). It borders the Canadian province of Saskatchewan to the east, and the US state of Montana to the south. It covers an area of  The total population of the area stood at 112,314 in 2009(http://www.municipalaffairs.alberta.ca/mc_official_populations.cfm). The city of Hat, with a population of 61,097(http://www.municipalaffairs.alberta.ca/documents/LGS/2009pop.pdf), is the areas largest urban centre.The Palliser Region is the traditional territory of the Confederacy, who hunted bison throughout the area. From 1857 to 1860, the area was explored as part of the Expedition, led by Palliser. He described the area of southeast Alberta and southwest Saskatchewan  now known as the Triangle  as semi-arid, and warned that it was unsuitable for agricultural development. European settlement began with the arrival of the Mounted Police in the mid 19th century. Walsh was established by Police Inspector Morrow Walsh, who became a good friend of Bull when he led the Sioux to the area after the Battle of Big Horn.Despite the areas semi-arid climate, the British government encouraged farmers to settle in the region. They struggled with drought up until the end of the 1930s, and many settlers abandoned their farms due to crop failure, but dryland farming techniques introduced by the Farm Rehabilitation Administration eventually transformed the region into a successful agricultural centre.The regions geography is characterized by grasslands  including the Hills  and classic badlands country. The region receives more than 2,512 hours of sunshine per year on average, making it the sunniest area in Canada.The Palliser Region is intersected by two major highways, #1 and #3 on the east-west axis, connecting it to the rest of Canada, and two secondary highways, #36 and #41, on the north-south axis, which connect it to the US border. It is served by the Pacific Railway, which connects it to the rest of North America via connections with its affiliates. This transportation infrastructure is key to the regions economy, which is based on agriculture, oil and gas, manufacturing, defence and aerospace, and tourism.The three fastest growing economic sectors in the Palliser Region are Mining and Oil and Gas Extraction, Professional, Scientific and Technical Services, and Finance, Insurance, Real Estate and Leasing(http://www.palliseralberta.com/locate%20&%20expand%20your%20business/Major_Employers.htm). Employment in the region is currently increasing at more than double the Canadian average. History The Palliser Region is the traditional territory of the Nations of the Confederacy  particularly the Siksika (also called Blackfoot), the Blood (or Kainai) and the Peigan (or Aaptohsipikni). The Ventres also used the area until they relocated to a reservation in eastern Montana in 1861(The People: a historical guide to the first nations of AB, SK and MB. Ward, Donald, Fifth House Ltd., 1995).These were nomadic peoples, who followed game, particularly the bison (or American buffalo) throughout the seasons. Their hunting grounds extended through Montana to the River, eastward along the Hills and northwards as far as the Wetaskiwin area. Everything to the north and east of this was considered the territory of the Cree  indeed, after the Rebellion, when Mekastino (also called Red Crow), chief of the Blood First Nation, and Crowfoot, chief of the Siksika, were taken on a trip to Ottawa, they were familiar with the country as far east as Current, but after that were out of their element(Morrow, J.R., Early History of the Medicine Hat Country, Medicine Hat Historical Society, Medicine Hat, Alberta, 1923).The nations of the Blackfoot Confederacy had always hunted the bison, but the reintroduction of the horse to the American continent by the Spanish conquistadors, the culture, with the bison at the basis of life, became extremely strong(Garden, J.F., The Palliser Triangle, A Tale of the Canadian Grasslands, Footprint Publishing Co. Ltd., 1999.).  By the time of European contact the members of these First Nations were highly skilled riders, breeders and all-round horsemen.The Cypress Hills area was also used by the neighbouring Cree and Assiniboine First Nations, the enemies of the Blackfoot Confederacy. Some sources report that the Cypress Hills area was considered neutral territory, and did not belong to any particular First Nation(http://www.cypresshills.com/index.php?id55). The hills were a source of medicine plants that could not be found on the prairie, and, when bison were scarce, deer, elk and squirrel could be hunted there.From 1857 to 1860, a large area of Land  now southwest Saskatchewan and southeast Alberta  was explored as part of the Expedition, led by Palliser. Born into the Irish aristocracy, Palliser eschewed the comforts of his wealth to travel the world. His particular interest lay in North America, and in 1856 he accepted an offer from the Geographic Society to lead a full scientific expedition to Ruperts Land. The three reports and map that were submitted to the Royal Geographic Society and to the Office by the expedition were instrumental in opening the region to settlement, and proved to be invaluable tools for the Mounted Police, boundary surveyors and railway planners(http://www.abheritage.ca/alberta/en/fur_trade/bio_john_palliser.html). Palliser found that the entire region was suitable for agriculture, except for one semi-arid region that became known as the Triangle.Up until 1870, the region was nominally under the control of the Bay Company, although there was essentially no law enforcement. In 1873 a skirmish between white and Mtis traders and members of the Assiniboine First Nation, which came to be known as the Hills Massacre, prompted Prime Minister A. Macdonald to create the North-West Mounted Police. In 1875 they established Walsh, named after its builder, Inspector Morrow Walsh. The following year, when Sioux leader Bull led his people into Canada after the of Little Big Horn, they arrived at Fort Walsh. Sitting Bull and James Walsh became such good friends that Walsh was criticized for not pursuing Canadian government policy and forcing the Sioux back into the United States(Alberta History Along the Highway: A Travelers Guide to the Fascinating Facts, Intriguing Incidents and Lively Legends in Albertas Past. Stone, Ted, Red Deer College Press, 1996).By the late 1880s, the huge herds of bison had virtually disappeared. This led to a time of great hardship for the First Nation peoples, who at times had to rely on handouts from the North-West Mounted Police at Fort Walsh to survive. Starvation compelled many First Nations to settle on reserves allotted by the federal government. This, coupled with the building of the Pacific Railway, opened the way for white settlement throughout the area.Despite the fact that John Palliser, and later surveyor William Pearce, had warned that the Palliser Region was a semi-desert useless for farming, their assessments were ignored in the rush to settle the area. As early as the late 1910s and early 1920s, however, farmers were abandoning the area.  By 1926, about 6,400 farms had been abandoned, and 17,000 people had left. This was primarily due to the weather: from 1915 to 1930 the mean daily maximum temperature in the Medicine Hat area was 30 C (86 F), and the entire years precipitation was at times as low as 20 cm (8 in.)(The Albertans: From Settlement to Super Province 19052005. Stanway, Paul, CanMedia Inc., 2005).The regions farmers continued to suffer throughout the drought of the 1930s, and by the end of that decade almost 100,000 settlers had left the area. However, by that time, the solution was already in sight: in 1935, the federal government under Prime Minister B. Bennett established the Farm Rehabilitation Administration (PFRA). The PFRA, under the local leadership of Asael E. Palmer, superintendent of the experimental station at Lethbridge, promoted dryland farming techniques and created widespread irrigation projects. In the end, as a result of these measures, almost 200,000 km2. (77,000 sq. mi.) of drought-ravaged land were reclaimed within the province. The techniques established by the PFRA laid the foundation for the successful agriculture industry which flourishes in the Palliser Region to this day. Geography and climate The Palliser Region is part of the  of Albertas grasslands, which are in turn part of the Plains that stretch from the Gulf of Mexico north into Canada. The region is a flat to gently rolling plain, with a few major hill systems, including the Cypress Hills.The rivers in the region are part of either the River or River systems. Badlands have developed where valleys are carved deeply into the bedrock(http://www.abheritage.ca/abnature/grasslands/grassland.htm). The formations typical of badlands  canyons, ravines, gullies and hoodoos  are common in the area. Provincial Park, one of the richest sources of dinosaur fossils in the world and a World Heritage Site, is located within the badlands.The region benefits from a comfortable, semi-arid climate, with generally dry, hot summers and cold, sunny winters interspersed with warm winds. It receives more than 2,512 hours of sunshine per year on average, making it the sunniest area in Canada(http://www.palliseralberta.com/living%20&%20visiting/Climate.htm).(http://www.palliseralberta.com/living%20&%20visiting/Climate.htm)	The Palliser Region is home to a number of individual communities. They include: the cities of Brooks and Hat; the County of Forty Mile No. 8, the County of Newell, and Cypress County; the Municipal District of Acadia No. 34; Albertas three special areas (No. 2, No. 33 and No. 4); the towns of Bassano, Bow Island, Hanna, Oyen, and Redcliff; and the villages of Cereal, Duchess, Empress, Foremost, Rosemary, Tilley and Youngstown. Demographics The Palliser Regions population has been growing steadily for the last twenty years. The population has grown by 1.5% over the last decade, almost 1.5 times faster than the rest of Canada(Industry Profiles, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010.).Population of the major municipalities in the Palliser Region, according to the Government of Alberta Municipal Affairs website(http://www.municipalaffairs.alberta.ca/documents/LGS/2009pop.pdf). Number of households obtained from the Canada Census(http://www12.statcan.ca/census-recensement/2006/dp-pd/prof/92-591/index.cfm?LangE):Within these major municipalities, 28.3% of the population over 15 years old has obtained a high school certificate and equivalent. 12% have a trades certification, 20.7% have a college diploma or some university, and 8.3% have a university degree. English is by far the predominant language, with 93.7% of respondents saying that this is the language spoken at home. 8.7% of the population describes themselves as immigrants, and only 2.9% identify themselves as First Nations, with 74% of those living in Medicine Hat(http://www12.statcan.ca/census-recensement/2006/dp-pd/prof/92-591/index.cfm?LangE). Infrastructure The Palliser Region is crossed by an effective network of highways, linking the area to Saskatchewan in the east, western Alberta and British Columbia in the west, Montana and the rest of the United States in the south, and northern Alberta in the north. The Highway #1 crosses the region from the Saskatchewan border to Medicine Hat, and then proceeds north-west to Calgary. Highway #3 goes south-east from Medicine Hat to Lethbridge. Highway #36 begins at Warner, and then proceeds north through Taber. Highway #41 crosses the Canada/US border at Wild Horse, MT/Wild Horse, AB, and joins the Trans Canada just east of Medicine Hat. The border crossing is open 7 days a week, with seasonally varying hours. Over 100 trucking companies serve the Palliser Region, travelling the highways and meeting the needs of the agriculture, petroleum and other industries in southeast Alberta(http://www.palliseralberta.com/locate%20&%20expand%20your%20business/docs/IEDCTransportation%20and%20Infrastructure.pdf). Bus Lines maintains a depot in downtown Medicine Hat and offers service to centres across the region.The Medicine Hat Municipal Airport (IATA: YXH, ICAO: CYXH), located  southwest of the town centre, is the regions only commercial airport. It is served by Central Mountain Air and offers daily flights to Calgary. The Bar XH Air Inc. charter company also uses the airport. General aviation airports in the region are located in Bow Island, Bassano, Brooks, Foremost, Hanna and Oyen.The Pacific Railway operates the predominant railway system in the Palliser Region. Its main line crosses the border with Saskatchewan and proceeds east to Medicine Hat, splitting at that point to run south through the Pass to British Columbia, and north through Calgary. This rail line links the region to principal centres in Canada from Montreal to Vancouver, and to the northeast and Midwest United States. The National Railway crosses into Alberta from Saskatchewan and stops at Oyen. Through a series of marketing alliances and interline agreements, both railways can extend their markets throughout the United States and Mexico. Quality water treatment, sewage and waste facilities are available throughout the region, and a variety of electricity and natural gas providers offer local service. The City of Medicine Hat actually owns the gas production, gas distribution, electric generation and electric distribution utilities that serve its customers(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Medicine_Hat#Infrastructure). The city is also working on a solar-thermal project which would use solar energy to produce steam to run a portion of its power plant  and which would make Medicine Hat the first Canadian city to use this system(http://www.medicinehat.ca/City%20Government/Departments/Energy%20Sustainability/Renewable%20Energy/EcoTrust%20Medicine%20Hat%20NR.pdf).Telecommunications in the Palliser Region are handled in part through the Alberta SuperNet(http://www.servicealberta.gov.ab.ca/AlbertaSuperNet.cfm), which connects public institutions across the province and currently serves 429 communities. Internet service providers are able to piggyback onto the SuperNet network, making it possible to access high-speed Internet service throughout the region(http://www.palliseralberta.com/se%20alberta%20advantage/Telecommunications.htm). Residents of the Special Areas can access high-speed through Netago Wireless, which has worked with the local government to make service available(http://www.samda.ca/specialareas.html). Economy Forestry, fishing, mining, and oil and gas account for 15% of employment in the Palliser Region. There are also healthy manufacturing and service sectors, and a growing tourism industry. The three fastest growing economic sectors are Mining and Oil and Gas Extraction, which grew by 55.4% from 2000 and 2005, Professional, Scientific and Technical Services, which grew by 41%, and Finance, Insurance, Real Estate and Leasing, which grew by 22.9%(http://www.palliseralberta.com/locate%20&%20expand%20your%20business/Major_Employers.htm). Employment in the region is currently increasing at a rate of 2.9% per year, more than double the Canadian average.In 2004, the Palliser Region employed 10,000 people in the agriculture industry, an increase of almost 50% since 2001. The region is home to 3,600 farms, totaling 3.73 million hectares, with an average farm size of 1,023 hectares. These farms account for $1.23 billion in gross farm receipts and $6.85 billion in total farm capital. The nearly 5,200 farm operators in the region farm 1,080,494 hectares of land in crops. There are about 840,000 cattle and calves in the region (about 13% of the provincial total) and just under 207,000 pigs (approximately 10% of the provincial total). The region is also home to a greenhouse industry led by Red Hat Co-op, a producer-run cooperative that markets greenhouse crops. Over 80% of Albertas dry beans, chick peas and lentils are grown in the region, making it a major pulse centre(Agrifood Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010).The construction and professional, scientific and technical services industry (of which engineering is a part) employed 8,200 workers in the region in 2006, an increase of 37% over 2001. This industry accounts for 10% of total employment in the Palliser Region. The region is home to diverse establishments in the engineering and construction industry, employing an estimated 4,255 people in the City of Medicine Hat alone. There are also 4,800 people employed in the construction sector in the region. To supply skills to the industry, Hat College offers apprenticeship training in carpentry, plumbing, welding and other trades(Energy and Construction Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010).Thanks to the presence of a Research and Development Canada (DRDC) research centre at Canadian Forces Base (CFB) Suffield, the defence and aerospace industry is a dynamic sector in the Palliser Region, with further growth projected through the addition of new training programs. DRDC Suffield conducts research in tactical weapon systems, military engineering, munitions and fire power, and defence against chemical, biological, radiological and explosive hazards. Several local companies have benefited from working closely with DRDC and the licensing of DRDC technologies. The Palliser Region is also home to the Canadian Centre for Unmanned Vehicle Systems, a research, development, testing, evaluation and commercialization centre aimed at accelerating the growth in the sector(Defence and Aerospace Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010).Due to its natural gas reserves, the Palliser Region is able to supply a large portion of Albertas raw resources to produce petrochemicals and specialty chemicals used in the production of plastics, antifreeze, film, fibers and other products. The chemicals and rubber industry employs about 660 workers, or 2% of the workforce, in the Palliser Region(Chemicals and Rubber Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010). Large natural gas reserves in the region are in shallow reservoirs, resulting in a high exploration success rate and low development and production costs. There are also numerous coals deposits in the River formation throughout the Palliser Region providing opportunities for thermal coals/mine and electric generation(Energy Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010).The region is also home to abundant deposits of low temperature clays, including kaolinite and bentonite. The City of Medicine Hat has a long history of producing clay products, including pottery, bathroom fixtures and brick. The low cost and convenience of natural gas is of great advantage to the industry(Minerals Industry Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010). A variety of locations within the Palliser Region have been used in movie productions, including Unforgiven (1991), Texas Rangers (1999), Ararat (2002), Unfinished Life (2005) and RV (2006). The regions natural assets, including Hills Interprovincial Park, Provincial Park and the badlands, are the focus of most of its tourist activity. Culture, recreation and media Medicine Hat is home to the Esplanade Arts & Heritage Centre, which combines an art gallery, museum and theatre under one roof and is also home to the areas archives. The Esplanade was built in 2005 as one of Albertas Centennial Legacy Projects.Performing arts groups in the Palliser Region include a concert society in Brooks, a theatre group in Foremost and a blues group in Bow Island. In addition, the Medicine Hat College Theatre is host to numerous groups who provide regular theatre productions, including the Medicine Hat Musical Theatre Association. Festivals in the area include the Medicine Hat Jazz Festival, the Annual Polka Festival, the Ralston Arts Festival, the City of Medicine Hat Rotary Music Festival and the Annual Young Artists Concerto Competition(Regional Profile, Palliser Economic Partnership, 2010.).The Hidden Valley Ski Area in Hills Interprovincial Park offers both downhill and cross-country skiing, as well as winter hiking opportunities. There are also more than 15 golf courses in the region. Water recreation opportunities can be found at recreational reservoirs, rivers and lakes.The Hat News is the daily newspaper in Medicine Hat; other local weekly papers in the region include the Brooks Bulletin, Brooks and County Chronicle, Bassano Times, Hanna Herald, Bow Island Commentator, Oyen Echo, and Prairie Post. Local television network CFCN-TV, which broadcasts in Calgary and Lethbridge, is the local CTV affiliate. It provides local television coverage, along with CBRT Calgary (Calgary CBC) and CHAT-TV, a Citytv affiliate, in Medicine Hat. Medicine Hat radio stations include Power 93.7 (CJLT-FM), CHAT-FM, MY 96 (CFMY-FM), Classic Hits 102.1 (CJCY-FM) and Rock 105.3 (CKMH-FM). CKUA and Radio 1 are rebroadcast from Calgary, and CHFA-8-FM (Radio Canada) is rebroadcast from Edmonton. Brooks country radio station is Q13 (CIBQ). Government and politics The municipalities within the Palliser Region are governed via a variety of systems. The City of Medicine Hat is governed by a city council consisting of a mayor and eight aldermen, each elected for a term of three years. The most recent elections were held in November 2010, when Boucher was re-elected as mayor for a second term(http://www.city.medicine-hat.ab.ca/index.asp).The City of Brooks is government by a city council consisting of a mayor and six councillors, also elected for a term of three years. The election of November 2010 returned Martin Shields as mayor for a second term(http://www.4u2ctv.com/news.php?default.0.24).The County of Forty Mile No. 8, the County of Newell, Cypress County and the Municipal District of Acadia are each represented by elected councils headed by a Reeve. The Special Areas are run by advisory councils consisting of eight members for Special Area 2, three members for Special Area 3 and three members for Special Area 4.The towns of Bassano, Bow Island, Hanna, Oyen and Redcliff are each governed by their own mayor and town council. The villages of Cereal, Duchess, Empress, Foremost, Rosemary, Tilley and Youngstown are each governed by a village council.The Palliser Region encompasses all or part of four provincial electoral districts, each of which elects a member to the Assembly of Alberta. The district of Hat is represented by Mitzel, a member of the Alberta Progressive Conservative party. The district of Medicine Hat is represented by Progressive Conservative Renner. The district of Strathmore-Brooks is represented by Progressive Conservative Doerksen and the district of Drumheller-Stettler is represented by Progressive Conservative Hayden.At the federal level, the Palliser Region encompasses by two ridings, Medicine Hat and Lethbridge. The riding of Medicine Hat is represented by Payne of the Conservative Party. He was elected in the 2008 federal election, and is a member of the House of Commons Standing Committees on National Defence and Aboriginal Affairs and Northern Development. The riding of Crowfoot has been represented since 2000 by Conservative Sorenson. He is currently the chair of the Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Development and Subcommittee on Agenda and Procedure of the Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Development. References  External links *  Brooks weather forecast from Environment Canada* Cypress Hills Interprovincial Park* Dinosaur Provincial Park* Esplanade Arts & Heritage Centre* Grasslands School District* Medicine Hat News* Medicine Hat Public Library*   Medicine Hat weather forecast from Environment Canada*  Palliser Economic Partnership*  Prairie Land School District* School District No. 76
30111323
Dolaucothi_Estate
mansion (Pre 1871).JPG|thumb| Pre 1871 photograph showing the wings and porch styled by John Nash.The Dolaucothi Estate, or as it was often later spelt, Dolaucothy Estate is situated about one mile north-west of the village of Caio in the upper reaches of the picturesque Cothi valley in the parish of Gaeo, Carmarthenshire.  The name Dolaucothi means the meadows of the Cothi and the now demolished mansion house of the Johnes family stood close by to the banks of the fast flowing Cothi.  In 1873 the estate comprised 3172 acres.(Historic Carmarthenshire Homes and their Families, (Francis Jones, 2006, Brawdy Books, Pembrokeshire))The approach to the house was by two drives of considerable length, that in the east skirting the Dolaucothi Roman Gold Mines (Ogofau, near Pumsaint), while that in the west was flanked by four lines of ancient oaks  the very noble oaks that Borrow (18031881) remarked upon when he walked along the avenue in 1854 to glimpse the house, charmed by the thought that he had never seen a more pleasing locality.(A House That Borrow Admired (H.J. Lloyd Johnes) Available at)Johnes familyThe Dolaucothi Estate was acquired in the late 16th century by the Johnes family upon the marriage of James Johnes (1552 - ?) to Anne Lewis (ne Thomas) (1565 - ?), widow of James Lewis and heiress of John Thomas of Cryngae and Dolaucothi.  James Johnes was the youngest son of Sir Thomas Johnes (1530-?), of Abermarlais, Carmarthenshire and Haroldston, Pembrokeshire, and Mary, widow of Sir Thomas Perrott of Haroldston, and daughter and heir of the Hon. Sir James Berkeley, second son of Maurice, 8th Lord Berkeley.  Sir Thomas Johnes became First Knight of the Shire for that County, and Sheriff of Carmarthenshire in 1541 and Cardiganshire in 1544.(Burkes Landed Gentry (London, 18th ed, 3 vols, 1965-72), vol. 1.)John Johnes (17681816), a former army officer, purchased the estate in 1800 from his cousin and brother-in-law Colonel Johnes M.P. (17481816) of the great Hafod Estate  and Lieutenant of Cardiganshire.(The buildings of Wales  Carmarthen and Ceredigion  Thomas Lloyd, Julian Orbach and Robert Scourfield, Yale University press, 2006)Architecturethumb|right| Dolaucothi Mansion showing the post 1871 architectural changes.The house had an early 18th century five bay, three storey front with older parts to the rear.(The Lost houses of Wales, (Thomas Lloyd, 1987, Save Britains Heritage, London)) The house was in the form of a cube containing 28 rooms.  In 1679 it contained 6 hearths and was described as simple and dignified.(Historic Carmarthenshire Homes and their Families (Francis Jones, 2006, Brawdy Books, Pembrokeshire)) John Nash (17521835) was employed in 1792 to add the porch and two low wings, each with a window in a recessed arch.  At that time, Nash had just finished working on the famous octagonal domed library and square pavilions at Hafod for Thomas Johnes.(The Lost houses of Wales, (Thomas Lloyd, 1987, Save Britains Heritage, London)) John Johnes son, also John, who become Judge Johnes (18001876) had the low wings raised and added bay windows in 1871. Dolaucothi Mansion with the 1871 additions recently completed is shown to the right.  In its heyday Dolaucothi carried an indoor staff of nine and an outside staff of eighteen.(A House That Borrow Admired (H.J. Lloyd Johnes) Available at)  Dolaucothy has been described as having interiors of much charm, important portraits and Eastern war trophies of General Hills V.C.(The Lost houses of Wales, (Thomas Lloyd, 1987, Save Britains Heritage, London))Murder of Judge John JohnesJudge Johnes was educated at Oxford and in due course called to the Bar.  He was a good businessman and soon had put the whole estate on a sound financial basis.  In 1822 he married Elizabeth Edwardes, daughter and heiress of the Reverent John Edwardes (17651847) of Gileston Manor in Glamorganshire, a younger branch of the family of Edwardes, of Rhyd-y-gors.  They had two daughters, Charlotte Anne Maria (18251911) and Elizabeth (18341927).   Judge Johnes became a widower when his wife Elizabeth died on the 25 June 1848.(Historic Carmarthenshire Homes and their Families (Francis Jones, 2006, Brawdy Books, Pembrokeshire))Charlotte married Captain Charles Caesar Cookman Esq, the eldest son of Edward Rogers Cookman, Esq. of Monart House, County of Wexford. Charles Cookman died on 4 June 1859 leaving Charlotte a widow.In the summer of 1876, Dolaucothi made national news when Judge John Johnes was infamously murdered in his study on 19 August by Henry Tremble, his Irish butler of 17 years service, who killed him with his masters shotgun. Tremble also severely wounded Charlotte Cookman, whose life was saved by one of the other servants. Tremble was very upset that Judge Johnes had refused his application for the tenancy of the Dolaucothi Arms, a local house, which he had previously promised to him. Johnes reasons for not considering Henry Tremble for the position involved Trembles wifes disposition for drinking excessively.(A Devil Who Cared for His Own - The Dolaucothi Murder Viewed Anew (Susan Beckley, B.A., D.A.A.) Available at; http://carmarthenshirehistorian.org/cgi-bin/twiki/view/Historian/ADevilWhoCaredForHisOwn)Tremble then headed into the village of Caio with the intention of murdering John Davies, the inn keeper he felt had deprived him of the position he sought.  Fortunately John Davies was away in Carmarthen that day, so after threatening a local police constable he retired to his own house Myrtle Cottage and shot himself.Henry Tremble, 36, entered service at Dolaucothi upon the death of Captain Cookman in 1859.  Tremble had been Captain Cookmans valet in Ireland and he had accompanied him to Wales upon his marriage to Charlotte.  At Dolaucothi he worked his way up to the role of butler but was known to possess a somewhat violent disposition.  John Johnes would have dismissed him on several occasions previously, but was dissuaded from doing so by Charlotte, who felt that this would betray the memory of her late husband who had commended the care of his favourite servant to her.(A Devil Who Cared for His Own - The Dolaucothi Murder Viewed Anew (Susan Beckley, B.A., D.A.A.) Available at; http://carmarthenshirehistorian.org/cgi-bin/twiki/view/Historian/ADevilWhoCaredForHisOwn)On the 26 August 1876 Judge Johnes remains were interred in the family vault at Caio Church, when the Revs. Canon Phillips, subsequently Dean of Davids, and Charles Chidlow, Vicar, officiated.(History of Caio, Carmarthenshire (Fred S. Price, 1904), B Trerise, Prince of Wales Road)  Charlotte resumed the name of Johnes under her fathers will of 1876 and lived out her days at Dolaucothi, co-inherited with her sister Elizabeth.(A House That Borrow Admired (H.J. Lloyd Johnes) Available at)Sir James Hills-JohnesIn 1882 her younger sister Elizabeth went on to marry General Sir James Hills (18331919), a Cross hero of the Indian Mutiny and former military Governor of Kabul.  Sir James assumed, by royal licence, the additional name and arms of Johnes to become Lieutenant General Sir Hills-Johnes V.C. GCB.  He then took over the running of the Dolaucothi Estate (A House That Borrow Admired (H.J. Lloyd Johnes) Available at) and played a valued part in Welsh life, becoming honorary colonel of the 4th battalion of the Regiment, was J.P. and Deputy Lieutenant for Carmarthenshire, served as high sheriff of that county in 1886, and was made an honorary freeman of the town of Carmarthen in 1910. He was treasurer of University College Wales, 18981919, and was awarded the degree of LL.D. by the University College Wales in 1917.(National Library of Wales  Welsh Biography Online Available at)  Image:Hills-Johnes&Roberts.JPG|thumb|left| Sir Hills-Johnes and Lord Roberts at  Dolaucothy in the early 20th century.His wife Elizabeth had in her early days been a ward of Lady Llanover and had moved in fashionable and literary circles, her life on one occasion being saved by the great Lord Lytton. Her correspondence with the famous Bishop of St Davids, Thirlwall, was published in 1881under the title Letters to a Friend. The house was always full of guests, among them many distinguished men and women like Lord Roberts (18321914) and Sir Morton Stanley (18411904), the African explorer.(A House That Borrow Admired (H.J. Lloyd Johnes) Available at)Lord Roberts and Sir James began a life-long friendship when they were cadets at Military Academy. Lord Roberts joined the Bengal Artillery in 1851, and Sir James, who is just 11 months Lord Roberts junior, joined the same corps in 1853. Both experienced the dangers and perils of the Indian Mutiny, were present at the siege of Delhi and took part in the operations at the relief of Lucknow.  Both were dangerously wounded at the siege of Delhi and before the Mutiny ended, both received the Cross. A decade later they served together again in the Abyssinian and Kabul campaigns and in 1881 the pair received the thanks of both Houses of Parliament.(History of Caio, Carmarthenshire (Fred S. Price, 1904), B Trerise, Prince of Wales Road)Charlotte Johnes died in 1911, Sir James in 1919 and his wife Elizabeth at the great age of 95 in 1927. Upon their deaths the Dolaucothi estate passed through a female line to the Lloyds who added Johnes to their name.  The house was requisitioned by the Ministry of Supply during War II and during this time fell into serious disrepair including the floors collapsing and the lead taken from the roof. Dolaucothi was presented to the National Trust in 1941 subject to the life interest of the owner, Mr Lloyd-Johnes, on whose death in 1956, it became the absolute property of the trust.  The mansion was demolished in 1952.(Historic Carmarthenshire Homes and their Families (Francis Jones, 2006, Brawdy Books, Pembrokeshire))  All that remains of the mansion house is one service wing that now serves as an estate farmhouse.(The buildings of Wales  Carmarthen and Ceredigion  Thomas Lloyd, Julian Orbach and Robert Scourfield, Yale University press, 2006)St Cynwyl churchMemorial - Caio.JPG|thumb|135px|right| Memorial to Sir James Hills-Johnes in lychgate of St Cynwyls Churchyard, Caio.  The church of St Cynwyl is located in the centre of Caio, surrounded by lands originally part of the substantial Dolaucothi Estate.  This was the place of worship of the Johnes family and against the northern wall lies the Dolaucothi family vault from 1815.  There is also a memorial plaque commemorating Lieutenant General Sir James Hills-Johnes VC, GCB (20 August 1833 - 3 January 1919) within the lychgate leading into the churchyard.(The buildings of Wales  Carmarthen and Ceredigion  Thomas Lloyd, Julian Orbach and Robert Scourfield, Yale University press, 2006)Ogofau gold mineThe ancient Roman gold mines at Dolaucothi, also known as the Ogofau Gold Mine were part of the large estate.  Attempts to extract further gold from the mines were undertaken in 1797 for John Johnes and again in the 1850s and in 1871 for his son Judge John Johnes when crushing machinery was introduced.  Larger efforts to extract gold from the mine were undertaken between 1888 and1892 by the South Wales Gold Mining Co, in 19051910 and more notably in 1933  38, when Britains abandonment of the standard led to a much greater interest in native gold.(The buildings of Wales  Carmarthen and Ceredigion  Thomas Lloyd, Julian Orbach and Robert Scourfield, Yale University press, 2006) Those later attempts were unsuccessful in extracting commercial quantities of gold, although interest in the deposits remains.References External links * http://www.laugharnewarmemorial.co.uk/page4.htm Carmarthen County War Memorial* Location of grave and VC medal Dyfed, Wales* 
30118344
Pseudopostega_brevifurcata
Pseudopostega brevifurcata is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It was described by Donald R. Davis and Jonas R. Stonis, 2007.(A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)) It is known from the provinces of Heredia and Guanacaste in northern Rica.The length of the forewings is about 2.7 mm. Adults have been recorded in June and October.EtymologyThe species name is derived from the Latin brevis (meaning short) and furcatus (meaning forked) in reference to the shortened, furcate caudal apex of the male gnathos.Referencesbrevifurcata
30118872
Pseudopostega_didyma
Pseudopostega didyma is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It was described by Donald R. Davis and Jonas R. Stonis, 2007.(A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)) It is known from a moist tropical site located on the western slopes of the Andes and the AmazonianOriente Region in Ecuador.The length of the forewings is 2.52.7 mm. Adults have been recorded in January.EtymologyThe species name is derived from the Greek didymos (meaning double), in reference to the characteristic double lobes of the male gnathos.Referencesdidyma
30119311
Pseudopostega_longipedicella
Pseudopostega longipedicella is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It was described by Donald R. Davis and Jonas R. Stonis, 2007.(A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)) It is known from Puntarenas in Rica and the Canal Zone in Panama.The length of the forewings is 2.33.7 mm. Adults have been recorded in April.EtymologyThe species name is derived from the Latin longus (meaning long) and pedicellus (meaning small, slender stalk) in reference to the extremely long pedicel of the male valva.Referenceslongipedicella
30119876
Pseudopostega_suffuscula
Pseudopostega suffuscula is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It was described by Donald R. Davis and Jonas R. Stonis, 2007.(A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)) It is known from the provinces of Salta and Tucumn in northern Argentina.The length of the forewings is 2.43 mm. Adults have been recorded from November to January.EtymologyThe species name is derived from the Latin suffusculus (meaning brownish) in reference to the characteristic cream to light brownish color of the forewings of this species.Referencessuffuscula
30155100
Minong_Mine_Historic_District
 refnum  77000153()The Minong Mine is a mine site located west of McCargoe Cove campground on Royale National Park, Michigan, USA containing both the remnants of a 19th century copper mine and remains of prehistoric mining activity.(  It was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1977.( Pre-historic miningNative Americans first began mining copper at the Minong Mine site 4500 years ago, using stone implements to extract the pure copper available at the site() and cold-hammering the metal to form spear points and other implements.() These prehistoric miners created pits, some as much as 30 feet deep,( that can still be seen at the site.(  Some pits showed evidence of early engineering efforts, using boulders to support the walls of the pit and drains to remove water.(  There was evidence that these ancient miners utilized fire-setting, where rocks were split by heating them with fire and rapidly cooling them with water to extract the copper within.(When re-discovered in the 19th century, the prehistoric excavations in the Minong Mine area were described as extending in almost a continuous line for more than two miles, in most instances the pits being so close together as barely to permit their convenient working.() A number of ancient mining artifacts were collected from the Minong site; primarily smooth cobbles used as hammers which were, it was said collected by the cartload.(  In addition, a fragment of a wooden bowl about three feet across, a wooden shovel, and a rawhide string were also discovered at the site.(The Minong Mine (1872-1885)Modern copper mining on Isle Royale was begun in the 1840s and 1850s, although not at the Minong Mine site.()  This activity ceased in 1855, and for a number of years there were no permanent inhabitants on the island.(  In 1871, a group of explorers working for the North American Mineral Land Company arrived on the island.(  In the fall of that year, the explorers found the old Native American pit mines west of McCargoe Cove.(  In 1872, a group of prospectors returned and staked out the Minong Mine.(  In late 1874, the Minong Mining Company was organized in Detroit() to mine the copper deposits in the area.( The name Minong was taken from an Ojibwa() word for island in general and Isle Royale in particular.(  This company purchased land from the North American Mineral Land Company and commenced a mining operation in 1875.(Most of the copper mining was still done in open pit mining, but two shafts, one over 300 feet, were also sunk at the mine.(  In 1875, more than 50 people were working at the Minong Mine and living in the nearby settlement of Cove, at the end of McCargoe Cove.( Later, at the height of the Minong operation, some 150 miners were employed at the mine.() A railroad ran between the mine proper and Cove, and the mining settlement had a post office, a dam, a mill (built in 1876), a dock, and a blacksmiths shop.(.((The mine produced some large nuggets of copper; the first, in 1874, was a 5720 pound nugget which was subsequently displayed on the courthouse lawn in Detroit and at the 1876 Exhibition.()  This copper mass showed evidence of being worked by prehistoric miners, the surface of the mass had evidently been beaten up into projecting ridges... depressions, several inches deep, and the intervening elevations, with their fractured summits, covering every foot of the exposed superficies.()   In 1878, a copper mass weighing six tons was discovered, and in 1879 two nuggets of 3317 and 4175 pounds were discovered.(In 1879, the Minong Mining Company was reorganized to form the Minong Copper Company, with its headquarters also located in Detroit.((  The Minong Copper Company continued work until June 1883, when they suspended mining operations, due in part to the low price of copper.((  A few individuals continued mining operations for another two years or so, but by 1885 all activity had ceased.(In the ten years between 1875 and 1885, Minong Mine produced 249 tons of copper.(  However, the amount of copper produced slowly dwindled, and the mine was abandoned in 1885.(The site todayThe area around Minong Mine sports small prehistoric pits, as well as the larger pits (now filled with water) and shafts from the 1870s mine.(  Piles of tailings, the wreckage of a smithy, railroad tracks, and ore carts also are at the site.((  As of 1994, the dam near McCargoe Cove was still intact.()ReferencesFurther reading*
30166646
Human_trafficking_in_Peru
Peru is a source, transit, and destination country for men, women, and children subjected to trafficking in persons, specifically labor and forced prostitution. Several thousand persons are estimated to be subjected to conditions of forced labor within Peru, mainly in mining, logging, agriculture, brick making, and domestic servitude. Many trafficking victims are women and girls from impoverished rural regions of the Amazon, recruited and coerced into prostitution in urban nightclubs, bars, and brothels, often through false employment offers or promises of education. Indigenous persons are particularly vulnerable to debt bondage. Forced child labor remains a problem, particularly in informal mines, cocaine production, and transportation. There were reports the terrorist group Sendero Luminoso, or Shining Path, recruited children as soldiers and drug mules. To a lesser extent, Peruvians are subjected to forced prostitution in Ecuador, Spain, Italy, Japan, and the States, and forced labor in Argentina, Chile, and Brazil. Peru also is a destination country for some Ecuadorian and Bolivian females in forced prostitution, and some Bolivian citizens in conditions of forced labor. Child sex tourism is present in Iquitos, Madre de Dios, and Cuzco. Traffickers reportedly operate with impunity in certain regions where there is little or no government presence.(Peru. Trafficking in Persons Report 2010. Department of State (June 14, 2010). )The Government of Peru does not fully comply with the minimum standards for the elimination of trafficking; however, it is making significant efforts to do so. Last year, the government increased law enforcement efforts against trafficking crimes and maintained public awareness initiatives. However, the government failed to provide adequate victim services and made insufficient efforts to address the high incidence of labor trafficking in the country.(ProsecutionThe Government of Peru improved efforts to combat human trafficking through law enforcement last year. Law 28950 prohibits all forms of trafficking in persons, prescribing penalties of eight to 25 years imprisonment depending on the circumstances. These penalties are sufficiently stringent and commensurate with those prescribed for other serious crimes, such as rape. During the reporting period, police investigated 137 trafficking cases; of these, 34 involved forced labor and 103 involved sex trafficking, with a total of 185 reported victims. Authorities brought forth 78 trafficking cases to the judiciary and secured the convictions of nine sex trafficking offenders, who received sentences ranging from three to 30 years imprisonment, in addition to fines. In comparison, Peruvian authorities prosecuted 54 cases and convicted five sex trafficking offenders the previous year. However, there were very few prosecutions and no convictions reported for forced labor offenses, despite an estimated high incidence of forced labor in the country. The governments dedicated anti-trafficking police unit consisted of approximately 30 officers.Police maintained and expanded the use of an electronic case tracking system for human trafficking investigations, although this system did not track judicial activity, such as prosecutions and convictions. Corruption among low-level officials enabled trafficking in certain instances, and individual police officers tolerated the operation of unlicensed brothels and the prostitution of children. No investigations or allegations of official complicity with trafficking activity were reported last year. The government provided training on human trafficking to law enforcement officials, immigration officials, diplomats, and legal officials, among others. The government collaborated with foreign governments on anti-trafficking initiatives and investigations.(ProtectionThe government provided limited assistance to trafficking victims last year. The government did not employ a formal mechanism for identifying trafficking victims among vulnerable populations, such as adult women in prostitution. While the government had no formal process for referring trafficking victims for treatment, authorities could refer child victims of trafficking to government-operated childrens homes for basic shelter and care, two of which provide specialized care to victims of commercial sexual exploitation. Similarly, the government operated general shelters for adult female victims of abuse, which some trafficking victims accessed during the reporting period. organizations (NGOs) provided care to sexually exploited women; however, specialized services and shelter for trafficking victims remained largely unavailable. The government did not provide financial assistance to anti-trafficking NGOs, though it provided in-kind support; adequate victim services remained unavailable in many parts of the country. Foreign victims had access to the same services as Peruvian victims. Last year, Peruvian authorities identified 185 trafficking victims, 159 women and 26 menthough the number of victims in the country is thought to be much higherand provided 19 of these victims with legal, social, and psychological services. Some trafficking victims were not advised of their rights or provided with medical treatment, and some police officers released them without recognizing their victim status or referring them to shelters; some of these victims ended up returning to brothels in search of shelter and food. Lack of victim participation in the investigation or prosecution of traffickers remained a problem, in addition to the lack of a witness protection program. Some victims may not have pursued legal redress because they could not afford legal representation. The government did not penalize victims for unlawful acts committed as a direct result of being trafficked. Trafficking victims were eligible for temporary and permanent residency status under Peruvian refugee law, and at least 11 victims were granted such permanent residency. During the year, authorities assisted foreign trafficking victims with voluntary repatriation. Many of the countrys 412 labor inspectors have received training on forced labor; in 2009, the government created an elite team of five inspectors to address forced labor in the Amazon, but the team found their budget was insufficient to complete the mission.(PreventionThe Government of Peru sustained anti-trafficking prevention efforts. The government maintained an anti-trafficking campaign and operated and promoted a hotline for trafficking-related crimes and information, which received 44 reports of trafficking in 2009. The government continued to air anti-trafficking videos in transportation hubs, warning travelers of the legal consequences of engaging in trafficking activity or consuming services from trafficked persons. Although some areas of the country are known sex tourism destinations and Peruvian laws prohibit this practice, there were no reported convictions of child sex tourists. The government trained 710 government officials and tourism service providers about child sex tourism, conducted a public awareness campaign on the issue, and reached out to the tourism industry to raise awareness about child sex tourism; to date, 60 businesses have signed code of conduct agreements nationwide. No efforts to reduce demand for commercial sex acts or forced labor were reported. The government provided Peruvian peacekeepers with rights training prior to deployment.(In October 2011, almost 300 women and young girls were rescued from sexual exploitation in a raid in an Amazonian region of Peru known as a mining hub.(  )See also*rights in Peru* camel jockey* labour* laundering* woman* sexual exploitation of children* bondage* Exploitation* exploitation* labour* prostitution* immigration* ILO* Kidnapping* use of children* smuggling* and Organised Crime Group* Sharecropping* East Asia Court of Women on HIV and Human Trafficking* of childrenReferences
30172978
Coal_damp
#REDIRECT (mining)
30197179
The_Forgotten_Army
The Forgotten Army  is a Books original novel written by Brian Minchin and based on the long-running British science fiction television series Who. It featuring the Doctor and Amy.SynopsisA museum exhibition of a mammoth comes to life at the opening of its exhibition and rampages around the museum.The Doctor and Amy turn up in New York just in time to have a nice pony ride on mammoth and then the mammoth is taken to a zoo, where the Doctor and Amy visit it and relise that whatever is inside doesnt like humans and have been trapped in their mammoth-like space ship for centuries and are now ready to take the people of New York to a mining project in far space, the Doctor is kidnapped and Amy and the finder of the mammoth have to rescue the Doctor from the Vykoids, the policemen is attacked by the vykoids and realises how strong they are.The Doctor lures Amy to him with mind communication and then Amy saves him and the Vykoid leader starts his teleportation of the American people just when the first people are about to walk to the mining project the Doctor and Amy  turn up and trap the Vykoid leader in a pretsel doing so they defeat the Vykoids.The Doctor sends the Vykoids back to the mining project and demateriles int the TARDIS.A pretzel seller watches as the TARDIS demateriles and materilses, the Doctor comes out and gets 3 pretzels and tells the man that pretzels saved the day today.The Vykoid leader in in a spaceship and has only 2 words to say about how he got defeated:Amy Pond.See also*New Series Adventures Canonicity*WhoniverseReferencesExternal links
30222120
Nahe_Valley_Railway
{| |-| State:| Rhineland-Palatinate, Saarland|-5555Landsweiler-Reden|}|}The Nahe Valley Railway is a two-track, partially electrified main line railway in the states of Rhineland-Palatinate and Saarland. It was built by the Rhine-Nahe Railway Company and connects am Rhein on the Left Rhine line with Saarbrcken. It was opened between 1858 and 1860 and is one of the oldest railways in Germany. The section south of Kreuznach is part of the regionally important transport corridor between the two major cities of Mainz and Saarbrcken.HistoryIn 1839 there were plans to build a rail link between the Saar and the Rhine river, which could not be realised because of its high construction costs. In 1856 construction of the line was undertaken by the private Rhine-Nahe Railway Company (, RNE) set up for this purpose. It would connect the Nahe Valley and the surrounding area with the Left Rhine line of the Railway Company (Rheinischen Eisenbahn-Gesellschaft, RHE) and the Ludwig Railway (Hessische Ludwigsbahn) in Bingerbrck and would stimulate economic development and open up the market for Saar coal by connecting the Saarland railways with the Middle Rhine Valley. It was proposed that the line be privately financed with a government guarantee of a return of four percent. The Prussian government took control of the project on 18 June 1856 and issued the concession for the railways construction and operation to the company on 4 September 1856. Contracts were signed to allow the line to run through Meisenheim, part of Landgrave of Hesse-Homburg, and the of Birkenfeld, part of the Duchy of Oldenburg, allowing construction of the 120 km long line to begin in 1857.Construction of the line File:89-28-DB212-Staudernheim.jpg|thumb|left|DB local service hauled by diesel locomotive BR 212 062-4 near Staudernheim in 1986The first 16 km section from Bingerbrck (now Bingen Hauptbahnhof) to Bad Kreuznach went into operation on 15 July 1858. This was followed by the sections to Oberstein on 15 December 1859 and to Neunkirchen (Saar) via Birkenfeld (now Neubrcke) and St. Wendel on 26 May 1860, with a total length of 52 or 53 km. Even before the construction the line was finished, the Royal Railway Administration at Saarbrcken (Knigliche Eisenbahn-Direction zu Saarbrcken) took over its management and operation. The railway was considered a regional lifeline that would promote industrialisation in this agricultural area of the upper Blies Valley and the Nahe Valley, which was affected by high unemployment, rural exodus and emigration.In Neunkirchen there was a connection with the Royal Saarbrcken Railway. The line connected on the Rhine in Bingerbrck with the Left Rhine line opened by the Rhenish Railway Company on 17 October 1859. This was followed by a connection with the Hessian Ludwig Railway to Mainz on 15 December 1859. At the beginning of November 1861 this was followed by the opening of the train ferry, connecting to the Rhine Railway, opened in 1856 by the Wiesbaden Railway Company (Wiesbadener Eisenbahngesellschaft), which was nationalised in 1861 as the State Railway (Nassauische Staatsbahn).The 121 km long line of the Rhine-Nahe Railway Company was called by Arthur von Mayer the most expensive line in Germany; this was the result of its very difficult construction, which included a large number of tunnels, bridges, embankments and cuttings. The construction cost more than one million thalers per Prussian mile (7,532.5 metres), then a record sum.The revenue of the company after the start of operations was well short of expectations. Since the passenger traffic met the expectations of the builders only to the spas of Kreuznach and Mnster, neither dividends nor interest on debt could be paid. As a result, the Prussian government was obliged to step in to meet its annual interest rate guarantee. This also meant that the government was unable to sell the line to the Rhenish Railway after the War of 1866.The Birkenfeld station was five kilometres from the capital of the Principality of Birkenfeld. Therefore, the town and Degussa GmbH funded the construction of a railway from the town of Birkenfeld to Neubrcke. The original Birkenfeld was renamed Neubrcke station. RNE took over the management of the Railway and opened it on 5 October 1880.As the line formed part of a route to the French border, it was soon duplicated. The line was connected to the Bridge, which was built between am Rhein and Bingen-Kempten for strategic reasons. The bridge was built between 1913 and 1915 and destroyed in 1945. It connected a junction in Mnster-Sarmsheim on the Nahe Valley Railway with the Right Rhine line. Because of the great military importance of the line, the RNE was acquired by the Prussian government with effect of 1 April 1881 and the company was dissolved. From 1 July 1883 it was part of the Royal Railway Administration at Cologne, left Rhine (Kniglichen Eisenbahndirektion Kln, linksrheinisch) of the state railways.New tunnel Construction Coal was mined near the original Bildstock Tunnel (481 m) and a pillar of coal had to be left in place to support the foundations of the tunnel. The former Saargruben (later Saarbergwerke AG; today: DSK) mining company wanted to remove this to extend its mine. In 1955, therefore, the new Bildstock Tunnel (341 m) was built with an improved 600 m radius, bypassing the former tunnel.Accidents On 16 January 1918, the embankment between Kern and Hochstetten (Nahe) was washed away during a storm by the Nahe and subsided. This caused the derailment of leave train 243, causing the locomotive, van and three passenger carriages to plunge into the river. 38 people were killed and 25 wounded.Route Between Bad Kreuznach and Trkismhle the route runs primarily on the north side of the Nahe. The line crosses the Nahe twice in the four km section between Bad Kreuznach and Bad Mnster and eleven times between Bad Mnster and Idar-Oberstein. The line runs along the Blies between St. Wendel and Neunkirchen (Saar) Hbf.The Nahe Valley Railway runs largely parallel to federal highway 41 and their paths cross several times. The first crossing takes place north of Bad Kreuznach. The railway and highway run parallel from Sobernheim through the Nahe valley, until the road leaves the valley in the Idar-Oberstein district of Enzweiler. The railway and road also run parallel on a second, much shorter section between Neubrcke (Nahe) and Nohfelden.South of Namborn the railway line crosses the road again and the two run parallel with the course of the Blies between St. Wendel and Ottweiler. West of Neunkirchen, highway 41 crosses the line one last time. The line crosses the A 8 and A 623 autobahns on its way to Hauptbahnhof.Track upgrading The TrkismhleSaarbrcken Hauptbahnhof section has been electrified since 1969. The SaarbrckenSt. Wendel section was already electrically in 1968.The NeubrckeHeimbach section was operated on a single track for several months in 2007 to allow tunnel refurbishment works and to enlarge of the inner radius of the tunnel from four to five metres. Further work is being carried out on the line to allow it to be electrified.Operations 	File:Mainzer Hauptbahnhof- auf Bahnsteig zu Gleis 5- Richtung Worms (Hochsteg) (RB 928 472-0) 23.4.2009.JPG|thumb|left|Regionalbahn service operated with class 628  DMU in Hauptbahnhof on its way to St. WendelThe SaarbrckenTrkismhle section has long had a dense service. After the line was electrified, services were mainly operated with Silberling carriages hauled by class 140 and 141 electric locomotives. North of Trkismhle class VT 95 (795) and VT 98 (798) railbuses were often used.Express trains running between Saarbrcken, Idar-Oberstein, Bad Kreuznach, Bingen, Mainz and Frankfurt am Main were also mostly formed of Silberling carriages hauled by class 01 steam locomotives and later by class V200 and 218 diesel locomotives.Already in 1960 there were long-distance trains between Paris Gare de lEst and Frankfurt, which stopped only at Saarbrcken, Neunkirchen, St Wendel, Neubrcke, Heimbach, Idar-Oberstein, Kirn, Bad Sobernheim, Bad Mnster, Bad Kreuznach, Bingerbrck and Mainz.In 1985 the line was upgraded. The D 258/59 express from Paris Est to Frankfurt operated over the Valley Railway between Kaiserslautern and Bad Kreuznach, using French carriages and was hauled from Saarbrcken to Frankfurt by class 218 diesel locomotives. This was followed in 1988 by a pair of D-trains (expresses) on the SaarbrckenFrankfurtKasselGttingen route, which also ran over the Nahe Valley Railway. In 1990 these long distance services were discontinued.Today, there is continuous service of class 612 trains on the FrankfurtSaarbrcken route, run as the Rhine-Nahe-Express (RE3) Regional-Express service. Every second train runs to and from Frankfurt stops at the Airport Regional station.Regionalbahn line RB 73 services operate on the TrkismhleSaarbrcken section with class 425 and 426 multiple units. RB 33 services operate on the Trkismhle-Mainz section line with class 628 and 643 multiple units. References* * Weblinks ***de:NahetalbahnBingen / Gau Algesheim - Saarbrcken
30239551
Zeigler_Coal_Company
Zeigler Coal Company was a coal mining company based in Illinois. It was controlled by the Zeigler Coal Holding Company, which, in 1998, was purchased by AEI Resources. The company produced steam-grade coal, which it primarily sold to electric utilities. Railroad Operations The company had registered a mark, ZCCX, with the AAR. At least one piece of rolling stock, originally their NW2 switcher #2-22, remains in full Zeigler Coal Company Paint.
30249627
Human_trafficking_in_Guinea
Guinea is a source, transit, and to a lesser extent, a destination country for men, women, and children subjected to trafficking in persons, specifically forced labor and forced prostitution. The majority of victims are children, and these incidents of trafficking are more prevalent among Guinean citizens than among foreign migrants living in Guinea. Within the country, girls are largely subjected to involuntary domestic servitude and commercial sexual exploitation, while boys are subjected to forced begging and forced labor as street vendors, shoe shiners, and laborers in gold and diamond mines. Some Guinean men are also subjected to forced agricultural labor within Guinea. Smaller numbers of girls from Mali, Sierra Leone, Nigeria, Ghana, Liberia, Senegal, Burkina Faso, and Guinea-Bissau migrate to Guinea, where they are subjected to involuntary domestic servitude and likely also commercial sexual exploitation. Some Guinean boys and girls are subjected to forced labor in gold mining operations in Senegal, Mali, and possibly other African countries. Guinean women and girls are subjected to involuntary domestic servitude and forced prostitution in Nigeria, Cote dIvoire, Benin, Senegal, Greece, and Spain. Chinese women are trafficked to Guinea for commercial sexual exploitation by Chinese traffickers. Networks also traffic women from Nigeria, India, and Greece through Guinea to the Maghreb and onward to Europe, notably Italy, Ukraine, Switzerland, and France for forced prostitution and involuntary domestic servitude.(The Government of Guinea does not fully comply with the minimum standards for the elimination of trafficking; however, it is making significant efforts to do so, despite limited resources. The government sustained its efforts to investigate alleged trafficking crimes and detain suspected trafficking offenders during the reporting period. The junta, however, has made minimal progress toward combating human trafficking in Guinea since coming to power in a coup detat in December 2008. While Guinea has an adequate anti-trafficking legal framework, which it had strengthened by enacting the Child Code of 2008, the junta did not report any trafficking prosecutions or convictions for the second year in a row, and protection and prevention efforts remained weak. Therefore, Guinea is placed on Tier 2 Watch List for the third consecutive year. In February 2009, the head of government issued a declaration giving security forces the right to shoot anyone apprehended while trafficking a human being, raising significant human rights concerns. In the same month, the National Committee to Combat Human Trafficking met to evaluate the 2005-2006 National Action Plan and to outline an updated version for 20092011, but released no such document to the public. Many ministries claimed involvement in efforts to address trafficking, but the country was severely limited in its ability to address the problem due to budget constraints, capacity limitations, and unclear allocation of law enforcement and social welfare responsibilities.(Guinea. Trafficking in Persons Report 2010. Department of State (June 14, 2010). )ProsecutionThe Government of Guinea did not show progress in its anti-trafficking law enforcement efforts during the reporting period. Guinea prohibits all forms of trafficking in persons through separate statutes. The Child Code of 2008 includes provisions prohibiting all forms of child trafficking, specifically criminalizing child domestic servitude, and allowing NGOs to bring cases to court on behalf of victims. The government, in partnership with NGOs and international organizations, has yet to complete the implementing text for this law, which will prescribe penalties that allow the law to be enforced. Article 337 of the 1998 Penal Code prohibits individuals from entering into agreements that deprive third parties of their liberty, prescribing penalties of five to 10 years imprisonment and confiscation of any resulting profits. Forced prostitution and child prostitution are criminalized by Article 329 of Guineas Penal Code, which prescribes six months to two years imprisonment if the trafficked victim is an adult, and two to five years imprisonment if the victim is a child. These penalties for sex trafficking of adults are neither sufficiently stringent nor commensurate with penalties prescribed for other serious crimes, such as rape. The government did not prosecute any human trafficking cases during the reporting period, though the Ministry of Justice reported that there were 13 new cases that involved the arrest of at least 40 suspected trafficking offenders during 2009. Of the alleged traffickers, 30 remain in detention. Another 17 trafficking cases from the previous reporting period continue to await prosecution. The government provided only limited specialized training to its officials on the recognition, investigation, and prosecution of human trafficking, due to budget constraints.(ProtectionThe government demonstrated weak efforts to protect trafficking victims during the reporting period. The government reportedly referred an unknown number of potential victims to NGOs and international organizations for assistance, though government officials did not demonstrate use of systematic referral procedures or proactive measures to identify victims among vulnerable groups, such as foreign children at worksites. The Ministry of Social Affairs continued to provide assistance to a few hundred children, a small number of whom may be trafficking victims. The government did not offer shelter for trafficking victims, but frequently assisted victims by contacting local and international NGOs directly to coordinate shelter and family reunification cases. The government did not provide trafficking victims with access to legal, medical, or psychological services, and did not subsidize services provided by foreign or domestic NGOs. Foreign trafficking victims do not benefit from permanent residency status or relief from deportation. The government reported that 106 trafficked children were identified by various entities in 2009, but offered no additional data on these children. The government occasionally provided victims refuge in jails when no alternative was available. The government encouraged trafficking victims to assist in the investigation and prosecution of their traffickers, as long as the victim was at least 12 years of age. At the governments invitation, two such victims, one of whom was a child, separately discussed their cases on national television in April and June 2009, though their traffickers had not been brought to justice; this raises concerns for the security and well-being of the victims.(PreventionThe Government of Guinea demonstrated minimal efforts to conduct anti-trafficking or educational campaigns during the reporting period. The head of the junta, however, gave several speeches highlighting the importance of combating human trafficking. The government did not monitor immigration or emigration patterns for evidence of trafficking. The government did not take steps to reduce the demand for commercial sex acts.(References
30269844
Aalto_University_School_of_Science
Aalto University School of Science (, ) is one of the four new schools of technology established from the former Aalto University School of Science and Technology on 1 January 2011. The new schools continue to offer first-rate education and research that promotes advances in science and technology.The key asset of the School of Science (Aalto SCI) is its high-quality research. The school is home to seven Centres of Excellence in Research selected by the Academy of Finland and in a recent review of research, had nine of the top 18 departments in Aalto University including the top five. Aalto University School of Science consists of seven departments and three separate institutes. The School offers studies in Computer Science and Engineering, Industrial Engineering and Management, Information Networks and Engineering Physics and Mathematics and has currently 14 Masters programmes as well as doctoral programme available in English.Organization and unitsThe School of Science and its units are located in various facilities on the Otaniemi campus, Espoo.Departments* Department of Applied Physics http://tfy.tkk.fi/* Department of Biomedical Engineering and Computational Science http://becs.tkk.fi/en/* Department of Computer Science and Engineering http://cse.aalto.fi/* Department of Industrial Engineering and Management http://tuta.tkk.fi/en/* Department of Information and Computer Science http://ics.tkk.fi/en/* Department of Mathematics and Systems Analysis http://math.tkk.fi/en/* Department of Media Technology http://media.tkk.fi/en/ Separate institutes *Low Temperature Laboratory*Helsinki Institute for Information Technology*Language Centre http://kielikeskus.tkk.fi/en/In addition, the School is home to EIT ICT Labs Helsinki node. Centres of Excellence Aalto University School of Science is home to seven Centres of Excellence in Research funded by the Academy of Finland. In two of them, the School cooperates with other universities.* Centre of Excellence in Adaptive Informatics Research http://www.cis.hut.fi/research/* Centre of Excellence in Computational Complex Systems Research http://www.lce.hut.fi/* Centre of Excellence in Computational Nanoscience COMP http://tfy.tkk.fi/comp/* Centre of Excellence in Low Temperature Quantum Phenomena and Devices http://ltl.tkk.fi/wiki/LT/CoE* Centre of Excellence in Systems Neuroscience and Neuroimaging http://ltl.tkk.fi/wiki/BRU/CoE_Intro* Centre of Excellence in Algoritmic Data Analysis Research http://www.cs.helsinki.fi/research/algodan/, together with University of Helsinki* Centre of Excellence in Inverse Problems http://wiki.helsinki.fi/display/inverse/Home, together with University of Helsinki, University of Kuopio, University of Oulu and Lappeenranta University of TechnologyMasters programmes and doctoral studiesThe School offers currently ten Masters programmes in English, two of them Erasmus Mundus programmes, with four new programmes starting in 2012. In addition, the School participates in cross-disciplinary Degree Programme in International Design Business Management http://idbm.aalto.fi/.  * Masters Programme in Bioinformatics https://into.aalto.fi/display/enmbi/Homepage* Masters Programme in Foundations of Advanced Computing https://into.aalto.fi/display/enfadco/Homepage* Masters Programme in Machine Learning and Data Mining https://into.aalto.fi/display/enmac/Homepage* Masters Programme in Mobile Computing - Services and Security https://into.aalto.fi/display/enmob/Homepage* Masters Programme in Service Design and Engineering https://into.aalto.fi/display/ensde/Homepage* Masters Programme in Service Management and Engineering https://into.aalto.fi/display/ensem/Homepage* Masters Programme in Strategy https://into.aalto.fi/display/enstrat/Homepage* Masters Programme in ICT Innovation (EIT ICT Labs Master School), starting in 2012* Masters Programme in Physics of Advanced Materials, starting in 2012* Masters Programme in Applied and Engineering Mathematics (N5Tech programme), starting 2012* Masters Degree Programme in Brain and Mind, starting 2012 Erasmus Mundus programmes  * NordSecMob - Masters Degree Programme in Security and Mobile Computing http://nordsecmob.tkk.fi/index.html* euSYSBIO - Masters Degree Programme in Computational and Systems Biology https://into.aalto.fi/display/enesb/Homepage Doctoral programme The goal of the Doctoral Programme of School of Science https://into.aalto.fi/display/endoctoralsci/ is to train doctors in physics, Nanomedicine, mathematics, computer science and industrial engineering. The 39 research fields offered by the Doctoral Programme are arrayed around the Schools strong research traditions. perustieteiden korkeakoulu
30282618
Lancashire_bagpipe
The Lancashire bagpipe or Lancashire greatpipe has been attested in literature, and commentators have noticed that the Lacanshire bagpipe was also believed proof against witchcraft.(Transactions, Volume 56North of England Institute of Mining and Mechanical Engineers, 1908. Pg cviii)Historical attestation*Behns Sir Patient Fancy (1678) mentions:  Not so joyful neither Sir, when you shall know Poor  Gillian s dead, My little gray Mare, thou knewst her mun, Zoz thas made me as Melancholy as the Drone of a Lancashire Bagpipe(Behn, Aphra. Sir Patient Fancy.)*Thoresby, a topographer, wrote in 1702:  got little rest, the music and Lancashire bagpipes having continued the whole night.( cited in Francis M. Colinson The Bagpipes: The History of a Musical Instrument. Routledge Kegan & Paul (October 1975))Further reading*The Bagpipe in Northern England. R. D. Cannon. Folk Music Journal, Vol. 2, No. 2 (1971), pp. 127-147*James Merryweather Regional Bagipes: History or Bunk?References
30295840
New_Manchester
thumb|right|Chapel at New ManchesterNew Manchester or  The City was an isolated mining village on the Coalfield north of Common in the Tyldesley township. It lies west of a boundary stone at Ellenbrook which marks the ancient boundary of the Hundreds of Salford and West Derby, the boundary of Eccles and Leigh parishes, Tyldesley, Worsley and Hulton townships and the metropolitan districts of Wigan and Salford.() The route of the Roman road from Manchester to Wigan and the Loopline passed south of the village. The and Yorkshire Railways Manchester to Southport line passed to the north.HistoryCoal was got in New Manchester where the coal seams of the Manchester Coalfield outcrop and are not far below the surface.The community was in existence by 1803 in houses provided by the Duke of Bridgewater who owned the mining rights. The men who came to work in the pits named the streets after places in their hometown, Manchester, Shude Hill, Gatley Row and City Road, the only road ito the village.(In the 1830s Shude Hill Pit had a steam winding engine. City Pit and Gatley Pit were in operation by 1838 linked to the Navigable Levels and a a horse-drawn tramroad to Mathers Fold.() These pits worked the mine (coal seam) at 262 feet and the mine at 360 feet and employed 64 workers in 1852. They closed in 1877. The area has been opencasted.()ReferencesBibliography**See also*of Collieries in Astley and Tyldesley
30312722
List_of_United_States_federal_legislation,_17891901
This is a chronological, but incomplete, list of notable United States federal legislation passed by the 1st through 56th United States Congresses, between 1789 and 1901.  For the main article on this subject, see of United States federal legislation.  Additional lists can be found at List of United States federal legislation: Congress of the Confederation, of United States federal legislation, 19012001 and of United States federal legislation, 2001present.1789 to 1801United States Congress* June 1, 1789: act to regulate the time and manner of administering certain oaths, Sess. 1, ch. 1, * July 4, 1789: Tariff, Sess. 1, ch. 2, * September 24, 1789: Act of 1789, Sess. 1, ch. 20, * March 1, 1790: Census of 1790, Sess. 2, ch. 2, * March 26, 1790: Act of 1790, Sess. 2, ch. 3, * April 10, 1790: Patent Act, Sess. 2, ch. 7, * May 26, 1790: Ordinance, Sess. 2, ch. 14, * May 31, 1790: Act of 1790, Sess. 2, ch. 15, * July 6, 1790: Act, Sess. 2, ch. 28, * July 22, 1790: Indian Intercourse Act of 1790, Sess. 2, ch. 33, * February 25, 1791: Bank of the United States, Sess. 3, ch. 10, * March 3, 1791: Act, Sess. 3, ch. 15, United States Congress* February 20, 1792: Service Act, Sess. 1, ch. 7, * April 2, 1792: Act of 1792, Sess. 1, ch. 16, * May 2, 1792: First Act of 1792, Sess. 1, ch. 28, * May 8, 1792: Second Act of 1792, Sess. 1, ch. 33, * February 12, 1793: Slave Law of 1793, Sess. 2, ch. 7, * March 2, 1793: Act of 1793, Sess. 2, ch. 22,  (including Act)United States Congress* March 27, 1794: Act of 1794, Sess. 1, ch. 12, * January 29, 1795: Act of 1795, Sess. 2, ch. 20, United States CongressUnited States Congress* April 30, 1798: The Department of the Navy was established, Sess. 2, ch. 35, * June 18, 1798: and Sedition Acts: An Act to establish a uniform rule of naturalization (Act of 1798), Sess. 2, ch. 54, * June 25, 1798: and Sedition Acts: An Act concerning Aliens, Sess. 2, ch. 58, * July 6, 1798: and Sedition Acts: An Act respecting Alien Enemies, Sess. 2, ch. 66, * July 9, 1798: Further to Protect the Commerce of the United States, Sess. 2, ch. 68, * July 11, 1798: The Corps was established, Sess. 2, ch. 72, * July 14, 1798: and Sedition Acts: An Act for the punishment of certain crimes against the United States (Sedition Act), Sess. 2, ch. 74, United States Congress* February 13, 1801: Act of 1801, Sess. 2, ch. 4, * February 27, 1801: of Columbia Organic Act of 1801, Sess.2, ch. 15, 1801 to 1811United States Congress* April 29, 1802: Act of 1802, Sess. 1, ch. 31, * April 30, 1802: Act of 1802, Sess. 1, ch. 40, United States CongressUnited States Congress* March 29, 1806: Road, Sess. 1, ch. 19, * March 2, 1807: Trade Prohibition Act, Sess. 2, ch. 22, United States Congress* December 22, 1807: Act of 1807, Sess. 1, ch. 5, * March 1, 1809: Act, Sess. 2, ch. 24, United States Congress* May 1, 1810: Bill Number 2, Sess. 2, ch. 39, 1811 to 1821United States CongressUnited States CongressUnited States Congress* April 10, 1816: Bank of the United States, Sess. 1, ch. 94, * April 27, 1816: tariff, Sess. 1, ch. 107, United States Congress* April 4, 1818: Flag Act of 1818, Sess. 1, ch. 34, * April 18, 1818: Act of 1818, Sess. 1, ch. 70, United States Congress* March 6, 1820: Compromise, Sess. 1, ch. 22, * April 24, 1820: Act of 1820, Sess. 1, ch. 51, 1821 to 1831United States CongressUnited States Congress* January 7, 1824: of 1824, Sess. 1, ch.4, United States CongressUnited States Congress* May 24, 1828: of Abominations, Sess. 1, ch. 111, United States Congress* May 28, 1830: Removal Act, Sess. 1, ch. 148, 1831 to 1841United States Congress* July 14, 1832: of 1832, Sess. 1, ch. 227, * March 2, 1833: Tariff (Tariff of 1833), Sess. 2, ch. 55, * March 2, 1833: Bill, Sess. 2, ch. 57, United States CongressUnited States CongressUnited States CongressUnited States Congress1841 to 1851United States Congress * April 19, 1841: Act of 1841, ch. 9, * September 4, 1841: Act of 1841, ch. 16, * August 4, 1842: Occupation Act, * August 30, 1842: of 1842 (Black Tariff), ch. 270, United States Congress* January 23, 1845: Election Day Act, ch. 1, * March 3, 1845: act relating to revenue cutters and steamers, ch. 78, United States Congress* July 9, 1846: of Columbia retrocession, ch. 35, * July 30, 1846: tariff, Sess. 1, ch. 74, United States Congress* March 3, 1849: Act of 1849, ch. 109, United States Congress* September 9, 1850: of 1850, ch. 49, * September 18, 1850: Slave Act, ch. 60, * September 29, 1850: Land Claim Act, ch. 76, 1851 to 1861United States CongressUnited States Congress* May 30, 1854: Act, ch. 59, United States Congress* August 18, 1856: Islands Act, ch. 164, United States CongressUnited States Congress* March 2, 1861: tariff, ch. 68, 1861 to 1871United States CongressUnited States Congress* April 22, 1864: Act of 1864, Sess. 1, ch. 66, * March 3, 1865: Bureau, Sess. 2, ch. 90, United States Congress* April 9, 1866: Rights Act of 1866, ch. 31, * July 23, 1866: Circuits Act, ch. 210, * March 2, 1867: Act, ch. 153, * March 2, 1867: Tenure of Office Act, ch. 154, United States Congress*Acts, continued:** March 23, 1867, ch. 6, ** July 19, 1867, ch. 30, ** March 11, 1868, ch. 25, United States Congress* April 10, 1869: Act of 1869 (Circuit Judges Act of 1869), ch. 22, * May 31, 1870: Act of 1870, ch. 114, * July 14, 1870: Act of 1870, ch. 254, * February 21, 1871: of Columbia Organic Act of 1871, ch. 62, 1871 to 1881United States Congress* April 20, 1871: Klux Act (Civil Rights Act of 1871, Ku Klux Klan Act), ch. 22, * March 1, 1872: Act, ch. 24, * May 10, 1872: Mining Act of 1872, ch. 152, , R.S. 23192328, 2331, 23332338, 2344* May 22, 1872: Act, ch. 193, * June 1, 1872: Conformity Act (precursor to the Enabling Act), ch. 255, * February 12, 1873: Act of 1873, ch. 131, * March 3, 1873: Act, ch. 258, * March 3, 1873: Culture Act, ch. 277, United States Congress* June 23, 1874: Act, ch. 469, * January 14, 1875: Payment Resumption Act, ch. 15, * March 1, 1875: Rights Act of 1875, * March 3, 1875: Act of 1875, ch. 141, United States Congress* March 3, 1877:  Land ActUnited States Congress* February 28, 1878: Act (Coinage Act (Silver Dollar)), Sess. 2, ch. 20, * April 29, 1878: Quarantine Act, Sess. 2, ch. 66, * June 3, 1878: and Stone Act, Sess. 2, ch. 151, * June 18, 1878: Comitatus Act, Sess. 2, ch. 263, 15, United States Congress 1881 to 1891 United States Congress* May 6, 1882: Chinese Exclusion Act, * January 16, 1883: Civil Service Reform Act, ch. 27, United States CongressUnited States Congress* February 4, 1887: Commerce Act, ch. 104, * February 8, 1887: General Allotment Act (Dawes Act), ch. 119, * March 2, 1887: Act of 1887, ch. 314, * March 3, 1887: Act, ch. 359, * March 3, 1887: Act, ch. 397 United States Congress* February 22, 1889: Act of 1889, Sess. 2, ch. 180, United States Congress* June 27, 1890: Pension Act* July 2, 1890: Antitrust Act, ch. 647, * July 14, 1890: Silver Purchase Act, ch. 708, * August 30, 1890: Land-Grant Colleges Act* October 1, 1890: Tariff, ch. 1244, * March 3, 1891: Reserve Act of 1891* March 3, 1891: Revision Act of 1891* March 3, 1891: Act of 1891* March 3, 1891: Marine Act of 18911891 to 1901 United States Congress * May 5, 1892: Act, ch. 60,  (amended the Exclusion Act)United States Congress* August 27, 1894: Tariff Act, ch. 349, 73, * February 18, 1895: Act of 1895, United States CongressUnited States Congress* July 24, 1897: Dingley tariff, ch. 11,  (amended the Tariff Act)* July 1, 1898: Act of 1898, ch. 541, * July 7, 1898: Resolution, No. 55, * March 3, 1899: and Harbors Act of 1899, ch. 425, , Sec. 9, United States Congress* March 14, 1900: Standard Act, Sess. 1, ch. 41, * April 2, 1900: Act, Sess. 1, ch. 191,  (Puerto Rico Civil Code)
30336440
Peru_Support_Group
The Peru Support Group (PSG) was established in 1983 to raise awareness of human rights violations committed during Perus internal armed conflict. It is a UK-based advocacy organisation with a fee-paying membership of approximately 500 people. Lord Avebury (Lubbock) has served as PSG president since 2002 and a number of British MPs including Clwyd and Hughes are sponsors. Other notable sponsors of the organisation included renowned British writers Pinter and Greene. The organisation today campaigns on a wide range of issues including: human rights, indigenous rights, democratic governance and sustainable development, particularly with reference to extractive industries.Publications*Bebbington, A.J, M. Connarty, W. Coxshall, H. OShaugnessy, M. Williams. 2007. Mining and development in Peru, with special reference to the Rio Blanco Project, Piura.  London. Peru Support Group. Translated and published in Peru as: Bebbington, A.J, M. Connarty, W. Coxshall, H.OShaugnessy, M. Williams. Minera y Desarrollo en Per con especial referencia al Proyecto Ro Blanco, Piura.  Lima. Instituto de Estudios Peruanos/CIPCA/Oxfam International/Peru Support Group.External links
30364727
Angola_(Portugal)
Angola (also Portuguese West Africa, Portuguese Angola; since 1951 Overseas Province of Angola and finally State of Angola, since 1972) is the common name by which the Portuguese colony in southwestern Africa was known across different periods of time. The former colony became an independent country in 1975 and now forms the Republic of Angola. History The colonial history of Angola lasted from the foundation of a Portuguese settlement in what today is Luanda, in 1575, until the decolonization of the territory in 1975. During these four centuries, several entirely different situations have to be distinguished.Image:Queen Nzinga 1657.png|thumb|left|Nzinga in peace negotiations with the Portuguese governor in Luanda, 1657.When a Portuguese explorer reached the Kingdom at the end of the 15th century, Angola as such did not exist; on its present territory, a number of independent peoples were living, some of them organized in political units (kingdoms) of variable size. At first, territorial conquest was out of the question for the Portuguese; they were interested in trade, mainly slave trade. They thus maintained a peaceful and mutually profitable relationship with the rulers and dominant social segment of the Kongo Kingdom, whom they cristianized and taught reading and writing in Portuguese,  allowing them a share of the benefits from the slave trade. They established small trading posts on the lower Kongo River, which now belongs to the Republic of the Congo, and a more importante trading settlement on the Atlantic coast, at Soyo which then belonged to the Kongo Kingdom and is today Angolas nothernmost town. From 1580 to the 1820s, well over a million people from current-day Angola were exported as slaves to the so-called World, mainly to Brazil which demanded the most part of black African slaves from Angola, but also to North America where slaves were also usual workforce supply.(http://news.bbc.co.uk.go/pr/fr/-/2/hi/africa/country_profiles/1839749, British Broadcasting Company, January 2008.BBC News) of Portugal sailors, explorers, soldiers and merchants had historically began a process of conquest and establishment of military and trading outposts in Africa with the conquest of Muslim-ruled Ceuta in 1415 and the establishment of bases in current-day Morocco and the of Guinea. The Portuguese had catholic beliefs and their exploratory and military expeditions included from the very beginning evangelization and sometimes conversion of foreign peoples. Local African societies were varied, mostly relying on agriculture and trade. Those societies included centuries long practices such as slavery among black peoples, local traditional animist beliefs and practices, and a multiplicity of ethnicities, political and social organizations which varied from region to region. One of the most powerful societies in the region was that of the Kingdom.Portugal defeated the Kongo Kingdom in the of Mbwila on October 29, 1665, but suffered a disastrous defeat at the of Kitombo when they tried to invade Kongo in 1670. Full Portuguese administrative control of the interior was not achieved until the beginning of the 20th century. However, the coastal regions, including fortified Portuguese towns like those of Luanda (established in 1575 with 400 Portuguese settlers) and Benguela (a fort from 1587, a town from 1617) remained almost continuously in Portuguese hands until the independence of Angola in 1975.In 1884 Britain, which up to that time had not acknowledged that Portugal possessed territorial rights north of Ambriz, concluded a treaty recognizing Portuguese sovereignty over both banks of the lower Congo, but the treaty, meeting with opposition there and Germany, was not ratified. Agreements concluded with the Free State, the Empire and France in 1885-1886 fixed the limits of the province, except in the south-east, where the frontier between Barotseland (north-west Rhodesia) and Angola was determined by an Anglo-Portuguese agreement of 1891 and the arbitration award of the of Italy in 1905.During the Portugueses colonial rule of Angola, cities, towns and villages were founded, railroads were opened, ports built, and a truly Westernized society was being gradually developed, despite the fact of a deep traditional tribal heritage in Angola which the minority European rulers were neither able nor interested to eradicate. Since the 1920s, Portugals administration showed an increasing interest in developing Angolas economy and social infrustructure.(http://find.galegroup.com.offcampus.lib.washington.edu/itx/start.do?proIdEAIM More Power to the People, 2006.)In 1951, the Portuguese Colony of Angola became an Overseas Province of Portugal. In the late 1950s the Peoples Movement for the Liberation of Angola (MPLA) began to organize strategies and action plans to fight Portuguese rule as well as the remunerated labor system which affected many of the native black people from the countryside that were relocated from their homes and had to perform compulsory work, almost always unskilled hard work, in an environment of boom.( Organized warfare began in 1961, the same year that a law was passed to end every sort of forced labor. The conflict, conversibly known as the Colonial War or the War of Liberation, erupted in the north of the territory when UPA rebels based in Republic of the Congo, massacred civilians in surprise attacks. The military effective in Angola were composed by about 2,200 men (1,000 white and 1,200 black). After these events the Government under the dictatorial Estado Novo regime of de Oliveira Salazar, sent thousands of troops from Europe in order to perform counterterrorism and counterinsurgency operations, but, despite an overall military superiority of the Portuguese Army in the Angolan theatre, the independence guerrilla movements were never eradicated. In 1972, the Portuguese National Assembly changed Angolas status from an overseas province to an autonomous state with authority over internal affairs; Portugal was to retain responsibility for defense and foreign relations. In April 1974, the Portuguese government was overthrown in a military uprising in Lisbon. In May of that year the new revolutionary government of Portugal proclaimed a truce with the guerrillas in an effort to promote peace talks and independence.(Angola, History, The Columbia Electronic Encyclopedia, 6th ed. Copyright  2007, Columbia University Press)These events prompted a mass exodus of Portuguese citizens, both black and white, from Portugals African territories, creating over a million destitute Portuguese refugees  the retornados.(Dismantling the Portuguese Empire, Magazine (Monday, July 07, 1975)) Angola gained its independence on 11 November 1975. Government In the 20th century, Portuguese Angola was subject to the Estado Novo regime. In 1951, the Portuguese authorities changed the statute of the territory from Colony to an Overseas Province of Portugal. Legally, the territory was as much a part of Portugal as Lisbon but as an overseas province enjoyed special derogations to account for its distance from Europe. Most members of the government of Angola were from Portugal, but a few were Africans. Nearly all members of the bureaucracy were from Portugal, as most Africans did not have the necessary qualifications to obtain positions.The government of Angola, as it was in Portugal, was highly centralized. Power was concentrated in the executive branch, and all elections where they occurred were carried out using indirect methods. From the Prime Ministers office in Lisbon, authority extended down to the most remote posts of Angola through a rigid chain of command. The authority of the government of Angola was residual, primarily limited to implementing policies already decided in Europe. In 1967, Angola also sent a number of delegates to the National Assembly in Lisbon.The highest official in the province was the governor-general, appointed by the Portuguese cabinet on recommendation of the Overseas Minister. The governor-general had both executive and legislative authority. A Government Council advised the governor-general in the running of the province. The functional cabinet consisted of five secretaries appointed by the Overseas Minister on the advice of the governor. A Legislative Council had limited powers and its main activity was approving the provincial budget. Finally, an Economic and Social Council had to be consulted on all draft legislation, and the governor-general had to justify his decision to Lisbon if he ignored its advice.In 1972, the Portuguese National Assembly changed Angolas status from an overseas province to an autonomous state with authority over internal affairs; Portugal was to retain responsibility for defense and foreign relations. Elections were held in Angola for a legislative assembly in 1973.(GeographyPortuguese Angola was a territory covering 1,246,700 km, an area greater than France and Spain put together. It had 5,198 km of terrestrial borders and a coastline with 1,600 km. Its geography was diverse. From the coastal plain, ranging in width from 25 kilometres in the south to 100-200 kilometers in the north, the land rises in stages towards the high inland plateau covering almost two-thirds of the country, with an average altitude of between 1,200 and 1,600 metres. Angolas two highest peaks were located in these central highlands. They were Mountain (2,620 m) and Mountain (2,538 m).Most of Angolas rivers rose in the central mountains. Of the many rivers that drain to the Atlantic Ocean, the Cuanza and Cunene were the most important. Other major streams included the River, which drains north to the River system, and the Kwando and Rivers, both of which drain generally southeast to the Delta. As the land drops from the plateau, many rapids and waterfalls plunge downward in the rivers. Portuguese Angola had no sizable lakes, besides those formed by dams and reservoirs built by the Portuguese administration.The Portuguese authorities established several national parks and natural reserves across the territory: Bicauri, Cameia, Cangandala, Iona, Mupa, Namibe and Quiama. Iona was Angolas oldest and largest national park, it was proclaimed as a reserve in 1937 and upgraded to a national park in 1964.Angola was indeed a territory that underwent a great deal of progress after 1950. The Portuguese government built dams, roads, schools, etc. There was also an economic boom that led to a huge increase of the European population. The white population increased from 44,083 in 1940 to 172,529 in 1960. With around 1,000 immigrants arriving each month. On the eve of the end of the colonial period, the ethnic European residents numbered 400,000 (1974) (excluding enlisted and commissioned soldiers from the mainland) and the mixed race population was at around 100,000 (many were Verdian migrants working in the territory). The total population was around 5.9 million at that time.Luanda grew from a town of 61,208 with 14.6% of those inhabitants being white in 1940, to a major cosmopolitan city of 475,328 in 1970 with 124,814 Europeans (26.3%) and around 50,000 mixed race inhabitants. Most of the other large cities in Angola had around the same ratio of Europeans at the time, with the exception of S da Bandeira (Lubango), Momedes (Namibe) and Porto Alexandre (Tombua) in the south where the white population was more established. All of these cities had European majorities from 50% to 60%.The capital of the territory was Luanda,(Angola antes da Guerra, a film of Luanda, Portuguese Angola (before 1975), youtube.com)(LuandaAnosOuro.wmv, a film of Luanda, Portuguese Angola (before 1975), youtube.com) officially called So Paulo de Luanda. Other cities and towns were:300px|thumb|Topographic map of Angola.*Porto Amboim*Vila Teixeira da Silva*So Felipe de Benguela(BenguelaAnosOuro.wmv, a film of Benguela, Overseas Province of Angola, before 1975.)*Vila Robert Williams*Duque de Bragana*Vila General Machado*Vila Joo de Almeida*Vila Mariano Machado*Nova Lisboa(NovaLisboaAnosOuro.wmv, a film of Nova Lisboa, Overseas Province of Angola, before 1975.)*Silva Porto*Vila da Ponte*Lobito(LobitoAnosOuro.wmv, a film of the Lobito in Portuguese Angola, before independence from Portugal.)*S da Bandeira(SDaBandeiraAnosOuro.wmv, a film of S da Bandeira, Overseas Province of Angola, before 1975.)*Vila Luso*Malanje(MalanjeAnosOuro.wmv, a film of Malanje, Overseas Province of Angola (before 1975).)*Forte Repblica*So Salvador do Congo*Serpa Pinto*Momedes( Angola de outros tempos Moamedes, Momedes under Portuguese rule before 1975, youtube.com)*Vila Salazar*Vila Pereira dEa*Vila Henrique de Carvalho*Santo Antnio do Zaire*Novo Redondo*Porto Alexandre*Carmona(Angola-Carmona (Viagem ao Passado)-Kandando Angola, a film of Carmona, Portuguese Angola (before 1975).)The exclave of Cabinda was to the north.(CabindaAnosOuro.wmv, a film of Cabinda, Portuguese Angola (before 1975).)EconomyPortuguese explorers and settlers had founded trading posts and forts along the coast of Africa since the 15th century, and reached the Angolan coast in the 16th century. Portuguese explorer Dias de Novais founded Luanda in 1575 as So Paulo de Loanda, and the region developed as a slave trade market with the help of local Imbangala and Mbundu peoples who were notable slave hunters. Trade was mostly with the Portuguese of Brazil in the so called World; Brazilian ships were the most numerous in the ports of Luanda and Benguela. By this time, Angola, a Portuguese colony, was in fact like a colony of Brazil, another Portuguese colony. A strong Brazilian influence was also exercised by the Jesuits in religion and education.(History of Angola, Republic of Angola Embassy in the United Kingdom)War gradually gave way to the philosophy of trade. The great trade routes and the agreements that made them possible were the driving force for activities between the different areas; warlike states become states ready to produce and to sell. In the Planalto (the high plains), the most important states were those of Bi and Bailundo, the latter being noted for its production of foodstuffs and rubber. The colonial power, Portugal, becoming ever richer and more powerful, would not tolerate the growth of these neighbouring states and subjugated them one by one, so that by the beginning of this century the Portuguese had complete control over the entire area. During the period of the Union (1580-1640), Portugal lost influence and power and made new enemies. The Dutch, a major enemy of Castile, invaded many Portuguese overseas possessions, including Luanda. The Dutch ruled Luanda from 1640 to 1648 as Fort Aardenburgh. They were seeking black slaves for use in sugarcane plantations of Northeastern Brazil (Pernambuco, Olinda, Recife) which they had also seized from Portugal. Maurice, Prince of Nassau-Siegen, conquered the Portuguese possessions of Saint George del Mina, Saint Thomas, and Luanda, Angola, on the west coast of Africa. After the dissolution of the Iberian Union in 1640, Portugal reestablished its authority over the lost territories of the Empire.(The Portuguese started to develop townships, trading posts, logging camps and small processing factories. From 1764 onwards, there was a gradual change from a slave-based society to one based on production for domestic consumption and export. Meanwhile, with the of Brazil in 1822, the slave trade was abolished in 1836, and in 1844 Angolas ports were opened to foreign shipping. By 1850, Luanda was one of the greatest and most developed Portuguese cities in the vast Portuguese Empire outside Portugal, full of trading companies, exporting (together with Benguela) palm and peanut oil, wax, copal, timber, ivory, cotton, coffee, and cocoa, among many other products. Maize, tobacco, dried meat and cassava flour also began to be produced locally. The Angolan bourgeoisie was born. From the 1920s to the 1960s, strong economic growth, abundant natural resources and development of infrastruture, led to the arrival of even more Portuguese settlers from the metropole.(Diamond mining began in 1912, when the first gems were discovered by Portuguese prospectors in a stream of the region, in the northeast. In 1917 Diamang was granted the concession for diamond mining and prospecting in Portuguese Angola. From the mid-1950s until 1974, ore was mined in Malanje, Bi, Huambo, and Hula provinces, and production reached an average of 5.7 million tons per year between 1970 and 1974. Most of the iron ore was shipped to Japan, Germany, and the Kingdom, and earned almost US$50 million a year in export revenue. During 1966-67 a major iron ore terminal was built by the Portuguese at Saco, the bay just 12 km North of Momedes (Namibe). The client was the Compania Mineira do Lobito, the Lobito Mining Company, which developed an iron ore mine inland at Cassinga. The construction of the mine installations and a 300 km railway were commissioned to Krupp of Germany and the modern harbour terminal to SETH, a Portuguese company owned by Hojgaard & Schultz of Denmark. The small fishing town of Momedes hosted construction workers, foreign engineers and their families for 2 years. The Ore Terminal was completed on time within one year and the first 250,000 ton ore carrier docked and loaded with ore in 1967.( Angola - Momedes, minha terra, eu te vi crescer... (Raul Ferreira Trindade), history of Momedes/Namibe)( Angola de outros tempos Moamedes, Momedes under Portuguese rule before 1975, youtube.com) The Portuguese discovered petroleum in Angola in 1955. Production began in the basin in the 1950s, in the basin in the 1960s, and in the exclave of Cabinda in 1968. The government granted operating rights for Block Zero to the Cabinda Gulf Oil Company, a subsidiary of ChevronTexaco, in 1955. Oil production surpassed the exportation of coffee as Angolas largest export in 1973.By the early 1970s, a variety of crops and livestock were produced in Portuguese Angola. In the north, cassava, coffee, and cotton were grown; in the central highlands, maize was cultivated; and in the south, where rainfall is lowest, herding was prevalent. In addition, there were large plantations run by Portuguese that produced oil, sugarcane, bananas, and sisal. These crops were grown by commercial farmers, primarily Portuguese, and by peasant farmers, who sold some of their surplus to local Portuguese traders in exchange for supplies. The commercial farmers were dominant in marketing these crops, however, and enjoyed substantial support from the overseas provinces Portuguese government in the form of technical assistance, irrigation facilities, and financial credit. They produced the great majority of the crops that were marketed in Angolas urban centres or exported for several countries.(Louise Redvers, POVERTY-ANGOLA: NGOs Sceptical of Govts Rural Development Plans, Press Service News Agency (June 6, 2009))Fishing in Portuguese Angola was a major and growing industry. In the early 1970s, there were about 700 boats, and the annual catch was more than 300,000 tons. Including the catch of foreign fishing fleets in Angolan waters, the combined annual catch was estimated at over 1 million tons. The Portuguese territory of Angola was a net exporter of fish products, and the ports of Momedes, Luanda and Benguela were among the most important fishing harbous in the region.EducationNon-urban black African access to educational opportunities was very limited for most of the colonial period, most were not even able to speak Portuguese and did not have knowledge of culture and history.(Warner, Rachel. Conditions before Independence. A Country Study: Angola (Thomas Collelo, editor). of Congress Research Division (February 1989). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the public domain.http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/about.html) Until the 1950s, educational facilities run by the Portuguese colonial government were largely restricted to the urban areas.( Responsibility for educating rural Africans were commissioned by the authorities to several Roman Catholic and Protestant missions based across the vast countryside, which taught black Africans in Portuguese language and culture.( As a consequence, each of the missions established its own school system, although all were subject to ultimate control and support by the Portuguese.(In mainland Portugal, the homeland of the colonial authorities who ruled in the territory from the 16th century until 1975, by the end of the 19th century the illiteracy rates were at over 80 percent and higher education was reserved for a small percentage of the population. 68.1 percent of mainland Portugals population was still classified as illiterate by the 1930 census. Mainland Portugals literacy rate by the 1940s and early 1950s was low by American and European standards at the time. Only in the 1960s did the country make public education available for all children between the ages of six and twelve, and the overseas territories profited from this new educational developments and change in policy at Lisbon.Starting in the early 1950s, the access to basic, secondary and technical education was expanded and its availability was being increasingly opened to both the African indigenes and the ethnic Portuguese of the territories. Education beyond the primary level became available to an increasing number of black Africans since the 1950s, and the proportion of the age group that went on to school in the early 1970s was an all-time record high enrolment.( Primary school attendance was also growing substantially.( In general, the quality of teaching at the primary level was acceptable, even with instruction carried on largely by black Africans who sometimes had substandard qualifications.( Most secondary school teachers were ethnically Portuguese, especially in the urban centers.(Two state-run university institutions were founded in Portuguese Africa in 1962 by the Portuguese Ministry of the Overseas Provinces headed by Moreira - the Gerais Universitrios de Angola in Portuguese Angola and the Gerais Universitrios de Moambique in Mozambique - awarding a wide range of degrees from engineering to medicine.(  52. UNIVERSIDADE DE LUANDA) In the 1960s, the Portuguese mainland had four public universities, two of them in Lisbon (which compares with the 14 Portuguese public universities today). In 1968, the Estudos Gerais Universitrios de Angola was renamed Universidade de Luanda (University of Luanda).Famous people* da Silva Porto* Neto* Cristas* Bonga* Carlos Castro* Carlos Cruz* Chipenda* Nascimento* Nobre* Jos de Frana Dias Van-Dnem* Peyroteo* Van Dunem* Galvo* Roberto* Roque* dos Santos* Joo* Carqueijeiro* Savimbi* Jordo* guas* Eduardo Agualusa* Eduardo dos Santos* Norton de Matos* Quitongo* Pinto de Andrade* Moco* Arcanjo* of Ndongo and Matamba* Kassoma* Passos Coelho* Pepetela* guas* da Cruz* Bastos* AfonsoSee also* of Angola* in Angola* in Angola* in Angola* in Angola* in Angola* in Angola* in Angola* East Africa* GuineaReferenceszpadn AfrikaOccidental PortuguesaBarat PortugisVakar AfrikaAfryka Zachodnia- Vstafrikazh:
30403414
Tayan_Nuur_mine
The Tayan Nuur mine (Mongolian:  ) is an pit ore mining project in Tseel district within the Province of Mongolia, approximately 162 kilometres (146 mi) south of the Gobi Altai Province capital Altai. The site was discovered in 2006, and is being developed by Altain Khuder LLC of Mongolia, a Mongolian-registered mining and mineral exploration company. Since its initial drilling exploration, Altain Khuder LLC developed Tayan Nuur mine to one of the leading iron ore mines in Mongolia. Tayan Nuur mine produces over 60% Fe grade iron ore concentrates and exports it to mills in China. References  External links * http://www.tayan-nuur.com
30418684
Danville,_Washington
footnotes  Danville is an unincorporated community in Ferry County, Washington, States. Danville is located on State Route 21 near the Canadian border,  north-northeast of Republic. Danville has a office with code 99121.(ZIP Code Lookup) The population at the 2010 census was 34.Danville was founded in 1899 and took its name from the Danville Mining Company.()References
30446127
Berli_Jucker
Berli Jucker is a major Thai import and export firm, based in Bangkok. Chairman of the Board of Directors in 2010 was Charoen Sirivadhanabhakdi.  History The history of Berli Jucker dates back to 1882, when the Swiss Albert Jucker from Winterthur() and later his cousin Henry Sigg established the company under the name Jucker, Sigg & Co. This partnership led to one of the Siams earliest and most successful trading companies. Albert Jucker died of cholera in Bangkok in 1885 and left behind his wife Paula and five children. She departed with her children for Switzerland, where they were raised and educated. In 1889, Swiss entrepreneur Albert Berli took over the company. In 1901 the sons of Jucker returned to Thailand and became partners of Berli.() In 1924, the companys name changed to Berli Jucker & Co.The company originally engaged in milling, mining, timber, shipping, importing, and other activities. Over the year it continuously growed to become a major Thai import and export firm. After War II, Berli Jucker diversified its operations into manufacturing, packaging, and distribution.In 1965, the company was changed into a majority-owned Thai Company. Due to its services, King Adulyadej granted the Royal Warrant in 1967, allowing the company to use the royal Garuda emblem.() Berli Jucker Co. Ltd. was one of the first seven companies to be listed on the Exchange of Thailand in 1975.In 1993, the company changed its status into a Company Limited. Charoen Corporation Group (TCC Group), one of Thailands largest conglomerates engaging in alcohol beverage and related businesses, commercial trading, industrial production, property and financial services, became in effect the majority shareholder in Berli Jucker in 2001.Berli Jucker continued to grow, increasing its BJC Cellox capacity up to 45,000 tons per year by 2006, thus becoming the largest producer of tissue in Thailand. With more capital, it also acquired in 2007 a 50% stake in Beverage Can Co., Ltd., Thailands leading manufacturer of aluminium cans and can ends, and in the next year also acquired a 100% stake in Foods Snd Bhd, a Malaysian manufacturer and distributor of potato chips and extruded snacks both in its domestic market and other Asian countries, including Kong, Singapore, Philippines and Brunei. By mid-2008, the company was also able to increase its production capacity of glass bottles by constructing a new furnace capable of producing 434 tons per day. Company profile Berli Jucker in the year 2010 had a staff of over 5,000 and produced its own brands such as: Tasto potato chips, Dozo rice crackers, Cellox tissue paper products, and Parrot soap products. BJC also represented numerous brands from third parties. Berli Jucker is one of the leading providers of marketing, sales, and distribution services in Thailand and manages several manufacturing operations in Asia.( References  External links *Homepage of Berli Jucker
30470361
Bolivian_Civic_Action
The Bolivian Civic Action (Spanish: Accin Cvica Boliviana, ACB) was a small conservative party in Bolivia. The Bolivian Civic Action was founded in 1951(Carlos D. Mesa G. Presidentes de Bolivia: entre urnas y fusiles : el poder ejecutivo, los ministros de estado. Editorial Gisbert, 2003. 187.)under the patronage of Vctor Aramayo, proprietor of a powerful mining company and of the newspaper La Razn.(Jean-Pierre Bernard. Guide to the poltical parties of South America. Penguin, 1973. P. 140.)In the 1951 elections the ACBs presidential candidate was Gutirrez Vea Murgua; he polled 6,654 votes (05.28%) in the election.(Sistema electotales en Bolivia. http://www.cne.org.bo/centro_doc/cuadernos_tra/cuaderno_tra2_sistemas.pdf)In the 1964 elections the ACBs polled barely 7 votes.(Elections in the Americas : a data handbook / ed. by Dieter Nohlen, Vol. 2. Oxford u.a.: Oxford Univ. Press, 2005. P.150.)In the 1970s the Bolivian Civic Action went out of existence.Notes
30499661
Joseph_Obalski
 occupation   engineer, servant, professor, and authorJoseph Obalski (14 September 1852 &ndash; 25 March 1915) was a French-Canadian engineer, servant, professor, and author.Born in Chteaubriant, France, of Polish origin from his fathers side of the family, Obalski graduated from the nationale suprieure des mines de Paris in 1877. After meeting the of Quebec, Chapleau, while Chapleau was vacationing in France in 1881, Obalski was offered the post of provincial mining engineer. In 1881, he was working for the Quebec Department of Railways.()From 1882 to 1888, he was a professor at the Polytechnique de Montral. In 1889 he published Mines et minraux de la province de Qubec.(References
30520421
Yale_(disambiguation)
The name Yale is often derived from the English spelling of the Welsh place name, Il in Denbighshire.Yale can refer to:Educational institutions*University, the United States third-oldest institution of higher education*College, the undergraduate component of Yale University*College Wrexham, a college in Wales*Secondary School, a high school in British ColumbiaPeople*Yale, after whom Yale University is named*Yale (n Ioele), American gangster*Murray Yale, trader for Hudsons Bay Company in Canada*Yale, Sr.*Yale, Jr.PlacesCanada*British Columbia, originally Fort Yale, named after James Murray Yale, one of the two capitals of the Fraser Canyon Gold Rush and the namesake of:**Yale Road, the original highway in the Lower Mainland of British Columbia**Land District, one of the primary Land Districts of British Columbia (cadastral survey/land titles system)**(electoral district), a defunct federal electoral district in British Columbia (1872-1892 and 1914-1952)**YaleCariboo, a defunct federal electoral district in British Columbia (1892-1914)**District, a defunct federal electoral district in British Columbia (1871 only)**(provincial electoral district), a defunct provincial electoral district in British Columbia**Yale-Lillooet, a defunct provincial electoral district in British Columbia, Canada**Yaletown, an area of downtown VancouverEurope*Il, Denbighshire, United KingdomUnited States*Illinois*Iowa*Michigan*Mississippi*Oklahoma*Virginia*Washington*Township, Valley County, Nebraska*(RTD), a light rail station in the RTD service of Denver, ColoradoOther uses*(mythical creature), a creature in European mythology*language, a Papuan language*(company), a lock manufacturer*Materials Handling Corporation - forklift manufacturer*Romanization, a set of romanization schemes for some East Asian languages*American Yale, a single-engine aircraft used for training fighter pilots during World War II*SS Yale, a US Navy steamboat used in World War I*RapidMiner (previous name: YALE), an open-source software for data mining, machine learning, and knowledge discovery*Atltico Clube, a former Brazilian sports club *The Yale, part of the Shire in the works of J. R. R. Tolkien*First Nation, a band government of the Sto:lo people headquartered at Yale, British Columbia*Atletico Yale, a Basketball Club from Uruguay(flertydig)de:Yale(desambiguacin)(homonymie)hr:Yale(disambigua)nl:Yaleja:pl:Yalept:Yale(dezambiguizare)ru:vo:Yale()
30541424
Robert_Tooth
thumb|250px|right|Robert ToothRobert Tooth (born 28/5/1821, Kent, England - died Bedford, USA, 19/9/1893) was one of three brothers of Sydneys Tooth brewery family.(Walsh, G. P. 1976 Tooth, Robert (1821-1893), Australian Dictionary of Biography, Vol 6, Melbourne Uni Press, pp. 285-6, Online reference http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A060305b.htm) He built two of Sydneys grandest houses, Cranbrook House and Swifts.Early lifeRobert was the first son of Robert Tooth (b.1799) and Mary Ann (ne Reader), a hops merchant of Swifts Park, Kent, England.( His brothers were Edwin (18221858), and Frederick (18271893). His uncle was John Tooth (b. 1803), Cranbrook merchant and brewer, who first migrated to Sydney in the Bencoolen in 1828 and received a 2560-acre (1036 ha) grant in County, New South Wales. After John established himself as a successful merchant he opened the Kent Brewery on Road. In August 1843 Robert and Edwin arrived in Sydney on the Euphrates. The enduring  merchant and brewing firm of R. and E. Tooth began on 1 September 1843 when John leased them the brewery.Business and Public LifeFrederick joined Sydney and the partnership about 1853 and R., E. and F. Tooth became R. and F. Tooth & Co. on 2 January 1860 when J. S. Mitchell became a partner. In 1852 with John Edye, James Alexander and (Sir) William Montagu Manning, Mort, J. Croft and Edwin, Robert formed the Twofold Bay Pastoral Association which acquired some 400,000 acres (161,876 ha) on the south coast and Monaro; Kameruka was the head station. Threatened by (Sir) John Robertsons land bills they bought as much land as possible in their own names and disbanded in 1860.For 10 months from May 1856 he was a member of the Legislative Council. A large squatter with about 600 employees, in January 1858 he stood for seat of Sydney Hamlets in the Legislative Assembly, advocating free selection of land at 1 an acre without auction, tramways instead of expensive railways to bring produce to market and an elective Upper House. He lost, but represented Sydney City in the assembly in 1858-59. Questionably claiming to have disposed of all his runs except one on the Queensland border and opposing Robertsons land bill, Robert stood for West Sydney in December 1860 but again was defeated.Tooth then concentrated on his business interests. Their London house, R. & F. Tooth & Mort, 155 Fenchurch Street, acted also as agents for Smyths Sydney Marine Assurance Office and the Peak Downs Copper Mining Co. He became a committee-man of the Society for the Suppression of Cattle Stealing in 1861 and of the Agricultural Society of New South Wales. He was a partner of Robert Cran, F. F. Nixon, (Sir) Robert Lucas Tooth and Frederick under the style of Tooth and Cran until March 1872 at Yengarie near Queensland, and in the Wide Bay and Burnett districts. From 1865 they experimented with meat preserving at Yengarie and in 1870 won a prize at the Intercolonial Exhibition, Sydney. In the mid-1860s Robert still nominally held the Lachlan and Wide Bay runs he had leased in the 1850s; he had added Jondaryan and Irvingdale, almost 300 sq. miles (777 km) on the Downs and some twenty-eight runs, amounting to 700 sq. miles (1813 km), in the Maranoa District of Queensland. Tooth was also a director of the of New South Wales in the 1850s and 1860s (president in 1862-63) and a director of the Sugar Refining Co. in 1855-63; A prominent Anglican layman, he was a director of the Society for the Relief of Destitute Children, a fellow of St Pauls College within the of Sydney and an original committee-man of the Union Club. He began building his fine residence, Cranbrook, at Rose Bay in 1859 but sold it to Towns in 1864. Robert retired from R. and F. Tooth & Co. in April 1872 and Frederick and R. L. Tooth carried on as F. Tooth & Co. This partnership was dissolved on 31 March 1873 when Frederick retired, Mitchell and R. L. Tooth carrying on as Tooth & Co. Most of the profit from this successful business came from importing wines, spirits and beer, as colonial beer was not widely drunk until the 1880s. On 1 May 1849 he had married at St Marks Church, Pontville, Van Diemens Land, Maria Lisle, daughter of Captain G. B. Forster, R.N.; on 24 June 1871 he married Elizabeth Mansfield.References
30596569
Bronze_Age_in_Romania
Bronze Age in Romania is a period in the Romania which is divided into the Bronze Age (ca. 3500-2200 BC) Bronze Age (cca.2200-1600/1500 BC) and Bronze Age (ca. 1600/150-1100 BC).(Cristian tefan-Epoca Bronzului, page 1)PeriodizationOver time there have been several Age chronology of the Romanian area applied. Periodization of Paul Reinecke has been used for the Central-European Reinecke, who shared the Age in four phases (A, B, C and D) based on the associated objects of bronze.(Cristian tefan-Epoca Bronzului, page 1)FeaturesNeolithic society type is characterized by predominantly agrarian economy with stable settlements, funerary practices specific to a religion based on a cult. The type of society may be approaching that peer polity by Renfrew.(Cristian tefan-Epoca Bronzului, page 1)In the Romanian territory, which is an culture is among the oldest in Europe: culture. This culture is probably the last that has created painted pottery in Europe.In the early Age began to develop various archaeological cultures: the of Baden-Coofeni, III culture Belleraz, culture, culture etc. Verbicioara. During this period the most important crop in Muntenia and Oltenia is culture. Peoples main occupations are agriculture, mining and livestock. Houses are rectangular and sized. In the last period of the Bronze Age meet broad types of ornaments (rings, bracelets, necklaces, pendants especially made of copper, gold, silver and bronze in particular).Verbicioara was identified in 1949 by the eponymous resort excavations. At first presentation, very brief, moreover, believe that the home had a west-bound complexes Vatina Pecica and entering in Oltenia after Glina group that pushes eastward. Regarding the burial custom was considered the beginning of the burial of the dead, then the 3rd phase to be held cremation practice.(http://www.archaeology.ro/imc_verb.htm) Based on material content, Verbicioara was included in five phases.In the Bronze period, the population of Romania and neighboring countries was demarcated by the appearance of several major crops. Some that stand out: the Ottoman culture (seen in Slovakia), culture(seen in Transylvania), Mure culture,  Mare culture (from which they retained some lovely clay figurines and statues).Age economy based on sheep, goats and pigs. In culture large cattle were used, along with traction and feeding horses.During the Age has been an important development, in particular economic to Chalcolithic. Were multiplied at the same time and artistic events, cultural reprezented by Great complex Grla Mare of statues made of clay.ReligionAge general idea is that it installs Uranian cults, solar. As arguments to use some ornaments, considered be solar symbols, which are frequently played on ceramic or metal parts: the circles, circles accompanied by rays, the swastika. Cremation itself is considered to be bound by these denominations.(http://prehistoire.e-monsite.com/rubrique,epoca-bronzului-ii,1112106.html)In the Romanian territory known three Age sanctuaries: Slacea (culture, phase II), county, Grla culture of Bulgaria and Monteoru (Monteoru culture, County. culture of the area, Phase II , a place of worship known to the Oara.In connection with plastic anthropomorphic, it is poorly represented in this period than during neoliticului. Only culture of our area is well represented in this regard is Great Zuto Brdo, plus Szeremle Brdo-Dalj in Hungary and Croatia. In the area of the two cultures were found about 340 pieces, of which 244 are in the area Mare(http://prehistoire.e-monsite.com/rubrique,epoca-bronzului-ii,1112106.html)..Were found during this period and clay miniature axes (axes, hammers or double security). Labrys double-ax-is frequently the Cretan and Mycenaean world where it occurs most often in complex rituals and tombs (tomb double ax of Knossos), complex rarely profane. The space is small Mycenaean different forms from miniature to giant forms, the 1,20 metres. However, labrys site is frequently associated with the moon and can be a symbol of a goddess of vegetation, the forerunner of Demeter, which is depicted on Mycenaean seals placed under a tree. It has an ax in his hand and receives the gift and fruit poppy knobs.NotesBibliography*Cristian tefan-Epoca Bronzului*Ioan Aurel-Pop, Ioan Bolovan, coordinatings-Istoria ilustrat a RomnieiExternal links*http://prehistoire.e-monsite.com/rubrique,epoca-bronzului-ii,1112106.html*http://prehistoire.e-monsite.com/rubrique,epoca-bronzului-ii,1112106.html*http://www.archaeology.ro/imc_verb.htm*http://www.archaeology.ro/imc_mont.htmSee also*culture*of Transylvaniabronzului n Romnia
30622916
Greentown_Gas_Condensate_Field
Greentown Gas Condensate Field is located in Grand County, approximately  southwest of River, Utah.Production is from the Clastic zones with the Paradox salt section.Reservoir consists of sand sections within the salt sections, the reservoir covers approximatley 43,000 acres. Discovery The Field was discovered in 2005 by  Delta Petroleum Corporation, with the drilling of the State 36-43H well approximately 2 miles south of the town of River, Utah.  The well tested at 25 million cubic feet of natural gas per day and over 2,000 bbls of condensate per day.  The well had an initial tubing pressure of over 8000 psi.  The field was discovered using Seismic and surface geology.Currently the field is operated by Pacific Energy & Mining Company, an independent oil company based in Nevada. Geology The field is composed of a numerous sand reservoirs bounded by Anhydrite and Salt section.   The reservoirs are continuous over 43,000 acres and have low permeability and steeply dipping beds.  Thee field was deleneated by drilling of 9 wells during 2005 through 2008.  http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Greentown_Cross_Section.jpgRegional setting:  North-West Paradox Basin.Producing formation(s):  Mississippian  Cane Creek of the Paradox Formation at approximately 9,500 feet depth.  However most of the production is from the clastic section of the paradox formation.Type of trap:  Anticline. Condensate and Gas Composition Condensate produced has the following composition:* 52.4     -      API gravity* Pour poinit  -  15 degree F.* Color      -    Clear* Sulfur content - LowNGL600 gallons NGL per million cubic feet of natural gas. Natural gas composition * BTU               -  1340 to 1470* Specific gravity  - .496Additional studies by the Utah Department of Geology has encouraged the drilling of horizontal wells to efficiently drain the reservoir.Paradox Basin. Final Report US Department of Energy
30638065
Andrew_Knowles_and_Sons
Andrew Knowles and Sons was a mining company that operated in and around Clifton, Manchester, then in the historic county of Lancashire. England. Robert Knowles who died 1780, started pits in Eagley Bank and Sharples, north of Bolton. The pits were inherited by his descendants, Andrew (1735-1810), Robert (1756-1819) and Andrew (1783-1847), his great grandson. The family had an interest in this area until 1870.()Andrew Knowles was born in 1783 in a family whose mining interests began in Elizabethan times and whose descendants dominated the industry at the end of the Victorian era. Before 1810 Knowles operated in Bolton but bought leases in the Valley near Clifton after that. In the late 1830s Knowles took his four sons into partnership. Andrew Knowles died in 1847 and a son, John, died in 1852 leaving Robert, Thomas and James Knowles to continue the business. The third generation joined the firm after a disagreement in 1872 and Andrew Knowles and Sons Limited was formed in 1783.()() The firm grew to be the largest on the Coalfield by the end of the 19th century when it had almost 4,000 employees.() The company sank the first Colliery which operated until 1928. The output of Knowles collieries was initially for local use and moved by road transport. Some of the collieries were close to the Bolton and Bury Canal and by 1850 some had access to the and Yorkshire Railways Manchester to Bolton line. Clifton Moss Colliery employed up to 300 men before 1891 when it closed.() Little Bolton Colliery on Slater Lane near the Tonge in Bolton was owned by the company between 1853 and 1863.In 1896 the company owned Hall Colliery in Clifton, Foggs Colliery in Lever, Colliery in Pendlebury and Colliery in Pendleton. By then Rivin Colliery in Lever and Allens Green and Green Lane in Radcliffe had been abandoned. In 1929 the company became part of Collieries.()    In 1866 all workers who had joined the fledgling Mining Federation of Great Britain were locked out of the Knowles pits and the Company defeated attempts to unionise the workforce. The companys intransigence towards unions continued up to 1891 when a strike left miners little better off but the firm was forced to negotiate with a union it had up to then refused to recognise.()ReferencesBibliography ***
30656818
Northeim_Lake_District
Northeim Lake District is a series of lakes nearby Northeim, Saxony.It has its origin in pebble extraction by open-pit mining. Digging for pebble began in 1852 in order to build the Royal Hanoverian State Railways. After World War II mining was intensified. Pebbles that are found here are composed of greywacke, radiolarite and sand.It is located where the Rhume river flows into the Leine river. Highway 3 crosses the Federal Motorway 7 here as well. The site is also crossed by the Cycle Path. It is now a recreation area. On one of these lakes people have fun with their sailboats. Others prefer swimmng, diving or windsurfing. The area is also a conservation area in order to protect birds that breed here like Crested Grebe, Rail, Wagtail or Reed Warbler.external linkhttp://www.seeterrassen-northeim.de/cms/Seenplatte
30680171
Wombat_State_Forest
 governing_body   Department of Sustainability and EnvironmentThe Wombat State Forest (locally: Bullarook) is located  west of Melbourne, Victoria, Australia, between Woodend and Daylesford, at the Dividing Range. The forest is approximately  in size and sits upon Ordovician or Tertiary sediments. The Bullarook Wombat State Forest was proclaimed in 1871.() The only initiative in Australia to introduce forestry, within the internationally understood context, is in the Wombat State Forest.() It is managed by the of Sustainability and Environment.() The management plan covers several areas such as firewood and other products; protection of water supplies, conservation of biodiversity, and conservation of landscape.  Other areas of importance include cultural heritage, research, education, tourism, recreation, mineral exploration, mining, and grazing.(EtymologyThe forest is probably named after the Wombat township (now Daylesford).()History align  rightThe Dja Wurrung peoples inhabited the area that is now state forest land. In its early days prior to European settlement, it probably extended to a much larger area than it does today.( ;19th centuryMuch of the forest lands was logged out during the gold rush era of the mid 1800s.() During this time, the forest was intensively logged, the wood products used as tunnel supports, sleepers for tramways, lining of mining shafts, to fire mine boilers, piles for piers and docks, electric poles, heavy construction timbers and fuel wood.( It was only in 1860 that the 1860 Land Act (Section 80) was created, prohibiting the slashing and subtraction of trees.  Eleven years later, in 1871, the Wombat State Forest was established.() By 1884, there were 36 saw mills in operation in the Wombat and Bullarook Forests, the wood having been shipped to Melbourne, Sandhurst, and Ballarat.(( There was little or no reproduction and the young trees were burned.() This eventually resulted in what is termed as ruined forest, the forest remaining in that state for several decades without any agricultural operations allowed. ;20th centuryAs the forest was almost abandoned after the gold rush period, a regeneration process emerged. This activity plateaued in the 1960s when shelter wood logging came into effect for silviculture, resulting in more deforestation. However, in the 1970s and 80s, the area was designated as the Midlands Forest Management Area which included the planting of pine trees for commercial exploitation.() When in 2001, the local community published its own findings about the forests sustainable management, it became an example of community involvement in a state-run management plan.() In 2010, community groups fears were raised that logging could resume in the forest because the State Government allocated logging licenses in western Victoria.()GeographyThe Great Dividing Range straddles the Wombat State Forest.() The forest extends along both sides of the Dividing Range, from Creswick to Mount Macedon.( There are about 400 volcanoes in a stretch that extends from Kilmore in the north to Gambier in Australia. Mount Babbington, Mount Wilson and Blue Mount are extinct volcanoes within the forest.( The prevalent geological make up is of Ordovician or Tertiary sediments. The rock types are of volcanic origin, dated to the era.  Quaternary basalts, all of volcanic origin, constituted the forested land to the west of the Wombat State Forest. These lands were converted to agricultural zone due to the suitability to grow crops under abundant rainfall conditions. However, Ordovician or sedimentary soils, due to its poor soil conditions for farming, have remained undisturbed.( The geological evolution belongs to the period of the Era which has emerged from an ash dominated rainforest to dry forest.  The preceding geological evolutions in the order of their ascending order of dating are: the Era, the Precambrian Era, and the Era.()The Wombat State Forest contains the headwaters of the Lerderderg, Campaspe and Loddon rivers.() A notable feature in the forest is the extent of  mineral springs which is said to account for 80% of Australias mineral springs. The mineral waters are rich in calcium, silica, magnesium, iron and sulphur. The volcanic activity of the region has supplemented the creation of mineral water- carbon dioxide mix that is seen in the form of bubbles emerging from the springs.(Fauna and floraFile:Petauroides volans Gould.jpg|rightZ|thumb|Within Victoria, the Wombat State Forest is the Gliders most western range.(;FaunaThe forests faunal era emerged during the Precambrian Era, initially with cyanobacteria (Green Algae) and soft bodied organisms.  These were followed by the Period with Metazoans dominating the sea, followed by the earliest vertebrates of the Period, the Carboniferous/Period of insects, Period of early small dinosaurs, Period of dinosaurs, Period, Palaeocene Period of mammals, Oligocene Period of early primates, Miocene Period of possums, kangaroos, koalas, bats, snakes, crocodiles and birds, and finally the Holocene Period of human civilization.(The native fauna consists of marsupials and monotremes, reptiles, amphibians, bats and birds.() The Greater Glider (Petauroides volans) is the largest  possum found in this forest. It has furry hair with the colour varying  from grey to cream and with a pale underside. It has a large snout and large ears. Its range is in the western part of the Wombat State Forest.() Several state-listed threatened bird species occur in the forest including the Egret, Egret, Goshawk, Masked Owl, Owl and Kite. Additionally, the forest is the western extent of the range of the Treecreeper and Whistler.()();FloraDuring the forests geological evolutionary process, flora initially emerged in oceans 630 million years ago.  This was followed by plants emerging in late Period and early Period.  They were succeeded by the Period of Ancient Flora (including Gondwana Period and West Gondwana) as is evidenced in Australia with the emergence of conifers.  The Palaeocene Period of tree species was succeeded by the Eocene Period of grasses which was followed by rain forests.  With the Miocene Period, eucalypt forests emerged, followed by the Pliocene Period of cooler climate with some northern tropical species emerging, and finally followed by the Period of dry climate with dry vegetation.(The native flora broadly consist of small medium and tall trees; shrubs of varying sizes; climbers; native herbs/forbs, grasses; rushes, sedges and aquatics; lilies, ferns and orchids.() The open forest is dominated by a number of eucalypt species including Messmate (Eucalyptus obliqua), Broad-leaf Peppermint (E. dives), Narrow-leaf Peppermint (E. radiata), Manna Gum (E. viminalis) and Candlebark (E. rubida).(()() Swamp Gum (Eucalyptus ovata) and Yarra Gum (E. yarraensis) are also present in the forest.((  luteobubalina, a fungus that causes dieback, has occurred in mixed eucalyptus stands following partial cutting.(Florence, p. 398) The forest is also a rich storehouse of 111 fungal species spread over its wide and varying habitats. These include native and introduced species as well as a selection of lichenised fungi and myxomycetes (moulds).()Rare or threatened plant species of record include Wiry Bossiaea (Bossiaea cordigera), Matted Flax-lily (Dianella amoena), Brookers Gum (Eucalyptus brookeriana), Fryerstown Grevillea  (Grevillea obtecta), Creeping Grevillea (G. repens), Hairy Beard-heath (Leucopogon microphyllus var. pilibundus), Satinwood  (Nematolepis squamea subsp. squamea), Small Sickle Greenhood (Pterostylis lustra), Scented Bush-pea (Pultenaea graveolens) as well as two endemic species Wombat Leafless Bossiaea (Bossiaea vombata) and Wombat Bush-pea (Pultenaea reflexifolia var.reflexifolia).(Ecological classificationEcological classification of native vegetation in the Wombat Forest has been carried out, with 16 different Vegetation Classes (EVCs) being identified. The widely varying vegetation is a reflection of ecological diversity of the forest in geology, soil type, aspect, climate, altitude and position in the landscape.  Under the EVC classification system followed in Victoria, the criteria adopted covers depletion (what is left since European settlement), degradation, current threats and rarity. Shrubby Foothill Forest which is found on both sides of the Great Divide accounts for 57.66% under the Least Concern Category while the Swampy Riparian Woodland and  Streambank Shrubland are under the Endangered Category.()Community managementWombat Forest Community Forest Management (CFM) is a cooperative process in which the community of Wombat has been entrusted the responsibility to manage the Wombat State Forest. The management initiative started in 2002 with inputs from experts in forest management and other disciplines. The slogan Our Forests Our Future started the reform process. The of Melbourne facilitated  by providing the consultancy inputs in preparing a review report on collaborative forest management and community participation in Australia. This report was titled Collaborative Forest Management  A Review.(The community group is called the Wombat Forestcare and is actively associated with the government departments to protect and improving the biodiversity of the natural ecosystem of the Wombat State Forest in aspects of floral and faunal surveys, forest regeneration, seed collection and also education. The community group has urged the State Government to take action to make the Wombat State Forest into a State Park and Community Forest Reserve.()()The Wombat Forest Community Biodiversity Research Project was developed to determine what kinds of animals live in the Wombat Forest, and what sort of habitats do they prefer. The project is a collaboration of the Biodiversity Working Group and the Rylah Institute for Environmental Research.()TourismLyonville Mineral Springs, Garden of St Erth, the Lerderderg Heritage River Walk, and Nolans Creek Picnic Area are among the tourist attractions within the state forest.( Other historic places of interest include the Andersons Mill, Balt Camp, Pioneer Sawmill, and Yankee Mine.( Train buffs can travel by vintage diesel rail through the forest.()See also*State ParkReferencesExternal links* Wombat Forestcare Official Site* wombatforest.org
30700270
Cyclone_Yasi
Severe Tropical Cyclone Yasi  was a cyclone that made landfall in northern Queensland, Australia in the early hours of 3 February 2011. Yasi originated from a tropical low near Fiji. The system intensified to a Category 3 cyclone at about 5pm AEST (07:00 UTC) on 31 January 2011.() Late on 1 February the cyclone strengthened to a Category 4 system, then early on 2 February, the cyclone intensified to a Category 5 system.()According to Tropical Cyclone Advice Number 21, at 9pm AEST (11:00 UTC) the system was centred near , 110 kilometres east of Innisfail and moving west southwest at 25 kilometres per hour, with a central pressure of 930 hectopascals.() The system had a well-defined eye and a intensity of T6.5.()According to Tropical Cyclone Advice Number 24 at 11:54pm AEST (13:54 UTC), the large destructive core had commenced to cross the coast between Innisfail and Cardwell with a central pressure of 930 hectopascals and maximum 10-minute sustained winds of 215 km/h. Maximum 3-second gusts are estimated at 285 km/h, with these likely to affect an area spanning from Ingham to Cairns according to the Threat Map () for a period of 34 hours. The eye crossed the coastline at Mission Beach just before 12:00am AEST (14:00 UTC) and passed over Tully soon after.The commentary on this data indicates that models are quite consistent with the forecast motion and adds with the expectation of being a large and intense system, cyclone intensity may be maintained further inland than normal. The cyclone was expected to be a Category 3 system near Georgetown, 450 km inland as well as affecting the Mining town of Isa. The storm has caused $800 million in losses, and is indirectly responsible for the death of a 23 year old man who died of suffocation by generator exhaust fumes.()Meteorological historySevere Tropical Cyclone Yasi was first identified on 26 January 2011 as a tropical disturbance, given the identifier 09F by the Specialized Meteorological Center in Fiji (Meteorological Service; FMS), located about 330 km (205 mi) south-southwest of Tuvalu. Situated over a region of high surface temperatures and low to moderate shear, gradual intensification was expected as the system moved southwestwards.() Little development took place over the following two days,() though the disturbance was classified as a tropical depression on 27 January.() By 28 January, the depression was characterised as a poorly developed low with a broad area of rotating, flaring convection.() Considerable development took place the following day, prompting the Typhoon Warning Center (JTWC) to issue a Cyclone Formation Alert. The storms low-level circulation centre became increasingly defined and convective banding features were apparent along the northern periphery of the depression.()Rapid development took place throughout 30 January, resulting in the JTWC upgrading the system to a tropical storm after data from an ASCAT image depicted winds near gale-force around the storms centre.() Shortly thereafter, the FMS also upgraded the storm, classifying it as Tropical Cyclone Yasi.() Upon being classified a tropical cyclone, Yasi was located about 370 km (230 mi) northeast of Vanuatu.( Situated along the northern edge of a strong subtropical ridge, the storm tracked in a general westward direction, taking it through the northern islands of the country.() Continuing to rapidly intensify, Yasi attained severe tropical cyclone intensity with ten-minute sustained winds of at least 120 km/h (75 mph) on 31 January as the primary convective band wrapped around the storms centre.() Later that day, the storm crossed 160E, prompting the final advisory from the FMS and the first advisory from the Australian Bureau of Meteorology as it crossed into the Australian cyclone basin.()Tropical Cyclone Yasi moved across Vanuatus northern Province, with winds reaching up to 95 km/h (60 mph).() Vanuatuan officials reported difficulties making contact with the Province, but it was believed that the northern area escaped major damage.()PreparationsAustraliaBy the time Yasi crossed into Australian basin, preparations for the storm were under way.  Media outlets referred to the storm as what could be the states worst cyclone in history.()Because of its great size, many feared that the tropical cyclone could cause damage more severe than Larry in 2006 or Tracy, which severely damaged Darwin in 1974.() Thousands of residents in the path of the storm were urged to evacuate by Queensland Premier Bligh.() Thirty thousand people were evacuated from Cairns, including all patients from Cairns Base Hospital and Cairns Private Hospital who were airlifted by the Australian Air Force and other agencies (such as the Flying Doctor Service) to Brisbane.() The Queensland state emergency coordinator warned residents that they would be on their own for up to 24 hours, as the conditions would be too dangerous for emergency responders.()Waves as high as 12 m (39.37 ft) were predicted to hit the north Queensland coast as the storm surge caused by Cyclone Yasi combined with a high tide of up to 7 m (30 ft) above average.(()ElsewhereThough the storm was situated several hundred kilometres southeast of New Guinea, the outer edges of the large system brought strong winds, high seas and heavy rain to the country. In Bay Province, local officials advised residents living along the coast to move to higher grounds.()Impact and aftermathPrior to striking mainland Australia, the centre of Cyclone Yasi passed directly over Willis Island, a small island located about  east of Cairns.() Meteorological data from the island depicted the storms approach before the equipment was damaged by 185 km/h (115 mph) wind gusts. After the anemometer was lost, the pressure fell to 937.9 mbar (hPa; 27.69 inHg).( Around 9:00 am local time on 2 February, radar data was disrupted.( Roughly an hour later, communication with the island was completely lost.() Initial reports indicated that the research centre sustained damage, though the scale of this was unknown.().In Mission Beach near where Cyclone Yasi made landfall, wind gusts were estimated to have reached , leaving behind significant damage.( A surge estimated to have reached  destroyed several structures along the coast and pushed up to  inland.() In the hours after the storms passage, police were unable to venture beyond their station grounds as the situation had yet to be declared safe. Most of the beach had lost its sand and every structure was damaged to some degree. Near sunrise on 3 February, there were no reports of fatalities or injuries in Mission Beach.() As the eye of the storm moved over several towns in Queensland, news reporters took the opportunity to give brief damage assessments before the eyewall returned. The worst affected areas were around Tully, Silkwood, Mission Beach, Innisfail and Cardwell.()According to residents in Tully, the town was ...a scene of mass devastation. An unknown number of homes were completely destroyed as intense winds, estimated at , battered the area. Many other homes not destroyed sustained severe facade and or roof damage.() As daybreak came, reports from the town stated that about 90% of the structures along the main avenue sustained extensive damage.()An evacuation centre in Innisfail began to flood as the worst of Yasis impacts neared. Evacuees were reportedly hammering boards at the bottom of doors to prevent water from further entering the structure. Additionally, concerns over the buildings windows came about as they flexed amidst winds over .() In Townsville, numerous roofs were torn off buildings and sent hurtling down streets. Many windows are believed to have been shattered as residents reported the sound of glass breaking throughout the night as the storm moved through.() In Tully, the high school was destroyed and will need to be rebuilt.()Numerous emergency calls were made by residents trapped in their homes near the height of the storm. However, their calls could not be acted upon as conditions were too dangerous for police to travel in. One reported instance was of six people trapped in an apartment complex at Port Hinchinbrook near Cardwell who could not be evacuated. The building was threatened by Yasis surge which exceeded . The group were later reported to be safe.() Around 10:30 pm local time on 2 February, Premier Bligh stated that an estimated 90,000 structures, including evacuation centres, were without power.() This figure rose to 170,000 by morning and officials stated that some residents may be without power for more than a month.()The water-supply system had failed in Townsville and there was only 24 hours supply, while the water had run out at Island in one day.()Fears of total devastation to the banana and sugar cane crops arose as the storm struck land. Initial estimates stated that damage to sugar cane alone could reach A$505 million.() On 3 February, total losses from the storm were estimated to reach A$3.5 billion ($3.54 billion USD). Accounting for inflation, Yasi ranks as the second-costliest Australian cyclone on record, behind Tracy of 1974.() By 5 February, A$2 billion ($2.03 billion USD) was confirmed to have been lost in agriculture, mining and local government.() An additional A$1 billion has been lost in the tourism industry.()One death occurred due to asphyxiation, resulting from monoxide poisoning as a result of a portable generator being used in a confined space at Bambaroo near Ingham.()Two days after landfall, severe flooding from the rains severed the Highway between Townsville and Ingham leaving a 10 kilometre backup of traffic.() Many of those who evacuated the devastated areas including emergency workers were stranded.(On 5 February, the remnants of Yasi as a tropical low created torrential rain as rainfall of   was recorded in Terowie and Yongala.() Flooding was widespread in towns of northern Australia reaching even Renmark on the River Murray.( In north-west Victoria, Mildura recorded the highest daily rainfall total on record, with  and Lyndhurst, a suburb of Melbourne recorded  of rain in the 24 hours falling up to 9am AEDT (22:00 UTC) on the 5 February.()On 6 February, the BOM reported that Ex-Tropical Cyclone Yasi was located  north of Yulara() and that heavy rains continued in the Springs area. The deluge also continued in northern South Australia as vast areas continued to get rain.() Hallett had a record rainfall amount of .( Damaging winds with gusts of more than 90 km/h hit Marla and Coober Pedy.( More than  also fell at Arkaroola and Mt Dare,  fell at Marree, and  at Yunta.(Even one week after the flooding rains, areas that were affected had become completely isolated.() At Challenger Gold Mine 150 people were isolated and emergency supplies had to be flown in. Cattle Stations near Oodnadatta, Glendambo and the worlds largest at Creek station were all isolated.(ResponseThe Defence Force (ADF) response was designated Yasi Assist. The ADF established Joint Task Force 664, based at Barracks in Townsville and under the command of Brigadier Stuart Smith, for operational command on 2 February 2011.()See also*Australian region cyclone season*of the 201011 Australian region cyclone season*Queensland floods*2010 Queensland floods*Cyclone Tasha (2010)ReferencesExternal links* Australian Bureau of Meteorology (TCWCs Perth, Darwin & Brisbane)* Community Information Hub* Joint Typhoon Warning Center (JTWC)* Tropical Cyclone Yasi at Earth Observatoryzh:Yasi (2011)YasiYasiYasiYasiYasiYasiYasi()Cyclone Yasi, 2011Dnence Kua Kasrgaszh:
30718939
Bannered_routes_of_U.S._Route_20
Several routes of Route 20 exist. In order from west to east they are as follows.ExistingToledo business loopIn Toledo, Oregon, U.S. Route 20 Business runs from an intersection with the main highway west of Toledo on the Toledo Frontage Road and 5th Street through Toledo and again on the Toledo Frontage Road to an intersection with the main highway east of Toledo.  Business 20 in Toledo is also called Sharon Branstiter Memorial Drive, in memory of Toledos former mayor.(City of Toledo Feb 20,2008 council meeting minutes)(Road signs for Sharon Branstiter Memorial Drive)Bend business loopIn Oregon, U.S. Route 20 Business runs from an intersection with the main highway north of Bend, south on East 1st Street, Deschutes Place, and Wall Street to Newport Avenue, concurrent with U.S. 97 Business, and then east on Newport Avenue and Greenwood Avenue to the main highway concurrent with East 3rd Avenue in Bend.Sioux City business loopU.S. Route 20 Business in the Sioux City area originates in Nebraska, at the junction of Dakota Avenue and 129 in South Sioux City.  US 20 Bus. follows US 20s old alignment through South Sioux City before crossing into Iowa concurrently with Route 77.  US 20 Bus. joins with Interstate 29 via a complicated interchange, running with the Interstate for about one mile (1.6 km) before exiting onto Gordon Drive.  It follows Gordon Drive through central Sioux City to the US 20/US 75 bypass, where it rejoins US 20.  US 20 Bus. in Sioux City is known officially as Highway 12, though Iowa 12 is signed as ending at 29 in western Sioux City.Fort Dodge business loopIn the Fort Dodge area, U.S. Route 20 Business begins at the western end of the current US 20 expressway near Moorland and follows US 20s former route through the city via Kenyon Road and 5th Avenue South.  Just east of Fort Dodges eastern city limits, US 20 Bus. turns south on Webster County Road P59, passing through several gypsum mining areas before rejoining the US 20 expressway in Coalville.Freeport business loopRockfordBelvidere business loopSouth Bend business loopOhio alternate routeU.S. Route 20A is a 53 mile (85 km) long east&ndash;west route of U.S. Route 20 located in northwest Ohio. The western terminus of the route is at US 20 south of Pioneer. The eastern terminus is at US 20 in Maumee, southwest of Toledo.The route runs parallel to the Turnpike (Interstate 80 and Interstate 90) for much of its length, and interchanges with the Turnpike at exit 13 northeast of Montpelier.US 20 and US 20A are never more than five miles (8 km) apart for the entire  stretch through the Ohio farm country, with the main line of US 20 taking the more northerly route.The current US 20A was originally designated U.S. Route 20S. It became US 20A in 1935. It was moved to its current location along SR 15 from State Routes 576 and 107 in 1964.(Silver Creek truck routeU.S. Route 20 Truck is a route of US 20 in Creek, New York. The road begins at an intersection with US 20 in Silver Creek, goes along Central Avenue for a short time and merges in with NY 5. The two become concurrent for another mile on Howard Street where US 20 Truck ends at an intersection with US 20.()New York alternate routeformedca. 1939()()U.S. Route 20A (US 20A) is an  east&ndash;west route of US 20 in New York. It leaves US 20 in Hamburg, a suburb of Buffalo, and rejoins it in East Bloomfield about five miles (8 km) west of Canandaigua, the county seat of Ontario County. While the main line of US 20 takes a direct path between Hamburg, Buffalo, and East Bloomfield via Avon, US 20A veers to the south to serve several villages and hamlets, including the villages of Geneseo and Warsaw. US 20A was assigned ca. 1939.FormerIdaho alternate routeElgin business loopChicago business loopIndiana alternate routeSouth Bend bypassOsceola truck routeElkhart truck routeWestern Greater Cleveland alternate routeFrom 1971 to 1983, U.S. Route 20 Alternate ran concurrently with the current Alternate U.S. 6 from their common eastern terminus in the Ohio City neighborhood in Cleveland to U.S. 20/SR 113 in Rocky River.(Eastern Greater Cleveland alternate routeU.S. Route 20 Alternate ran along Euclid Avenue, with Alternate U.S. 6, in Cleveland and East Cleveland from 1936 until 1967, when U.S. 20 was removed from U.S. 6 and run along Euclid Avenue from Superior Avenue in East Cleveland to Square in Cleveland.(References
30730348
Douglas_Henderson_(ambassador)
Douglas Henderson (October 15, 1914 - July 14, 2010) was an American diplomat, economist and government official. He is perhaps best known for his service as States Ambassador to Bolivia during Marxist revolutionary Ernesto Che Guevaras ill-fated 1966-1967 guerrilla insurgency in that country. Early life and education Douglas Henderson was born in Massachusetts on October 15, 1914. He was one of seven children and grew up in the nearby town of Massachusetts in a home built by his father, a professional carpenter. Hendersons family was hit hard by the Depression and following his graduation at age 16 from Weston High School in 1931 he worked several odd-jobs to support his family before he was able to obtain a scholarship to attend University where he studied economics, graduating Beta Kappa in 1940. The following year he went on to receive a masters degree in law and diplomacy from the School at  College in Massachusetts and participated in the Ph.D program there while also employed as an instructor of history. Following Americas entry into War II he left the university to pursue a diplomatic career, joining the States Foreign Service in 1942. That same year he married Dorothy Frances, a dietician from Massachusetts. Early diplomatic career Hendersons initial diplomatic assignments saw him appointed to various consular posts in America: Mexico (19421943) Chile (1943) and Bolivia (19431947). Henderson was next posted to the of Commerce in Washington, DC where he worked as a financial analyst for the American Republics Branch of the Office of International Economics (19471950). It was while serving in this position that he authored a significant section of President S. Trumans 1949 inaugural address which laid the groundwork for the creation of the States Department of States so-called Point Four Program, designed to increase the sharing of American scientific and industrial expertise with underdeveloped countries.Following his service at the Commerce Department, Henderson was appointed First Secretary of the US Embassy in Switzerland (19501956). He returned to the United States after being named Assistant Director of the State Departments Economic Defense Administration (19561959). After participating in the Foreign Service Institutes Senior Officers Training Course, Henderson was next assigned to the American embassy in Lima, Peru, first as the Chief Economics Officer (19601962) and later promoted to the position of daffaires (19621963). When the military overthrew the pro-American government of Prado in a July 1962 coup the administration of President F. Kennedy responded by withdrawing its ambassador, leaving Henderson as the de facto chief of the US embassy in Lima. His skillful and competent service in the tumultuous months following the coup, during which US-Peruvian relations were severely strained, brought Henderson to the attention of his superiors in Washington. On November 8, 1963 Henderson was appointed to serve as States Ambassador to Bolivia by President F. Kennedy. His appointment was reconfirmed by President B. Johnson following Kennedys assassination later that same month, making him the first American graduate of the School to achieve the rank of ambassador.US Ambassador to BoliviaWhen Henderson assumed his new post in the Bolivian capital of Paz in December 1963 the nation was in a state of tremendous turmoil. The government of President Paz Estenssoro was moribund and subject to deep internal divisions. More alarming from the American perspective were the frequent clashes between government forces and militant tin miners, protesting the governments plans to overhaul the mining industry. In the climate of the War the weakness of the Paz government and the growing radicalism of Bolivias miners aroused fears among many US policymakers that the nation was vulnerable to subversion by pro-communist elements, specifically those aligned with Cuban leader Castro. In an effort to address these concerns Henderson sought to cultivate a close personal relationship with President Paz Estenssoro and to persuade him to confront Bolivias problems more forcefully. He succeeded in the former case but the Paz governments internal weaknesses continually frustrated his larger goals. Matters changed drastically on November 4, 1964 when Paz Estenssoro was deposed in a coup that installed General Barrientos, the charismatic former commander of the Air Force, as President. Henderson, despite serious his misgivings about the ability of the Paz administration to govern Bolivia effectively, opposed the coup. This opposition also put him at odds with many in the Pentagon and Intelligence Agency (CIA), where Barrientos reputation as a staunch anti-communist and positive disposition toward American interests made him extremely popular. Hendersons disquiet notwithstanding, the new  regime did implement many of the policies he had advocated but had been ignored by the previous government. Barrientos employed the army to swiftly pacify the rebellion amongst the tin miners and welcomed American efforts to modernize Bolivias outmoded military. What had previously been a relatively modest program of American aid to the Bolivian armed forces became a veritable flood under Barrientos. As the relationship between Bolivia and the U.S. grew Henderson began to acquire a great deal of influence in La Paz, even becoming a regular attendee of President Barrientos cabinet meetings. He also astutely pressured the regime to use some of the U.S. aid it was receiving to serve political ends, convincing Barrientos to employ civil action programs such as the building roads, bridges and schools as a means of improving the regimes image with the Bolivian public.Che Guevaras Bolivian CampaignThe greatest trial faced by Henderson during his time as States Ambassador to Bolivia was the incipient war launched in the nations mountainous southeast during the later months of 1966 by Cuban-backed communist insurgents under the command of the iconic Argentine-Cuban revolutionary Che Guevara. When fighting began in the early spring of 1967 the guerrillas managed to stage numerous successful attacks against the Army. However, their movement failed to gain traction when expected popular support for the guerrillas among the campesinos, Bolivias peasant farmers, failed to materialize. Nevertheless the revelation of Guevaras presence in Bolivia caused panic within the nations government and military. This was reflected in claims made to Henderson by President Barrientos that the guerrilla force comprised between 100 to 200 men, four times its actual size. Henderson was rightfully dubious and assessed that the Bolivians were exaggerating the strength of the guerrillas in an opportunistic effort to secure greater military aid from the U.S. The military priorities of the Bolivians clashed with those of Henderson who sought to limit direct American involvement in the guerrilla episode as much possible. Henderson counseled Barrientos to accept a more modest aid package, one which included a detachment of American Berets who would train a unit of Bolivian Army Rangers in counter-insurgency warfare. Unbenownst to Henderson his successful efforts to curb US involvement undercut one of the major political goals of Guevaras overall plan, which was to provoke a substantial American military response to his presence in Bolivia that would enable the guerrillas to cast their struggle as resistance to imperialism. Henderson also endeavored to soften the Barrientos regimes hard-line image following the capture in April 1967 of Debray, a prominent French Marxist intellectual who had been arrested by Bolivian authorities after he was found to have been in contact with the guerrillas. The Bolivians initial intent was to summarily execute Debray as an enemy combatant, however Henderson (in response to an outpouring of international appeals on behalf of Debray from such luminaries as de Gaulle and Sartre) used his influence to convince Barrientos to spare the Frenchmans life and instead have him stand trial. This incident proved hugely unpopular with the Bolivian military and likely played a major role in the events following Guevaras capture in October, 1967 by US-trained Bolivian counter-insurgency troops. Anxious to avoid a repeat of the Debray affair Barrientos ordered Guevaras execution within 24 hours after he was taken into custody and did not fully inform Henderson of the details surrounding the incident, withholding official confirmation of Guevaras death until a week after the guerrilla leader had been executed by the army in the village of Higuera. Henderson had in fact been previously directed by Washington to secure Guevara alive if possible, so that he might be interrogated by the CIA.Later diplomatic career and retirementWhen his wife Dorothy Frances became seriously ill during the aftermath of the guerrilla episode Henderson resigned as States Ambassador to Bolivia in August 1968 and returned to the United States settling with his family in Virginia where his wife would die later that year. He continued his work for the State Department where, despite the seeming success of his ambassadorship, his time in Bolivia had served to undercut Hendersons diplomatic career. This was due in large part due to his unpopularity with the Pentagon and CIA stemming from his early opposition to the 1964 coup by Barrientos and his sometimes rocky relationships with US military officials who resented his efforts to rein in the influence and involvement of American forces during the Guevara insurgency. Also harmful to Hendersons career was a British documentary film that had been made in Bolivia during the height of the insurgency in which Henderson had appeared and given an interview. The film depicted Henderson himself in an unflattering light and in addition was also highly critical of both the United States and the Barrientos regime. The film and Hendersons involvement in it proved a major embarrassment for both him and the State Department. Henderson would go on to hold several mid-level bureaucratic posts in the State Departments of Inter-American Affairs before being appointed to a sub-ambassadorial post as the Deputy US Representative to the of American States in charge of social and economic issues. It was during this time that he met his second wife Marion, whom he married in 1970. He retired from the State Department in 1975 and returned to his hometown of Massachusetts where he later began a second career as the president of Lands Sake, a nonprofit group he had co-founded in 1980 to promote the benefits of small-scale land use in farming and educational programming.He died at his home in Weston on July 14, 2010 at the age of 95 following a battle with cancer.(accessdate)() References Further reading*
30750224
Namibian_Institute_of_Mining_and_Technology
The Namibian Institute of Mining and Technology (NIMT) is a technical institute in Namibia. It offers courses in mining, manufacturing and engineering. (Namibia Institute of Mining and Technology (NIMT) Schoolnet.na) In 2007, Beers donated N$2.1 million to open a second, northern campus and in November of that year a campus was opened in Tsumeb.(De Beers funds northern campus Namibian, 27 November 2007)In 2006, De Beers Marine Namibia donated used mining equipment to NIMT. Equipment included a hydraulic pump, gearbox and motor, a high-pressure pump and electrical motors.(Students to benefit from mining donation Namibian, 3 August 2006)BurgarlyIn September 2009, thieves broke into the main office of the Institute by smashing a window and disabling the alarm. They stole N$350,000 and used a duplicate key to gain entry to the safe. The funds were designated for the registration, accommodation and transportation of trainees. Police believed they were somehow affiliated with the Institute and a N$20,000 award was offered for information.(N$350 000 theft at NIMT Namibian, 15 September 2009)References
30774638
Kwasi_Boakye
Kwasi Boakye (24 April 1827 - 9 June 1904), sometimes archaically spelt as Aquasi Boachi, was a Dutch engineer who was born a of Ashanti. He was sent in 1837, together with his cousin Kwame Poku, to the Netherlands to receive education by Ashanti king Kwaku Dua I, as part of larger negotiations between Ashanti about the recruitment of Ashanti soldiers for the East Indies Army.(Ineke van Kessel - The Black Dutchmen: The Story of African Soldiers in The Netherlands East Indies)Although Kwame Poku did return to the Gold Coast as planned, Kwasi Boakye stayed in the Netherlands. He was thought of to be more intelligent than his cousin and was subsequently trained as a mining engineer at the fore-runner of University, where he graduated in 1847. In 1850, he was sent to the East Indies. There he was discriminated by his superior Cornelius de Groot, for which he received financial compensation in 1857. As part of the compensation, he was awarded an estate in Bantar Peteh, south of Buitenzorg. He died on this estate in 1904.Dutch writer Japin wrote a novel about his life named De zwarte met het witte hart (1997). It was  translated as Two Hearts of Kwasi Boachi.(Michael Pye - Displaced Person, New York Times Book Review)Publications* Boachi, Aquasie (1855) Onderzoek naar de kolen, gevonden langs het strand der Meeuwenbaai, residentie Bantam. Natuurkundig Tijdschrift van Nederlands-Indi, IX, p. 49* Boachi, Aquasie (1856) Onderzoek naar het aanwezen van steenkolen in het terrein aan de Tjilaloekbaai (Preanger Regentschappen) . Natuurkundig Tijdschrift van Nederlands-Indie, XI, p. 461* Boachi, Aquasie (1856) Mededeelingen over de Chinezen op het Eiland Java. Bijdragen tot de Taal-, Land- en Volkenkunde, Volume 4, nr 2, pp. 303-307.GalleryFile:Aquasi Boachi and Quamin Poko by JL Cornet.jpg|Painting of Kwasi Boakye and Kwame Poku by J.L. Cornet.File:Portrait of Aquasi Boachi.jpg|Painting of Kwasi Boakye of when he was a student in Freiberg.File:Aquasi Boachi with his children.jpg|Kwasi Boakye with two of his children on Java in 1900.See also*Gold CoastReferences   Boachi
30792629
SA-15_(ship)
{||-| Classification:| USSR Register of Shipping Ship power                |-| Main engines:| 2  Wrtsil-Sulzer 14ZV40/48 (2  7,700 kW)|-| Auxiliary engines:| 5  Wrtsil-Vasa 624 TS (5  810 kW) Ship speed                |-| Design speed:| 17 knots|-| Accommodation:| 42 crew10 passengers|}SA-15 is the project name for a series of icebreaking multipurpose ships built in Finland for the Union in the 1980s. The ships, capable of independent operation in all prevailing arctic ice conditions, were the first merchant vessels designed for year-round operations in the Sea Route. For this purpose they have hulls that resemble those of polar icebreakers and robust propulsion systems capable of withstanding the excessive ice loads.(While the ships are also known as the Norilsk-class after the first ship, Norilsk, they are usually referred to by their project name which denotes a subarctic 15,000 DWT cargo ship.(Kitagawa, H. et al. Northern Sea Route. Shortest Sea Route Linking East Asia and Europe. Ship & Ocean Foundation, 2001. ISBN 4-88404-027-9.) Nineteen SA-15 class ships were delivered by Finnish shipbuilders Wrtsil and Valmet in 19821987 and  nine remain in service.( History Maintaining year-round traffic in the Northern Sea Route, especially between Murmansk and Dudinka, the most important ports in the Soviet arctic region, had always been a high priority to the Soviet Union due to the economic exploitation of the vast natural resources of the northern regions. Northern Sea Route is also an important link between Europe and Asia as it significantly reduces the transit time in comparison to the route through the Canal. However, while the Soviet Union had a large fleet of ice-strengthened cargo ships, the year-round operation along the Northern Sea Route had primarily relied on the large icebreakers. In the late 1970s Sudoimport, the Soviet foreign trade organization with a monopoly for the foreign trade of ships, requested for tenders for the design and construction of 20,000 DWT arctic cargo ships according to the specifications laid out by the of the Merchant Marine of the Soviet Union (MORFLOT).(( Development and construction Leading Finnish shipbuilders Wrtsil and Valmet both developed designs that met the requirements for the new class of arctic cargo ships capable of year-round operation in the Northern Sea Route, Wrtsil using knowledge and experience gained from building more than half of the worlds icebreaker fleet in service at that time and Valmet from several types of ice strengthened cargo ships the company had built in the 1960s and 1970s, and an initial order for nine ships, six for Wrtsil for FIM 1.2 billion(Miljarditilaus Wrtsillle - Kuusi jtmurtavaa monitoimialusta NL:oon. Navigator 9/80. Page 41.) and three for Valmet for FIM 600 million(Uusi aluevaltaus Valmetille - Kolme arktisen liikenteen monikyttalusta NL:oon. Navigator 9/80. Page 42.), was placed in July 1980.( Wrtsils order was the largest single contract made by a Finnish industrial company.( In the following year three more ships were ordered from Wrtsil and two from Valmet, resulting in a total order of 14 ships worth of FIM 3.5 billion.((Jttitilaus toimitettu. Navigator 5/84.)While initially the idea of ordering two similar but technically different series of ships for the same purpose was to gain operational experience for the future arctic freighters(, shortly after the deal was made public the shipyards approached Sudoimport to agree on a uniform design. Not only was running two parallel development projects wasting effort and resources for the shipyards, but constructing a single type of ships instead of two would bring savings to the customer in form of reduced maintenance and spare part costs. Wrtsils design was chosen as the standard for further development since it was ahead in the production schedule.((Multipurpose vessels Arctic liner trade. Navigator 1982.) However, despite the co-operative measures some dissimilarities between the ships built by Wrtsil and Valmet remained, resulting in the crews considering of them as separate types of ships as the differences were most obvious from the operators point of view.(The first ship of the class, Norilsk from Wrtsil, was delivered in 13 November 1982 from the Shipyard in Turku, half a year behind schedule due to the prototype nature in many of its systems.(Avain rikkauksiin. Navigator 1/83.) The first ship from Valmet, Nizhneyansk, was delivered from the shipyard in Helsinki on 21 January 1983, about three months ahead of the contracted delivery time.(NIZHNEYANSK from Valmet. Navigator 3/83. Page 17.) The remaining twelve ships were delivered in 19831984.File:Vasiliy Burkhanov 20070824.jpg|thumb|left|Vasiliy Burkhanov, one of the five slightly different SA-15 Super class ships that were ordered from Valmet in 1984. However, major features such as the icebreaker bow remained the same.Shortly after the last SA-15 class ships of the initial order, Anadyry from Valmet and Nikel from Wrtsil, were delivered on 23 and 30 March 1984, respectively(, Valmet received a follow-up order from Sudoimport for five more ships of the same type. The contract, finalized on 13 July 1984, was worth of FIM 1.5 billion (US$263M) and was the biggest single order ever received by Valmet.(Kaikesta Huolimatta: SA-15. Navigator 9/1984.) Minor modifications were made to the design based on the operators experiences during the exceptionally hard arctic winter(Finlands orderbook boosted by Soviet five year plan. The Motor Ship, Volume 65, Issue 767, June 1984. Page 11.), resulting in a subclass sometimes referred to as SA-15 Super.(Murmansk Shipping Company: Dry Cargo fleet - SA-15 Super. ) The ships were built in 19851987 and the final ship, Kaptain Danilkin, was delivered on 17 June.( Operational history While the first ships suffered from prototype problems and returned to the shipyard for repairs under warranty, the feedback from the operators was generally positive from the beginning especially regarding the performance of the ships in difficult ice conditions which was deemed superior to earlier ULA class freighters. The vessels were capable of breaking level ice up to  in thickness while maintaining a speed of 12 knots and proceed in even thicker ice by ramming.( Later reports state that the ships could maintain an average speed of 6 knots in winter and 12 knots in summer while operating in the Northern Sea Route(Mulherin, N et al. The Northern Sea Route - Its Development and Evolving State of Operations in the 1990s. Regions Research and Engineering Laboratory (CRREL), April 1996. ) and were capable of continuously breaking  ice at five knots.( With assistance from Arktika class nuclear icebreakers the ships could operate in level ice with thickness of  at two knots under their own power without towing(Brigham, L. W. Natural Conditions, Ice Navigation and Ship Design  Pushing the Limits. The 21st century  turning point for the Northern Sea Route? Proceedings of the Northern Sea Route User Conference, Oslo, 18-20 November 1999. Pages 57-62.), but if the freighter is attached to the icebreakers stern notch for close towing, the combination could maintain a speed of four knots in similar ice conditions, the same as the speed of the icebreaker when operating alone.(The strength of the SA-15 class ships was further proven when icebreaker Admiral Makarov, after having been immobilized for five days, pushed the freshly delivered Nizhneyansk at full power through the ice separating the vessels from Pevek, arriving at the city as the first ships of the year 1983.(Horensma, P. The Soviet Arctic. Taylor & Francis e-Library, 2005. ISBN 0-203-16806-2.) During the particularly difficult season, during which around fifty cargo ships were trapped in ice in the Siberian Sea, the SA-15 class freighters were sent to the Northern Sea Route as soon as they were delivered from the Finnish shipyards to unload cargo from icebound ships and deliver the much-needed supplies to isolated communities along the coast. The ships also acted as escort icebreakers, using their stern notches to tow smaller ships through the ice fields even though it was not their original purpose.( Initial Soviet and Russian owners The largest initial operator was Shipping Company (MSCO) which owned and operated a fleet of ten SA-15 class cargo ships in the western part of the Soviet arctic. It was followed by two companies operating in the eastern regions, East Shipping Company (FESCO) with seven and Shipping Company with two vessels.(References. Aker Arctic Technology Inc. ) Later MSCO transferred three ships to its affiliate, Shipping, and the ships were transferred from Russian to Cypriot register.During the summer sailing season the ships carried cargo along the Northern Sea Route, supplying the settlements and mining colonies on the East Siberian coast, and made several transit voyages from Europe to the Far East and Canada, each 25-day voyage taking around ten days less than a similar voyage through the Suez Canal. In winter the SA-15 class freighters mainly supported the Norilsk-Dudinka operation, providing a continuous flow of non-ferrous metal concentrates to the smelters of the Peninsula and other industries within the Soviet Union(, but also carried other cargo especially when the ice conditions became too difficult for other vessels.( To promote the utilization of the Northern Sea Route cargo space onboard the SA-15 class ships was also leased to Western shipping companies and several experimental voyages for scientific purposes were made in the 1990s.( For years the SA-15 class ships formed the core of the Soviet and later Russian fleet of icebreaking cargo ships.( Bank Line In 1995 Line, a subsidiary of Andrew Weir Shipping Ltd, purchased four SA-15 class ships, Okha, Bratsk, Tiksi and Nikel, for their westbound round-the-world liner service linking Europe to the South Pacific Islands and New Guinea via the Panama and Suez Canals. The ships, no longer required to sail in the arctic conditions, were renamed Speybank, Arunbank, Foylebank and Teignbank and converted in the Kingdom for the South Pacific service.(Ship Nostalgia: Bank Line - Part 7. ) In 2006 China Navigation Co Ltd, the deep-sea shipping arm of John Swire & Sons Ltd, bought the business from Andrew Weir Shipping. The ships, while still managed by Bank Line, were time chartered, renamed to Mahinabank, Tikeibank, Gazellebank and Boularibank, and sent to Singapore for drydocking and extensive refits. Later the company also chartered a fifth SA-15 class ship, but unlike the others it was not rebuilt and retained its Russian identity. However, due to the economic downturn of 2009 the round-the-world cargo liner service was discontinued and the four SA-15 class ships were returned to their original owner and sold for scrap in late 2009.(The Ocean Liner Virtual Museum: Bank Line (Andrew Weir & Co. Ltd). )(Barry Rogliano Salles: Andrew Weir & Co  A profile of the company. )The end of Bank Lines SA-15 class ships was not without incident. On 28 April 2009, on her last complete voyage in round-the-world service, the Boularibank was attacked by Somalian pirates 120 miles northeast of Island at the entrance to the of Aden. Unable to outrun the attackers, Captain Peter Stapleton carried out evasive manoeuvres while under fire from the assailants AK-47s and RPGs and had his crew ward off the invaders using water cannons, twistlocks and heavy balks of timber lashed to the guard rails. By the time a destroyer of the Navy arrived at the scene the pirates had given up, leaving the Boularibanks crew of 31, eleven passengers and the captains wife unharmed. Stapleton was later awarded the Navy Medal for exceptional bravery during the attack.((Skippers award for repelling a pirate attack. Times, 24 October 2009. )(Captains log fends off pirates. The Sun, 4 May 2009. )Another converted SA-15 class ship, the Foylebank, was briefly featured in the 2000 drama film Away as the ship that rescues the character portrayed by Hanks. Other operators While  the majority of the SA-15 class ships remain under Russian ownership, in addition to the four ships operated by Bank Line several SA-15 class freighters have found their way to the second-hand market since the 1990s and several were sold to non-Russian owners.In 1996 the Nizhneyansk was sold to a Liberian company Shipping Corporation and renamed Magdalena Oldendorff. Operated by a German shipping company Carriers, a subsidiary of Olderdorff, the ship was chartered in 2000 as a support ship for the 20th Indian Antarctic Expedition. On 11 June 2002 the Magdalena Oldendorff, while on her second voyage to the Base, was immobilized by pack ice. 79 Russian scientists and 11 crew members were airlifted by helicopters to the African research ship S.A. Agulhas and returned to Town. After an unsuccessful rescue attempt by the Argentine icebreaker Almirante Irzar in late August a decision was made for the ship to winter in the of Muskegbukta and attempt to free itself when the ice started to melt with the beginning of the Antarctic summer. In late November the Magdalena Oldendorff freed itself and returned to Cape Town for the Christmas.(MAGDALENA OLDENDORFF. Shades Stamp Shop Ltd. )( Magdalena Oldendorff Assist Mission. Unofficial website of ARA Admirante Iztar. ) The ship was resold in 2003 and 2010, and is currently sailing again under Russian ownership as Captain Kurbatskiy. The ship was in news again in June 2011 when four crew members died after consuming alcohol that turned out to be methanol.(m/v Captain Kurbatskiy tragedy  full report. 7/9/2011. )In early 2009 another SA-15 class ship, the Monchegorsk, became the centre of an international incident involving Iran, Egypt, Russia, the States, Israel, the territories and Cyprus. American naval ships of the Task Force 151 alerted the Egyptian officials after the ship left an Iranian port and headed for the Suez Canal. The ship was forced into an Egyptian port and munitions, believed to be headed to the Strip, were found hidden in the cargo. However, the officials had no evidence that this was in violation of the Nations Security Council Resolution 1747, which prohibits Iran from exporting weapons, and the ship was released. After leaving the Canal the Monchegorsk, flying a Cypriot flag, was boarded and escorted to the of Limassol.(The Mysterious Monchegorsk. Strategy Page, 2009. ) This resulted in a diplomatic struggle in which Israel and the US maintained that the shipment was in violation of the UN resolution, Israel claimed that the weapons were heading for the Palestinian organizations in the Gaza strip and Iran denied everything. The Cypriot officials made a decision to unload the suspicious cargo of 98 containers from the ship and keep it in Cyprus.()(http://www.cyprus-mail.com/news/main.php?id44034&cat_id1) The ship was sold for scrap shortly after the incident. On 11 July 2011, more than two years later, the confiscated containers, stored in the open under allegedly inappropriate conditions at the Florakis Naval Base near Mari, exploded, leaving 12 people dead and 62 injured. The explosion created a  crater and caused widespread damage to the naval base and the nearby power station of Vasilikos.() Future Despite decades of service in some of the harshest operating conditions on the planet no SA-15 class freighters have been lost. However, even the newest ships are almost 25 years old and approaching the end of their economic life. The increasing operating costs of the old vessels with relatively large crews will eventually force the shipping companies currently operating old SA-15 class ships in their fleet to retire them and look for replacements especially for the more demanding arctic routes. Most of the remaining SA-15 class freighters have been transferred to southern routes for their final years and have become a common sight especially in Chinese ports.In 20062011 Norilsk Nickel built a series of six 14,500 DWT double acting ships to replace the ageing fleet of MSCO-owned SA-15 class ships used to support the Norilsk-Dudinka operation.(Year-round Arctic Marine Transport to Dudinka in Support of Natural Resource Development and Production. The Protection of the Arctic Marine Environment (PAME). ) In November 2010 one of these new vessels capable of breaking ice up to  thick when operating astern(Norilskiy Nickel a Breakthrough in Cost Efficient Arctic Transports. Aker Arctic Technology Inc. ), Monchegorsk, became the first ship to traverse the eastern part of Northern Sea Route without icebreaker assistance when it sailed from Murmansk via Dudinka to Shanghai.(Icebreaking container vessel Monchegorsk, successiful Arctic voyage. SeaNews Turkey, 17 November 2010. )The first SA-15 class ship to be scrapped was Kandalaksha which was sold for demolition to China in the spring of 2009.(From April 4th to June 26th. Robin Des Bois, July 9th 2009. ) It was followed by the four ships operated by Bank Line  Boularibank was sold to be broken up in India and Gazellebank, Tikeibank and Mahinabank in Bangladesh during the second half of 2009  and Monchegorsk that arrived at the breakers in China in late 2009.(From June 27th to September 24th. Robin Des Bois, September 30th, 2009. )(From September 25th to December 31st. Robin Des Bois, January 21st, 2010. ) In 2010 they were joined by Kola and Norilsk which were recycled in India and Huangpu, China, respectively.(( The first vessels of this type to be scrapped in 2011 were the Arkhangelsk, withdrawn from the register on 17 May(, and the Emerald Sea, reported to be bound for breakers in Alang in late May.(Ship demolitions / to be broken up 30th May 2011. The Ship Scrapping List. ) It is likely that the remaining SA-15 class ships will be sold for scrap in the coming years as they reach the end of their economical life. Design  General characteristics The SA-15 class multipurpose cargo ships have a maximum overall length of ( or  with the stern notch excluded.( Their hulls are  long at the waterline and their between perpendiculars is .( The breadth of the ships, like all other cargo ships operating in the Northern Sea Route, is limited to  by the size of the escorting icebreakers.( The shallow waters of the Northern Sea Route limit the draught to , but outside the arctic their cargo capacity can be increased by allowing the ice-strengthened parts of the hull to become submerged.( Increasing the draught to  increases their displacement to from 27,660 tons to 31,000 tons and deadweight tonnage from 16,600 to around 23,000 tons.( While there are minor differences in tonnage and displacement between ships and the actual figures differ slightly from the design values, the gross tonnage (GT) of the SA-15 class cargo ships is generally around 18,600 and net tonnage (NT) at summer load waterline ranges from around 8,700( to roughly 9,000, being smaller for the newer SA-15 Super class ships. At the arctic subdivision line the net tonnage is reduced to 6,300.(The SA-15 class freighters have a design speed of 17 knots at the design draught of  and 90% MCR (13,860 kW)(, but are capable of reaching speeds up to 18.1 knots.( However, the actual service speed of the ships when fully laden is slightly lower, 12 knots with one or 15 knots with both main engines.(Anatoliy Kolesnichenko, Far East Shipping Company. ) The fuel capacity, 3,740 m3 of fuel oil and 783 m3 of oil, gives them an operational range of 16,000 nautical miles in open water. The ships carry enough provisions for 60 days of operation.(The ships provide accommodation for 52 people, including five double cabins for passengers, and extensive facilities such as library, photographic laboratory, film projector room, swimming pool, sports room, two combined messes and dayrooms, hospital and separate saloons for passengers and the captain. The accommodation spaces have an effective thermal insulation, heating and air conditioning to maintain comfortable inside temperature while the outside temperature varies from  to .( The SA-15 class ships also have several special features not commonly found in cargo ships, such as a lookout post in the bow for surveying the ice conditions in front of the ship.(In addition to the official names, the SA-15 class ships are sometimes called carrots because of the shape and orange colour of their hulls.( Special features The harsh operating conditions of the arctic seas place high requirements on the strength, reliability and redundancy of the hull and propulsion machinery, especially for single-screw ships operating independently without icebreaker escort.(Hkkinen, P. Laivan koneistot. TKK laivalaboratorio, M-179, Otaniemi, 1993. ISBN 951-22-1780-5.) For this reason the hull form of the SA-15 class freighters resembles that of icebreakers and their robust propulsion system has several innovative features and prototype arrangements to improve the ships operational capability.((Evolution of the SA-15 hull and propeller design. The Motor Ship, Volume 64, Issue 753, April 1983. Page 69.) Special attention has also been paid on the ships general purpose characteristics by designing the cargo storage and handling facilities to allow various different types of cargo.(( Hull File:MV Kandalaksha 20070930.jpg|thumb|The stern notch of the SA-15 class ships, such as the Kandalaksha, allows safe assistance from icebreakers in particularly difficult ice conditions.The hull form of the SA-15 class ships, a result of intensive model tests in both open water and model ice, is very different from that of conventional merchant vessels, being more akin to polar icebreakers than traditional cargo ships. The bow design puts equal emphasis on both icebreaking and seakeeping characteristics, meaning that in addition to good icebreaking and manoeuvring capabilities in various ice conditions the vessel must be able to operate in open water without bottom slamming or shipping of green water occurring in rough seas. The sides are flared to prevent the ship from stopping or being damaged when operating in compressive ice fields. The aft part of the hull, while a compromise between good reversing qualities in the ice and low level of propeller-induced vibrations in the stern, is also designed to prevent pieces of ice from coming in contact with the propeller.( The ships are also equipped with stern notches similar to those found in icebreakers, but instead of towing other ships they are meant to be used to allow safe assistance from icebreakers in particularly difficult ice conditions.(The material used in the hull is largely grade E shipbuilding steel which is suitable for cold temperatures down to . A special high-strength steel, Rautaruukki Raex E32 Polar, is used in the main components of the ice zone where it was protected by abrasion-resistant low-friction paint, 160. The thickness of the plating in the ice belt is .(Drent, J. Commercial shipping on the Northern Sea Route. The Northern Mariner/Le Marin du nord, III, No.2, April 1993.) Longitudinal framing is used except in the side area between double bottom and tweendeck, which has transverse framing to improve the distribution of ice loads on the side shell.( Propulsion and power Propulsion power is provided by two 14-cylinder Wrtsil-Sulzer 14ZV40/48 4-stroke medium-speed diesel engines running on heavy fuel oil, each with a maximum continuous output of  at 560 rpm.( As a precaution against failure of the propeller pitch control mechanism the main engines are directly reversible.( The fuel consumption while underway is 76 tons per day(Mulherin, N et al. Development and Results of a Northern Sea Route Transit Model. Regions Research and Engineering Laboratory (CRREL), 1996. ), but to save fuel costs only one main engine is used when operating in open water.(The main engines are connected to a single propeller shaft through a double input/single output single-stage reduction gear manufactured in Finland by Valmet Rautpohja Works in co-operation with Renk AG. The gearbox is equipped with separate Renk multi disc clutches and Voith couplings for the main engines. The hydrodynamic couplings that allow over 100% slipping between input and output shafts are used in difficult ice conditions to increase propeller torque and protect the main engines from large torque variations resulting from propeller blades hitting the ice. The gearbox itself is also designed to withstand the high thrust and torque loads caused by an open propeller operating in ice  the gear teeth are dimensioned to withstand loads up to five times the nominal value.(( The fully locking mechanical clutches are used to improve fuel efficiency when the ship is operating in open water or light ice conditions.(The 13-metre () propeller shaft weighs 66 tons and has a large external diameter,  in the stern part.((Weldmar Ltd: Example of the executed work. ) The shaft line is designed according to a certain hierarchy of strength, meaning that if the maximum load is exceeded, yielding occurs in predefined points before components that are more expensive or difficult to repair are damaged. Because the propeller pitch control unit is located at the end of the propeller shaft on the other side of the gearbox, no cutouts that would reduce the strength of the shaft are needed.( Because the power output per shaft of the SA-15 class freighters was at that time one of the highest among icebreaking ships, second only to the Arktika class nuclear icebreakers, their propellers are of extremely robust design.( The 5.6-metre (), 68-ton, four-bladed steel pitch propellers were developed and manufactured by KaMeWa specially for the SA-15 project.( The propeller hubs, which house the pitch adjusting mechanism dimensioned for arctic ice conditions, have a diameter of  and were, at the time of the building, the largest ever constructed.(KaMeWalle potkurien suurtilaus. Navigator 1/81.)Instead of thrusters the ships are equipped with Air Bubbling System (WABS). Pressurized air released from nozzles located below the waterline lubricates the hull and, by reducing friction between steel and ice, improves the ships ability to operate in difficult ice conditions such as pressure ridges and reduces the risk of becoming stuck in ice. The system can also be used to steer the ship at low speeds.(For electricity production the ships have four auxiliary generating sets, Wrtsil-Vasa 624TS 4-stroke medium-speed diesel engines driving 1000 kVa Strmberg alternators. One of the four engines, each with a power output of 810 kW at 750 rpm, can also be coupled to a radial compressor to serve the air bubbling system. A fifth engine of the same type is dedicated to drive a second compressor. Instead of heavy fuel oil the auxiliary generating sets run on marine diesel oil. Theres also an emergency diesel generator of Soviet origin that has a power output of 100 kW at 1500 rpm.( Icebreaking capability The SA-15 class freighters are designed to break level ice up to one metre () in thickness with a snow layer of  in continuous motion without icebreaker assistance and operate in all prevailing ice conditions encountered in the arctic regions such as ridges and compressive ice.( Designed for year round operation in the North Sea Route, the freighters were intended to operate unescorted during the summer navigation period and, if necessary, with assistance from the Arktika class icebreakers in the more severe ice conditions during winter.( The ships are equipped with a stern notch, similar to the towing notches found in icebreakers, to allow safe pushing assistance from an icebreaker.(The ships were the first freighters in ten years to be built to the highest Soviet ice class notation available for merchant ships, ULA.( Their hulls, rudders and propulsion systems were dimensioned according to the then-latest ice class rules of the USSR Register of Shipping. When the ships are loaded to a deeper draught, their ice class is reduced to UL which, despite being slightly lower, is still equivalent to the highest Finnish-Swedish ice class, 1A Super.((The equivalence between the Finnish-Swedish ice classes and the ice classes of classification societies. Finnish Maritime Administration Bulletin No. 16/27.11.2002.) Cargo handling The SA-15 class freighters are capable of carrying a wide variety of cargo ranging from general and dry bulk cargoes to containers and trailers. Heavy cargo up to 80 tonnes and long goods up to  can also be carried. The ships, designed to serve the remote arctic regions, are also equipped with flexible cargo handling equipment for loading and unloading in undeveloped ports. The cargo gear is designed to operate normally at an ambient temperature of  and maintain operational condition at temperatures as low as . It is also extensively winterized by arranging most of the operating equipment inside the cargo access units.(The ships have five holds fitted with tweendecks, four forwards and one abaft of the superstructure, with a total grain capacity of 31,181 cubic metres. The foremost hold, No. 1, is specially designed for the carriage of explosives for the mining industry, inflammable liquids and chemicals in packages, and for this reason has a separate seawater fire extinguishing system that can also be used to cool the bulkhead between the foremost holds. Lower holds No. 2, 3 and 4 are designed for bulk cargoes such as coal, ore and grain. Containers can be carried in all holds and on the hatch covers, and the total container capacity of the SA-15 class ships is 576 equivalent units, forty of which can be refrigerated, or 236 equivalent units. In addition the ships can carry special ten-foot ore concentrate containers in holds No. 2, 3 and 4, with two layers on tank top and one on tweendeck.(For loading and unloading of general cargo, containers and bulk cargo the ships are geared with four deck cranes located on the centerline, one on the aft deck and three forwards of the superstructure. The No. 2 crane on the foredeck is a twin type crane with a lifting capacity of 2  40 tonnes at  while the others are single hydraulic cranes, capable of lifting 20 tonnes, with a maximum outreach of .(The ships can carry roll-on/roll-off cargo on the continuous tweendeck between holds No. 2 and No. 5. The cargo space, which has a capacity of 570 lane metres with a width of 3.0 metres and free height of 4.3 metres, is divided into five watertight compartments with sliding bulkhead doors located between the holds to meet the subdivision requirements. Wheeled cargo can be loaded and unloaded via a 41-tonne stern quarter ramp angled at 65 degrees to the centerline. The 18-metre () ramp has a free driving width of  and can handle cargo weighing up to 56 tonnes. It can also be lowered directly on ice if the thickness exceeds one metre although the resulting slope angle of 17 degrees would be too much for normal vehicles.(While not designed to carry liquid cargo, the ships have a provision to transfer fuel from either side of the ship to another vessel moored alongside.(A novel cargo handling feature of the SA-15 class freighters was an air cushion platform which could be carried on the weather deck and used to transport cargo ashore or directly to a warehouse in locations having little or no cargo handling facilities. These hovercrafts, manufactured by Wrtsil, were powered by a 625 kW stern-mounted diesel engine driving two fans giving the platform a hovering height of . They were capable of carrying a payload of 38 tonnes over ice, water, land and marshy terrain when towed by a tractor or a tug or, if necessary, by using an auxiliary propulsion unit that gave the platform a speed of at least two knots.((Ilmatyynyaluksia. Navigator 5/1981.) However, the air cushion platforms were rarely used and have not been seen onboard the SA-15 class freighters since the 1980s.( SA-15 Super Kolesnichenko 20090809.jpg|thumb|Anatoliy Kolesnichenko and the other SA-15 Super class ships have a folding stern quarter ramp and several other modifications to the original design.When Valmet Oy received a follow-up order for five SA-15 class cargo ships in 1984, some modifications to the ship were made based on the owners experiences during the past winter that had been exceptionally hard.( While the basic design followed that of the other vessels and the general characteristics remained largely the same, due to the changes the last five ships are sometimes referred to as a separate subclass, SA-15 Super.((The majority of the changes were internal. While the module-based design of the engine room, pioneered by the SA-15 class ships, reduced the amount of working hours while building the ship, the piping was completely redesigned to reduce its overall length and make basic maintenance easier. The fifth auxiliary engine was also left out as it was rarely used in actual operation. Winterization was improved by installing heating elements in the double bottom tanks, improving the heating in other ballast water tanks and increasing ice strengthening in some parts of the hull.(Some modifications were made to cargo spaces and cargo handling equipment. The aftmost lower hold was turned into a refrigerated cargo space and a dividing bulkhead was removed from the foremost hold. The tweendeck hatch covers were changed from wire-operated to hydraulic and, due to the rearranging of the aft deck winches and to ease the handling of mooring lines, the aft hatch was made slightly smaller than in the original ships. The capacity of the deck crane in front of the superstructure was increased to 40 tons to allow better handling of ore containers. The stern quarter ramp was also changed to a folding type that would maintain constant pressure on the quay. There were also some changes to the general arrangements of the lowest accommodation deck.(Externally one of the most noticeable changes in addition to the stern ramp was lowering the lookout post in the bow to improve visibility from the bridge.( Bank Line conversion File:Boularibank 20090616.jpg|thumb|left|Boularibank (ex-Nikel) had a bow retrofitted to its icebreaker bow to reduce fuel consumption.The SA-15 class ships purchased by Andrew Weir Shipping were converted at Laird and Tees Dockyard for South Pacific service in 1995 by increasing their cargo-carrying capacity and removing specialized icebreaking features in favor of reduced operating costs. The conversion consisted of retrofitting a bow, faired to the existing icebreaker bow, to reduce the wave resistance and replacing the ice-strengthened propeller blades with more efficient highly skewed blades, designed by KaMeWa, to improve speed and fuel consumption. Six double-bottom tanks were converted from bunker to ballast water tanks while nine wing tanks were converted from ballast to heavy fuel oil and two to dedicated heeling tanks. The cargo-carrying capacity of the ships was increased by converting deep tanks between the cargo holds and below the lower deck in the bow for the carriage of vegetable oils. Their maximum allowable draught was increased to , which substantially increased the ships deadweight tonnage. Other changes included upgrading the cargo handling and lifesaving equipment, converting ten cabins for passengers and installing a new incinerator to deal with the shipboard waste. The stern notch was also no longer needed and thus removed, but the Wrtsil Air Bubbling system was retained for maneuvering.(Innovative Bank Line conversion of former Russian Arctic cargo ships. Shiprepair and Conversion Technology, International Journal of the Royal Institution of Naval Arctitects. 1st Quarter 1996. Pages 3-4.)When China Navigation Co Ltd bought the South Pacific service from Andrew Weir Shipping in 2006, the four SA-15 class freighters were time chartered by the new owner and further modified during drydocking in Singapore. During the refit an additional Wrtsil Auxpac 6L20 generating set, capable of operating on the same grade of heavy fuel oil as the main engines, was installed alongside the existing smaller 624TS gensets and some ballast tanks were converted to heavy fuel oil to increase bunker capacity. Fuel efficiency was further improved by grit blasting the underwater parts to minimize hull roughness and installing ducts and a bulb.(Upgrade for Bank Line quartet. Shiprepair and Conversion Technology, International Journal of the Royal Institution of Naval Arctitects. 1st Quarter 2006. Page 43.) The ships container capacity was also increased to 702 TEU.( List of SA-15 class ships References
30805456
Shelden-Dee_Block
 refnum  82002838()The Shelden-Dee Block is a commercial building located on the corner of Shelden Avenue and Isle Royale Street in Michigan. The building was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1980.(HistoryIn 1890, successful Houghton businessman George C. Shelden purchased property on the corner of Shelden Avenue and Isle Royale Street for $8,500, intending to erect a sandstone building.()  George Shelden died in 1894, before beginning construction.  However, his wife  Mary (Edwards) Shelden partnered with another local businessman, James R. Dee, and hired Chicago architect Henry L. Ottenheimer to design a commercial building for the site,( intending to take advantage of the booming business related to the surge in local mining activity.()  The two investors each took possession of half the building.()  The building was constructed in 1899-1900 by the Chicago- and Houghton-based construction firm of Paul P.F. Mueller.(The first businesses to occupy the four ground-level storefronts were a drug store, a shoe store, a dry goods store, and a caf / saloon; a barber was located in the basement.( The upper floors consisted of office suites; this space was later converted into apartments.(DescriptionThe Shelden-Dee block is a three-story Classical Revival commercial building, constructed from smooth-cut Portage Entry sandstone on the streetside facades and brick on the rear facades.  The facade is symmetrical, with order pilasters separating second- and third- floors windows.  Stone balconies are set int othe third floor, and the arches above doorways feature highly detailed carving.()  A sandstone cornice topped with a second copper cornice surmounts the structure.(The main floor  of the building contains four storefronts lined, each with floor-to-ceiling windows topped with a transom of Luxfer prisms, which scatter incoming light. The second and third floors were originally office space, but have been converted to apartments.(References
30819810
East_Tintic_Mountains
The East Tintic Mountains are a range in central Utah on the east margin of the Basin just west of the front about  south-southeast of Lake City. The community of Eureka is an old mining town near the center of the range. U.S. Route 6 Passes through the central part of the range and through Eureka.The Mining District is located in the central part of the range. The district was an important producer of silver, gold and base metals during the late 19th and early 20th centuries.(Shepard, W. M., H. t. Morris and D. R. Cook, Geology and Ore Deposits of the East Tintic Mining District, Utah, in Ore Deposits of the United States, 1933-1967, John D. Ridge, editor, American Institute of Mining and Metallurgical Engineers, 1968, pp 941-965) References 
30840798
Aster_Glacier
Aster Glacier () is an Antarctic glacier descending the east slope of Massif and flowing between Peak and Ridge into Glacier in the Range, Mountains. It was named by the Committee on Antarctic Names in 2006, after C. Aster, geophysicist with the Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology, who was involved in seismic studies at the Erebus volcano observatory on Island from 1996 to 2002.See also* of glaciers in the AntarcticReferences* 
30850756
Employment_Record_Book
An Employment Record Book is an official personal document recording the employment status of its owner over time. Many European countries issue such documents. The first employment record books are said to have been issued in Reich in 1892 in the mining industry.()Germany, literally labour book.The regulation for Arbeitsbuchs was issued on  for the mining industry. The obligatory identification data required by the regulation included(:*The full name of the owner*Date and location of his birth*Name and the last place of the owners father or guardian*Owners signatureAll this data should be registered with a local police office, thus turning an Arbeitsbuch into a sort of internal passport identity document.File:Arbeitsbuch (1935).jpg|Common Arbeitsbuch.Reich, 19351945.File:Arbeitsbuch fr Auslnder.jpg|Arbeitsbuch for the foreigners.Reich, 19381945.File:Arbeitsbuch 1957 Auenhlle anonymisiert.jpg|Arbeitsbuch (East Germany).DDR, 19571967.Italy, literally labour booklet.The first comprehensive legislative act was adopted here on  ().() Soon after that Italy, whose citizens worked in Libya, transferred this organizational experience to that African country as well.() In recent times a libretto del lavoro was issued by commune authorities in Italy; it was superseded by SIL (Sistema Informativa Laboro) records,() libretto del lavoro were abolished in accordance with a law n. 196/1997.Soviet Union, Russian FederationFile:Trudovaya knizhka USSR (1974) AT-VII.jpg|250px|thumb|Trudovaya knizhka (1974, USSR). (Trudovaya knizhka), plural  , literally labour booklet.File:Trudovaya knizhka 1918.jpg|250px|thumb|Trudovaya knizhka (1918, RSFSR).On  the 5-th All-Russian Congress of Soviets adopted the Constitition of Russia which declared the right and duty to work for all citizen.() Pursuant to this the All-Russian Central Executive Committee (VTzIK) approved the Code (abbr. KZoT) and the Regulations on employment record books as an Appendix to the Article 80 of this Code.() Containing:*Name, surname and date of birth of the labourer*Name and address of the union which the labourer belonged to*Waging category and level assigned to a labourer by a wage-rate commissionthis trudovaya knizhka also supposed trailing benefits received by a labourer( thereby also replacing a paybook (), widely used in industry before the Revolution of 1917. In addition, a special decree was issued on .() Although its title mentioned only Moscow and Petrograd, its text extended the requirements to all the citizen or Russia. The presence of passport was a due prerequisite for receiving the trudovaya knizhka which was issued in exchange of it (art. 3).( Thus becoming the main document for its owner (although photo was not obligatory; art. 12), this trudovaya knizhka reserved pages for recording minor children. It also served as a paybook (art. 5); as place for labeling stamps for social insurance contributions (art. 8) and as a register for rationing coupons (art. 10).(On  a new KZoT, and on  the decree On Identity Cards() were adopted. In 1924 trudovaya knizhka was replaced with  (trudovaya karta, Employment Card), register of data exclusively related to employment.On  the USSR Sovnarkom (SNK) required employers to maintain employment lists (, trudovoy spisok). Instead of employment cards employees were now to claim for excerpts (, spravka) from the employment lists at a place of their work.By the Regulation of SNK as of  On Introduction of Employment Record Books () the latter returned back into use from . The new design of trudovaya knizhka was unified for all branches of industry, governmental and public bodies. From then on they again became the primary source for the calculations of:* accumulated period of work (, seniority, an index used as a base for the calculations of current social benefits, like for temporary disability etc.) during the period of active labor* amounts of the pensions, set upon reaching retirement age and in other casesThe last section of was trudovaya knizhka was reserved for records about material and moral encouragement, gratitudes, honorary titles, orders and medals etc. Penalties were not allowed to be recorded in these books.The Trudovaya knizhka of 1974 series was issued in 15 different series, for each of the 15 republics. The issue for Russia (series AT) had 40 pages. Issues for the other republics had twice more, where page 41 in the middle was a duplicate title page wriiten in the language of the relevant republic. Localized names of the document were: , ,  etc.Slovenia, dual delovni knjiici, plural delovne knjiice, literally labour bookletFile:Delovna knjiica Slovenija.jpg|200px|thumb|Delovna knjiica. Slovenia.The laws (Zakon 4.a Pravilnik o delovni knjiici of , 6. len; The Labour Relations Act of  (ZDR, Zakon o delovnih razmerjih Republike Slovenije, 225. len) required the following obligatory identification data to be supplied with the application for delovna knjiica:()()*Surname and name*Day, month and year of birth*Name of the birth location (including the name of administrative unit and state)*Type of residency in the Republic of Slovenia (permanent or temporary)*Citizenship*information on education, professional development and training*EMO, ID (serial and registration number) of passport or other identity document, date and place of its issue; for foreigners  same data from a foreign travel document or identity card.Applicants shall provide a blank delovna knjiica together with a duly filled application form.The employee must provide employers his delovna knjiica at the conclusion of the employment contract, this requirement is obligatory prerequisite, and employer must confirm taking a booklet from applicant with a written acknowledgment of receipt.The employer must keep delovne knjiice of his employees in custody during the whole period of their labour relationships. Employer also must return delovna knjiica back to the employee at his express request, against a written acknowledgment of receipt from his employee.The ZDR Act (224. len, odstavka 3) requires the employer to log the required data into delovna knjiica. At the termination of the labour contract the employee must immediately receive his employment record book. In the case employer is unable to serve delovna knjiica within 30 days after the labour contract termination, it should be reported to the competent authority in a place of residence of the employee.(Databases from employment record books can be used by the authorized officials of the Ministry of Labour, the Labour Inspectorate and administrative units, when it comes to enforcement of statutory duties and sues.At the end of 2008 it was announced that from  delovna knjiica as the primary source of personal data for the social security issues shall cease its functions functions to ZPIZ (, Pension and Disability Insurance Fund of Slovenia) database.()External linksGermany* Gesetz ber die Einfhrung eines Arbeitsbuchs vom 26. Februar 1935 (RGBl I, S. 311)Slovenia* Pravilnik o delovni knjiici in Pravilnik o spremembah Z 4.a od 5.8.1990* USSR and Russia*       (       ,        ) -  16  2003 . N 225,    06.02.2004 N 51*            10  2003 . N 69*     Lawmix* :  :  *    *  ,     Referenceskitabasde:Arbeitsbuchknjiica
30860198
Rovenky
Rovenky (, translit. Rovenky, , translit. Rovenki) is a mining city in Oblast (province) of south-eastern Ukraine. The city is designated as its own separate raion (district) within the oblast. The current estimated population is around 58,500 (as of 1991).HistoryRovenky was founded in 1705, and was incorporated as a city in 1934. During the Great Patriotic War, Rovenky was occupied by Germany. A group of the underground anti-fascist Komsomol (Communist youth) organization Young Guard operated there.AttractionsThere is a Pamyati pogibshikh museum in the city (In Memory of Dead in English), which is a branch of the Krasnodon-based memorial complex Young Guard. There is also the Common Grave of five members of the Young Guard and a monument, erected in 1965 on the place where they were shot by the Nazis in 1943.External links* Site of Rovenkifr:Rovenkypl:Rowekyro:Rovenkru:th:uk:zh:
30862619
PSE_Mining_and_Oil_Index
The PSE Mining and Oil Index is the main market index of the Stock Exchange for mining and oil companies.The index is probably one of the few indices of the PSE that do not have companies listed on the Composite Index, with the exceptions of the Consolidated Mining Company and Mining Corporation, which are listed on the PHISIX.  However, this index is known to be one of the best performing indices on the PSE in recent years with the recent revival of the Philippine mining industry.The index is composed of the former Mining Index and the Oil Index.  Both indices were merged in a reclassification of the PSEs indices on January 1, 2006.CompaniesThe following are the companies listed on the PSE Mining and Oil Index:*Mining and Industrial Corporation (ticker symbol: AR)*Consolidated Mining and Development Corporation (ticker symbol: AT)*Consolidated Mining Company (ticker symbols: LC and LCB)*Mining Corporation (ticker symbols: MA and MAB)*Mining Corporation (ticker symbols: PX and PXB)*Paragon Mining Corporation (ticker symbol: UPM)See also*Stock Exchange
30864027
Quebec_North_Shore_and_Labrador_Railway
 The Quebec North Shore and Labrador Railway is a Canadian railway that stretches  through the wilderness of northeastern Quebec and western Labrador.  It connects Labrador City, Labrador, with the port of Sept-les, Quebec, on the north shore of the Lawrence River.  QNSL is owned by the Ore Company of Canada (IOC).HistoryBuilt between 1951 and 1954, the QNSL originally connected the port of Qubec on the north shore of the Lawrence River with the  northern terminus at IOCs mining community of Quebec, a distance of .  In 1958, the Wabush ore body near Labrador City was opened by both IOC and the Mining Company.  QNSL built a  line to serve these mines, running west from the Sept-les, Quebec-Schefferville, Quebec, main line at Emeril Junction, Labrador, to Carole Lake, Labrador, near Wabush, Labrador.  Service on this branch began in 1960.At the same time, Wabush Mining Co. built the relatively short Lake Railway from its mines at Labrador City to the QNSL connection at Wabush. QNSL hauls its own traffic from Carol Lake to IOC port facilities at Sept-les, Quebec. QNSL also hauls Wabush Lake Railway traffic from the interchange at Wabush to Arnaud Jct., Quebec, near Sept-les, where it interchanges to the Railway, which then completes the journey around Sept-les Harbour to Wabush Mining Co. port facilities at Point Noire, Quebec.In the 1980s, economic conditions favoured the closing of the Schefferville mining operations in favour of iron ore deposits located further to the south near Wabush and most residents relocated to Labrador City.  QNSL maintained subsidized passenger and freight service for local Nations communities along this portion of its system, known as the Menihek Subdivision, until December 1, 2005, when it sold the Emeril Junction, Labrador-Schefferville, Quebec, rail line to Rail Transportation for the sum of 1$ CAD. QNSL still provides freight services however, transporting employee automobiles, various bulk mine materials, large equipment, and everyday supplies for Labrador City and the various maintenance of way camps.Currently, this railway, along with the Rail Transportation line, Arnaud Railway, Lake Railway, and Bloom Lake Railway, forms an isolated railroad network, as it does not interchange with any other rail lines on the American network.More trafficIn 2010, Consolidated Thompson Iron Mines opened the Bloom Lake Mine, just west of Labrador City, Newfoundland. As part of this new operation, & Wyoming was contracted to operate the Bloom Lake Railway to transport ire ore from the mine to a connection with the Lake Railway. The Lake Railway began acting as a middle man, taking the Bloom Lake Railway trains, and transporting them to Wabush Junction for the Quebec North Shore and Labrador Railway (QNS&L) to transport to the de fer Arnaud just as they would Wabush trains. The Arnaud then takes the trains to the Consolidated Thompsons dock at Quebec.In popular cultureThe construction of the QNSL forms the backdrop for English author Innes, 1958 adventure novel about Labrador, The Land God gave to Cain. Innes spent a period of time with the crews building the railway during his research. External links * Map of the QNSL line*  Map of the QNS&L and Tshiuetin Rail Transportation lines PDF file* Fact Sheet detailing the transaction PDF file* Rail Lines of Northern Qubec* Rail Lines of LabradorNorth Shore and Labrador RailwayNorth Shore & Labradorde fer QNS&LNorth Shore and Labrador Railway
30866002
Bharathappuzha
The Bharathappuzha (Malayalam: ; Indian River), also known as Nila, is a river in India in the state of Kerala. With a length of 209 km, it is the second-longest river in Kerala, after the River. The word Nila indicates the culture more than just a river. Nila has groomed the culture and life of south Malabar part of Kerala. We see the name Peraar indicating the same river in ancient scripts and documents.CourseThe headwaters of main tributary of Bharathappuzha originates in the Hills in the Ghats, and flows westward through Gap, across Palakkad, Thrissur and Malappuram districts of Kerala, with many tributaries joining it, including the River. For the first 40 km or so, the Bharathappuzha follows an almost northerly course till Pollachi. At Parli both Kannadippuzha and Kalpathippuza merge and flow as Bharathappuzha and follows a westerly course until it empties into the Sea at Ponnani. Thootha River merges with Nila at Pallippuram. As Thootha river is rich in water, after its merger, Nila becomes thicker in flow.thumb|right|250px|View of the River.Bridge,Kerala,India2.jpg|thumb|right|250px|The Old Railroad Bridge over Thutha River near its union with Bharathappuzha, built by the British in 1867 which goes into disuse with the construction of new bridges.The river is not navigable along most of its course except the small stretch where it joins the sea. With a watershed of 6,186 km, Bharathapuzha basin is the largest among all the river basins in Kerala. A little more than two-thirds of this area (4400 km) is within Kerala and the remaining area (1786 km) is in Tamil Nadu. Though Bharathapuzha has a large basin, the water flow is relatively less compared to other long rivers in Kerala because a large portion of the basin is located in the comparatively drier regions (Tamil Nadu and Palakkad Gap). The construction of a number of dams after independence has also reduced the river flow. In fact in the summer months, there is almost no flow in most parts of the river. The river is the Nile of Kerala and has the name Nila also.The Bharathappuzha is the lifeline of many cities and villages; (in Chittur, Bharathappuzha is known as Sokanasini, this name was given by Thunjathu Ramanujan Ezhuthachan), (Chittur-Thathamangalam,) (Kodumbu-Thiruvalathur) Palakkad, (Parli-Kottayi), (Mankara-Perigottukurissi ), (Lakkidi-ThiruvilwamalaKillikkurussimangalam, Ottappalam, Shoranur, Cheruthuruthy Pattambi, Thrithala, Thiruvegappura, Kudallur, Pallipuram and Kumbidi. The village of Parudur, including the town of Pallipuram, stand near the confluence of this river and the River Thootha or, simply, Thuthapuzha.Irrigation projectsImage:Road Bridge Over Bharathapuzha.jpg|thumb|left|250px|A view of the railroad bridge over Bharathappuzha, near shoranur.The Bharathappuzha is extensively dammed and there are 11 reservoirs along the course of the river, and two more are under construction. Malampuzha dam is the largest among the reservoirs built across Bharathapuzha and its tributaries. Other dams in the Bharathapuzha basin are: Walayar dam, Mangalam dam, Pothundi dam, Meenkara dam, Chulliyar dam, Thirumoorthy,Aliyar,Upper Aliyar, Chitturpuzha regulator and Kanhirappuzha dam. Most of these reservoirs serve the purpose of irrigation only. A total area of 773 km is irrigated by these irrigation projects. One irrigation dam at Chittur in Attappadi Hills is under construction. The construction of these two dams will increase the area irrigated by another 542 km.Another major project is the Regulator cum bridge at Thrithala built on the Velliyankallu bridge inaugurated by Kerala Chiefminister VS Achyudanandan. The bridge connects the two villages Pallippuram and Thrithala. The main objective of the regulator is drinking watersupply. The water supply projects towards Thrissur district has already started. The shutter height of the regulator is 5 m and it can contain a huge quantity of water. Also the new bridge reduces the distance from Thrissur to Kozhikode by 11 km. This project is the largest in Bharathappuzha in last many decades.thumb|lett|250px|A view of the Velliyamkallu Regulator cum Bridge under construction Cultural Significance Bharathappuzha is the lifeline of Keralas cultural map.Kalamandalam, which is a major center for learning Indian performing arts like Kathakali, Koodiyattam and Ottamthullal, is situated at Cheruthuruty on the banks of this riverin Thrissur district. The birth place of famous Malayalam satire poet and founder of the Ottamthullal art form, Nambiar is located at Killikkurissimangalam near Lakkidi, again on the banks of the Nila. Many leading Malayalam writers who were born along its banks include T. Vasudevan Nair, Govindan, VKN, Vijayan, (M.Sukumaran). Late poet Kunhiraman Nair, a native of north Malabar, drew literary inspiration from the scenic beauty of the landscape along the Bharatapuzha.There are a number of famous Hindu temples like Thiruvilwamala Sree Rama Temple, Thirunavaya Navamukunda Temple, Chamravattam Ayyappa Temple and Panniyur Sree Varahamurthy temple are on the bank of Nila.Legend says that those cremated on the banks of the Bharathappuzha achieve salvation. It is also one of the important places in the state where the sons pay homage to their late fathers by conducting a Pithru Tharpanam ritual on the Karkidaka Vavu day. Some of the famous persons cremated here include literary personalities like O V Vijayan and VKN.TributariesImage:Bharathapuzha fromshoranurbridge.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Bharathapuzha river as seen from the railway bridge at shoranur.Sorted in order from the mouth heading upstream.*Thuthapuzha**Kunthippuzha**Kanjirappuzha**Ambankadavu**Thuppanadupuzha*Gayathripuzha**river**Ayalurpuzha**Vandazhippuzha**Meenkarappuzha**Chulliyar*Kalpathipuzha**Korayar**Varattar**Walayar**Malampuzha*Kannadipuzha**Palar**Aliyar**UpparSee also*of rivers in Kerala*of reservoirs in Kerala Notes External links* Kudallur Village*Nila Foundation Organization* A Frontline article about the problems faced by Bharathapuzha.*An Indiatogether article on Sand Mining in Bharathapuzha*Bharata, To Kill a RiverReferences*  .* .*de:BharathapuzhaBharathapuzhaml:ru:ta:
30873755
Baranof_Island
 additional info  Baranof Island, also sometimes called Baranov Island, Shee or Sitka Island, is an island in the northern Archipelago in the Panhandle, in Alaska.  The name Baranof was given in 1805 by Imperial Russian Navy captain U. F. Lisianski to honor Andreyevich Baranov.()  It was called Sheet-k Xatl (often expressed simply as Shee(  Spelled Shi in Orths citation of Hodge.)) by the native Tlingit people.  It is the smallest of the ABC islands of Alaska.GeographyThe island has a land area of 1,607 square miles (4,162 square kilometers), which is slightly smaller than the State of Delaware.  It measures 100 miles (160 kilometers) by 30 miles (48 kilometers) at its longest point and perpendicular widest point, respectively.  Baranof Island hosts the highest mountain in the Alexander Archipelago, and is the eighth largest island in Alaska, the tenth largest island in the United States, and the 137th largest island in the world.  Its center is near .  Most of the island lies within the limits of National Forest. A large part has been officially designated as the Baranof Wilderness.CommunitiesThe population of the island was 8,532 at the 2000 census.Almost the entire area of the island is part of the City and Borough of Sitka (Sitka also extends northward onto Island); the only part of Baranof that is not in Sitka is a tiny sliver of land (9.75 km) at the extreme southeast corner, which is in the Petersburg Census Area, and includes the town of Port Alexander.  This section had a 2000 census population of 81 persons. The towns of Warm Springs, Armstrong, and Walter are also located on the eastern side of the island. Goddard, a now-abandoned settlement about 16 miles south of Sitka, features a few private homes and hot springs with two public bathhouses.  There are also three year-round salmon hatcheries, one located just north of Port Alexander at Port Armstrong, another located just north of Baranof Warm Springs at Falls, the other just south of Sitka near Lake.  The latter is accessible by private road from Sitka.  All of these communities, except for Port Alexander and Port Armstrong, are under the jurisdiction of the City and Borough of Sitka, of which, Sitka serves as the borough seat. Fishing, seafood processing, and tourism are important industries on the island, which is also famous for bears and deer.Social and economic historyThe first European settlement on island was established in 1799 by Baranov, Chief Manager and first Governor of the Company, for whom the island and Archipelago are named.  Baranov Island was the center of Russian activity in North America during the period from 1804&ndash;1867 and was the headquarters of the Russian fur-trading interest.Around 1900, Baranof Island was subject to many small-scale mining ventures, especially centered around Sitka and on the north side of the island around Rodman Bay.  Canneries, whaling stations, and fox farms were established on Baranof Island and smaller islands around it, though most had been abandoned by the beginning of War II.  The remains of these outposts are still evident, though most exist in a dilapidated condition.The 1939 Report on Alaskan development identified the island as one of the areas where new settlements would be established through immigration.  This plan was never implemented.Fictional accountsLAmours novel Sitka describes conflict between the Russian fur trading empire and Yankee settlers.Yiddish Policemens Union is a 2007 alternate-history novel by Chabon about a Jewish Yiddish-speaking territory in Sitka, including most of Baranov Island.(Novel involving Alaska Jewish colony is rooted in history,  Tom Kizzia, Daily News.) The novel proceeds from the counter-factual premise that the Slattery Report had actually been implemented.Local Author Straley has written a number of mystery novels set on and around Baranof Island.References and notes See also * of geographic features on Baranof Island External links * Tlingit Geographical Place Names for the SheetKa Kwaan &mdash; Sitka Tribe of Alaska, an interactive map of Sitka Area native place names.ast:Baranofca:BaranofIslandsaarde BaranofBaranofgl:BaranofBaranofsalaIslandja:BaranowaBaranoffi:BaranofinsaariIsland
30877317
List_of_tallest_buildings_in_Yellowknife
This list of tallest buildings in Yellowknife ranks buildings over  tall in the city of Yellowknife, Territories, Canada. Yellowknife is the capital and largest city in the Northwest Territories and the largest in Canada. In Yellowknife, there are 8 buildings that stand taller than . The tallest building in the city is the 17-storey,  Centre Square - Northern Heights.() This building was constructed in a postmodernist architectural style, representing the citys efforts to add visual interest into the skyline. The second-tallest building in the city is the Polar Apartments, standing at  tall with 15 storeys.As of 2011, the city contains 3 skyscrapers  and over, with a further 7 high-rise buildings that exceed  in height.() Having a population of approximately 19,000 people, Yellowknife has a skyline that could match a city of 250,000 or more in some cases. This is due to Yellowknifes position in a vast, resource-rich area called Northern Canada, a region larger than India.(quoteThe countrys exact size is subject to debate because some borders are disputed. The Indian government lists the total area as  and the total land area as ; the United Nations lists the total area as  and total land area as .)(Land and freshwater area, by province and territory) More specifically it is the capital of the Northwest Territories which comprise a large part of Northern Canada. Yelloknife is the largest city in Northern Canada, and, as such many companys are headquartered or have bases in the city such as diamond mining and iron mining consortiums, among others. The city acts as a distribution point for many of these resources. Yellowknife is connected to the southern Canadian city of Edmonton via the Yellowknife and Highways.List of tallest buildingsThis list ranks Yellowknife high-rises that stand at least  tall, based on standard height measurement. This includes spires and architectural details but does not include antenna masts.Other notable buildingsNorthwest Territories Legislative BuildingThe Territories Legislative Building is the home of the Government of the Northwest Territories. The most recent building was built in 1993 and commenced usage in 1994. The Legislative Assembly has used many permanent and temporary facilities throughout its history.The current building is two stories tall with two round halls, the Great Hall and the Caucus Room. It is located in Yellowknife, and overlooks Frame Lake. It was designed by Ferguson Simek Clark/Pin Matthews (of Yellowknife) in association with Matsuzaki Wright Architects (of Vancouver), and landscape architect Oberlander.Timeline of tallest buildingsSee also* of Architectural Historians* of Canada* of tallest buildings in CanadaMaps* Centre Square - Northern Heights - * Polar Apartments - * Northwest Tower - * Scotia Centre - * Coast Fraser Tower - * Precambrian Building - * Anderson - Thomson Tower - * Bellanca Building - * Northern United Place - * Explorer Hotel - * Northwest Territories Legislative Building - References
30888839
Software_categories
The concept of software categories is a challenging topic, and with the continuous development of new software it is becoming increasingly difficult to categorize new software. There is no universal agreement regarding Software Categories. However, Microsoft TechNet and Asset Inventory Servicves (AIS) has broken down the extensive list of potential software into seven major categories, along with 40 minor categories. What is interesting is that Microsoft and TechNet have created such extensive categories yet their list fails to mention a large portion of newly developed and available software, open-source software. Although, this is a glaring omission the list created by TechNet and AIS is still quite extensive. Other lists have certainly been created. For instance, The GNU Project  has created its own list of Software based upon the Linux OS. This list is less extensive than TenchNet and AIS, yet it encompasses open-source software. What shall follow is a hybrid list encompassing the vast majority of available software currently known.Open-source Software CategoriesAccording to GNU there are the following categories of software: free software, open source software, domain software, copylefted software, noncopylefted free software, lax permissive licensed software, GPL-covered software, the GNU operating system, GNU programs, GNU software, FSF-copyrighted GNU software, nonfree software, proprietary software, freeware, shareware, private software, and commercial software.(http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/categories.html)Free softwareFree software is software that comes with permission for anyone to use, copy, and/or distribute, either verbatim or with modifications, either gratis or for a fee. In particular, this means that source code must be available. If its not source, its not software. If a program is free, then it can potentially be included in a free operating system such as GNU, or free versions of the GNU/Linux system. There are many different ways to make a program freemany questions of detail, which could be decided in more than one way and still make the program free. Some of the possible variations are described below. Free software is a matter of freedom, not price. But proprietary software companies typically use the term free software to refer to price. Sometimes they mean that you can obtain a binary copy at no charge; sometimes they mean that a copy is bundled with a computer that you are buying, and the price includes both. Either way, it has nothing to do with what is meant by free software in the GNU project.Because of this potential confusion, when a software company says its product is free software, always check the actual distribution terms to see whether users really have all the freedoms that free software implies. Sometimes it really is free software; sometimes it is not.(http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/categories.html)Open source softwareOpen source software is software that is available free of charge. It can be used and disseminated at anypoint, the source code is open and can be modified as required. The one condition with this type of software is that when changes are made users should make these changes known to others. One of the key characteristics of open source software is that it is the shared intellectual property of all developers and users. The Linux operating system is one of the best known examples of open source software(http://www.directimaging.com/www/html/en/glossary/glossaryitems/O)Copylefted softwareCopylefted software is free software whose distribution terms ensure that all copies of all versions carry more or less the same distribution terms. This means, for instance, that copyleft licenses generally disallow others to add additional requirements to the software (though a limited set of safe added requirements can be allowed) and require making source code available. This shields the program, and its modified versions, from some of the common ways of making a program proprietary.Some copyleft licenses block other means of turning software proprietary.Copyleft is a general concept; to copyleft an actual program, you need to use a specific set of distribution terms. There are many possible ways to write copyleft distribution terms, so in principle there can be many copyleft free software licenses. Two different copyleft licenses are usually incompatible, which means it is illegal to merge the code using one license with the code using the other license; therefore, it is good for the community if people use a single copyleft license.(http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/categories.html)Noncopylefted free softwareNoncopylefted free software comes from the author with permission to redistribute and modify, and also to add additional restrictions to it.If a program is free but not copylefted, then some copies or modified versions may not be free at all. A software company can compile the program, with or without modifications, and distribute the executable file as a proprietary software product.The X Window System illustrates this. The X Consortium releases X11 with distribution terms that make it noncopylefted free software. If you wish, you can get a copy which has those distribution terms and is free. However, there are nonfree versions as well, and there are (or at least were) popular workstations and PC graphics boards for which nonfree versions are the only ones that work. If you are using this hardware, X11 is not free software for you. The developers of X11 even made X11 nonfree for a while; they were able to do this because others had contributed their code under the same noncopyleft license.(http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/categories.html)SharewareShareware is software which comes with permission for people to redistribute copies, but says that anyone who continues to use a copy is required to pay a license fee.Shareware is not free software, or even semifree. There are two reasons it is not:For most shareware, source code is not available; thus, you cannot modify the program at all. Shareware does not come with permission to make a copy and install it without paying a license fee, not even for individuals engaging in nonprofit activity. In practice, people often disregard the distribution terms and do this anyway, but the terms do not permit it. (http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/categories.html)FreewareLike shareware, freeware is software you can download, pass around, and distribute without any initial payment. However, the great part about freeware is that you never have to pay for it. No 30 day limit, no demo versions, no disabled featuresits totally free. Things like minor program updates and small games are commonly distributed as freeware. Though freeware does not cost anything, it is still copyrighted, so other people cant market the software as their own.(http://www.techterms.com/definition/freeware)Micrsoft TechNet and AIS Software CategoriesThere are seven major categories according to this classifications, and they are: platform and management, education and reference, home and entertainment, content and communication, operations and professional, product manufacturing and service delivery, and line of business.Platform and managementPlatform and management software includes desktop and network infrastructure and management software that allows users to control the computer operating environment, hardware components and peripherals, and infrastructure services and security.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Education and referenceEducation and reference includes educational software that does not contain resources, such as training or help files for a specific application.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Home and entertainmentApplications designed primarily for use in or for the home, or for entertainment.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Content and communicationsContent and communications applications include common applications for productivity, content creation, and communications. These typically include office productivity suites, multimedia players, file viewers, Web browsers, and collaboration tools.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Operations and ProfessionalUsed for specific job titles; contains applications designed for business uses such as enterprise resource management, customer relations management, supply chain and manufacturing tasks, application development, information management and access, and tasks performed by both business and technical equipment.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Product manufacturing and service deliveryProduct manufacturing and service delivery applications help users create products or deliver services in specific industries. Categories in this section are used by the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS).* Agriculture, Forestry, Fishing and Hunting*Mining, Quarrying, and Oil and Gas Extraction*Utilities*Construction*Manufacturing*Wholesale Trade*Retail Trade*Transportation and Warehousing*Information*Finance and Insurance*Real Estate and Rental and Leasing*Professional, Scientific, and Technical Services*Management of Companies and Enterprises*Administrative and Support and Waste Management and Remediation Services*Educational Services*Health Care and Social Assistance*Arts, Entertainment, and Recreation*Accommodation and Food Services*Public Administration*Other Services (except Public Administration)(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)Line of business*Line of Business*Internal and proprietary line-of-business applications.(http://technet.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb852143.aspx)References
30897464
Coed_Ely_railway_station
 other_name   Coed Ely railway station served the portion of the Valley around the mining communities of Thomastown and Coed-Ely in south Wales, between 1925 and 1958.HistoryThe Valley Railway (EVR) opened between  and  on 2 August 1860, at first for goods trains only; it served several collieries, and was extended to  in December 1862.() A passenger service between Llantrisant, Tonyrefail and Penygraig was introduced on 1 May 1901,() operated by the Western Railway (GWR). After the EVR had been absorbed by the GWR, an additional halt was opened at Coed Ely on 13 July 1925;()() it was situated between Llantrisant and Tonyrefail.()The station was closed when passenger services were withdrawn from the Ely Valley line from 9 July 1958.(ReferencesExternal links*Coed Ely Station on navigable 1947 O.S. mapcol 
30900049
Antony_John_Williams
Antony John Williams, is a British chemist and expert in the fields of both nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectroscopy and cheminformatics at the Society of Chemistry. He is the founder of the ChemSpider website that was purchased by the Royal Society of Chemistry in May 2009. He is a science blogger(ChemConnector Website), one of the hosts of the SciMobileApps wiki(SciMobileApps Wiki), a community-based wiki for Scientific Mobile Apps, and is a book author.(Practical Interpretation of P-31 NMR Spectra and Computer Assisted Structure Verification, Louis Quin and Antony Williams, ISBN 9780973591309),(Collaborative Computational Technologies for Biomedical Research, Sean Ekins, Maggie Hupcey and Antony Williams, ISBN 978-0-470-63803-3)Williams is married to Sharon, with whom he has twin boys, Taylor and Tyler.Early life and educationAntony Williams was born in Asaph, Wales, June 1964 to Ernest Edward Williams, owner of a building contracting firm, and Eirlys Elizabeth Williams. He has one older sister, Rae. He grew up in a small village near Caerwys.Williams attended Primary School in both Holywell and Nannerch until 1975. From the age of eleven, he attended School where he received A-levels in mathematics, geography, and chemistry.Williams earned his B.Sc. in chemistry from the of Liverpool, in 1985, writing an undergraduate dissertation on Spectroscopic Studies of E Related Systems where he applied both paramagnetic resonance (EPR) and NMR to the study of molecules similar in structure to Vitamin E.Williams earned his Ph.D. in chemistry, funded by Dutch Shell, from Holloway in 1988 and wrote a thesis entitled High Pressure NMR of Lubricant Related Systems. He won the Bourne Medal from the University of London for this work and developed a unifying theory for modeling NMR relaxation data to examine the molecular motions of alkyl chains.(P.J. Bratt, D.G. Gillies, L.H. Sutcliffe and A.J. Williams, NMR Relaxation Studies of Internal Motions - A Comparison between Micelles and Related Systems, J. Phys. Chem., 94(7), 2727 (1990)) He also used the Cobalt-59 NMR chemical shift for cobalt (III) hexacyanide as both a temperature and pressure probe.(D.G. Gillies, L.H. Sutcliffe and A.J. Williams, Variable-temperature high-pressure investigation of the cobalt-59 NMR spectroscopy of aqueous potassium hexacyanocobaltate (III) Magn Reson Chem. 40, 57 (2002)) During his PhD he developed an interest in personal computers and wrote software programs to fit NMR relaxation data.Williams continued his work in spectroscopy at the Research Council (Canada) using spectroscopy to perform single-crystal studies of organometallics compounds.CareerIn 1991, Williams joined University as their NMR Facility Manager. He continued his personal interests in multinuclear NMR to perform 2D-NMR experiments examining Selenium exchange in mixed-halogen systems.(Exchange processes in diselenium and selenium-sulfur dihalides, Se2X2 and SeSX2 (X  Br, Cl). A selenium-77 2D-EXSY study, Inorg. Chem., 1992, 31 (22), pp 45344538) He also performed Silicon-29 and Tellurium-125 NMR studies.In 1992 he left Canada for NY to work for the Kodak Company as their NMR Technology Leader. At Kodak he used his previous experience in studying alkyl chain related systems to study micelles.(B. Antalek, A.J. Williams, E. Garcia and J. Texter, NMR Analysis of Interfacial Structure Transitions Accompanying Electron Transfer Threshold Transitions in Reverse Microemulsions, Langmuir, 10, 4459, (1994)) He was involved in the early adoption of Chromatography-NMR into the company and in the development of an Open Access laboratory for chemists to use roboticized analytical instrumentation to generate data. At Kodak he was part of a three member team that developed a web-based LIMS system called WIMS,(D.E. Brown, A.J. Williams and D. McLaughlin, WIMS - A Web-based Information Management System, Trends in Analytical Chemistry, 16, 370 (1997)) the Web-based Information Management System and it was the first web-based LIMS system in the world to manage chemical structures and spectral data. He was granted two patents while at Kodak.,(Photographic emulsion having an improved speed. US Patent 6,040,129)(Process for the manufacture of dihydropyrimidines, US Patent 5,576,432)In 1997 he started work for a Canadian start-up company, Chemistry Development,(ACD/Labs), as their senior product manager. He was responsible for managing all spectroscopy, structure drawing and nomenclature,(A.J. Williams and A. Yerin, The Need for Systematic Naming Software Tools for Exchange of Chemical Information, Molecules, 9, 255 (1999))(Automated Identification and Conversion of Chemical Names to Structure Searchable Information, A.J. Williams and A. Yerin, Chemical Information Mining: Facilitating Literature-Based Discovery, (2008), ISBN 1420076493) products.  While in that role the analytical data management software was expanded to include support for spectrometry, spectroscopy, spectroscopy, chromatography and other forms of analytical sciences. His research interests at that time include the development of algorithms for NMR prediction ((A.J. Williams. Recent Advances in NMR Prediction and Automated Structure Elucidation Software. Current Opinion in Drug Discovery & Development,3,298 (2003)) and (K.A. Blinov, C. Steinbeck, M.E. Elyashberg, and A.J. Williams, The Performance Validation of Neural Network Based 13C NMR Prediction Using a Publicly Available Data Source, J. Chem. Inf. Model., 48(3), 550-555, 2008. 10.1021/ci700363r)) and, specifically, development of software approaches to Computer-Assisted Structure Elucidation, so-called CASE systems.,,,(M.E. Elyashberg, K.A. Blinov, S.G. Molodtsov, A.J. Williams, and G.E. Martin, Fuzzy Structure Generation: An Efficient New Tool for Computer-Aided Structure Elucidation (CASE), J. Chem. Inf. Model., 47, 1053-1066 (2007). 10.1021/ci600528g)(M.E. Elyashberg, A.J. Williams, and G.E. Martin. Computer-Assisted Structure Verification and Elucidation Tools In NMR-Based Structure Elucidation. Review article. Progress in NMR Spectroscopy (2007) 10.1016/j.pnmrs.2007.04.003)(Y.D. Smurnyy, M.E. Elyashberg, K.A. Blinov, B.A. Lefebvre, G. E. Martin, and A.J. Williams, Computer-Aided Determination of Relative Stereochemistry and 3D Models of Complex Organic Molecules from 2D NMR Spectra, Tetrahedron, 61, 9980-9989 (2005))(G.E. Martin, C.E. Hadden, D.J. Russell, B.D. Kaluzny, J.E. Guido, W.K. Duholke, B.A. Stiemsma, T.J. Thamann, R.C. Crouch, K.A. Blinov, M.E. Elyashberg, E.R. Martirosian, S.G. Molodtsov, A.J. Williams, P.L. Schiff, Jr., Identification of Degradants of a Complex Alkaloid Using NMR Cryoprobe Technology and ACD/Structure Elucidator, J. Heterocyclic Chem. 39, 1241 (2002))(http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/mrc.1227 K. Blinov, M. Elyashberg, E. R. Martirosian, S. G. Molodtsov, A. J. Williams, M. H. M. Sharaf, P. L. Schiff, Jr., R. C. Crouch, G. E. Martin, C. E. Hadden, and J. E. Guido, Quindolinocryptotackieine: The Elucidation of a Novel Indoloquinoline Alkaloid Structure through the Use of Computer-Assisted Structure Elucidation and 2D-NMR, Magn. Reson. Chem., 41, 577-584 (2003)),.(http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/jhet.5570400610 M. E. Elyashberg, K. A. Blinov, E. R. Martirosian, S. G. Molodtsov, A. J. Williams, and G. E. Martin, Automated Structure Elucidation  The Benefits of a Symbiotic Relationship between the Spectroscopist and the Expert System, J. Heterocyclic Chem., 40, 1017-1029 (2003)) The CASE tools have been used for the purpose of structure revision whereby algorithms have been demonstrated to outperform human interpretation of spectral data.(M.E. Elyashberg, A.J. Williams and K.A. Blinov, Structural revisions of natural products by Computer Assisted Structure Elucidation (CASE) Systems, Nat. Prod. Rep., 2010, DOI: 10.1039/c002332a) While at ACD/Labs Williams was involved in a number of industry firsts including 1) producing a chemical dictionary on a Palm Computer and Pocket PC,( Chemistry Databases in the Palm and in the Pocket) 2) working with E. Martin and other colleagues to develop new NMR processing techniques using covariance-based approaches,(K.A. Blinov, N.I. Larin, M.P. Kvasha, A. Moser, A.J. Williams, and G. E. Martin, Analysis and Elimination of Artifacts in Indirect Covariance NMR Spectra via Unsymmetrical Processing, Magn. Reson. Chem., 43, 999 (2005))(http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/mrc.1998 K.A. Blinov, A.J. Williams, B.D. Hilton, P.A. Irish, and G.E. Martin, The Use of Unsymmetrical Indirect Covariance NMR Methods to Obtain the Equivalent of HSQC-NOESY Data, Magn. Reson. Chem., 45, 544-546 (2007))(http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/mrc.2029 G. E. Martin, P. A. Irish, B. D. Hilton, K. A. Blinov, and A. J. Williams, Utilizing Unsymmetrical Indirect Covariance Processing to Define 15N-13C Connectivity Networks, Magn. Reson. Chem., 45, 624-627 (2007))(http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/mrc.2064 G.E. Martin, B.D. Hilton, P.A. Irish, K.A. Blinov, and A.J. Williams, Application of Unsymmetrical Indirect Covariance NMR Methods to the Computation of 13C-15N HSQC-IMPEACH and 13C-15N HMBC-IMPEACH Correlation Spectra of the Alkaloid Vincamine, Magn. Reson. Chem., 45, 883-888 (2007)) 3) the introduction of fuzzy-logic based approaches to computer-assisted structure elucidation and 4) Approaches for automated structure verification.(S.S. Golotvin, E. Vodopianov, R. Pol, B.A. Lefebvre, A.J. Williams, R. D. Rutkowske and T. D. Spitzer,  Automated structure verification based on a combination of 1D 1H NMR and 2D 1H13C HSQC spectra, Magn. Reson. Chem.  2007, 45, 803813)While at the company he initiated a hobby project to link together chemistry databases on the web. This project was called ChemSpider. ChemSpider was formally announced at the Chicago ACS meeting in March 2007 with a database containing over 10 million compounds sourced from PubChem.In 2007 when he left ACD/Labs he was the Chief Science Officer. He became an independent consultant working with a number of software companies in the cheminformatics domain, such as SimBioSys, and with research organizations to support their cheminformatics efforts. In parallel he continued to develop the ChemSpider platform with a small group of like-minded individuals interested in the development of web-based systems to serve chemists.,(H. E. Pence and A. J. Williams, ChemSpider: An Online Chemical Information Resource, J. Chem. Educ., 2010, 87 (11), 11231124)(Public Compound Databases  How ChemSpider changed the rules making molecules on the web free, Antony J. Williams in Collaborative Computational Technologies for the Life Sciences, Edited by Sean Ekins, Maggie A.Z. Hupcey  and Antony J. Williams, Submitted for Publication to Wiley) The site is a crowdsourced community for chemistry with chemists depositing their structure collections, spectral data and molecular properties. Williams is focused on educating the community as to the issues of data quality associated with internet chemistry databases.(A.J. Williams, A perspective of Publicly Accessible/Open Access Chemistry Databases, Drug Discovery Today, 13(11/12), 502-506, (2008)),(Antony Williams and Sean Ekins A quality alert and call for improved curation of public chemistry databases, Drug Discovery Today, Volume 16, Issues 17-18, September 2011, Pages 747-750)In May 2009 the Society of Chemistry announced that it had acquired ChemSpider.(to fulfill  its strategic objective of disseminating knowledge to the chemical community and advancing the chemical sciences) Williams joined RSC as their Vice President of Strategic Development for ChemSpider.Williams has contributed to the world of Mobile Chemistry(A.J. Williams, Mobile Chemistry  Chemistry in Your Hands and In Your Face, Chemistry World, May 2010) by contributing to the development of ChemMobi, an iPhone app for accessing millions of chemical compounds and associated data.Williams is an advocate for Notebook Science and is a judge for the Notebook Science Challenge. He has worked with S.I.D. Lang and Bradley to deliver a web-based game for teaching the interpretation of spectral data utilizing crowdsourced spectroscopy data deposited onto ChemSpider.(J.C Bradley, R.J Lancashire, A.S.I.D Lang, A.J Williams (2009) The Spectral Game: leveraging Open Data and crowdsourcing for education Journal of Cheminformatics 1: 9. June)Open science advocacyWilliams introduced an Open Access journal, the ChemSpider Journal of Chemistry, and the development team provided novel online markup technology (ChemMANTIS  Markup And Nomenclature Transformation Integrated System) to allow crowdsourced markup of chemistry related terms linked up, where possible, to the ChemSpider database. Williams is a judge for the Notebook Science Challenge. He promotes the use of Data, particularly spectral data, publishes in Open Access journals and is an advocate for Notebook Science.(J.C. Bradley, K. Owens and A.J Williams, Chemistry Crowdsourcing and Open Notebook Science, Nature Precedings (2008)) Williams is an advocate for freeing pre-clinical data from the pharmaceutical industry on the internet.,,(S.Ekins and A.J. Williams, Precompetitive Preclinical ADME/Tox Data: Set It Free on the Web to Facilitate Computational Model Building and Assist Drug Development, Lab Chip, 2010, 10, 13-22.)(A.J. Williams, V. Tkachenko, C. Lipinski, A. Tropsha and S. Ekins, Free Online Resources Enabling Crowdsourced, Drug Discovery World Winter 2009/10, 33-39)(S. Ekins and A.J. Williams, When Pharmaceutical Companies Publish Large Datasets: An Abundance Of Riches Or Fools Gold? Drug Discov. Today. 2010 15(19-20):812-5) Williams has worked closely with Ekins to advocate the release of pre-competitive pharmaceutical data to the community. He has also participated in the analysis and review of open pharmaceutical data released to the community.,(S.Ekins and A.J. Williams, When Pharmaceutical Companies Publish Large Datasets: An Abundance of riches or fools gold? Drug Disc Today, 15; 812-815, 2010)(Ekins S and Williams AJ, Meta-analysis of molecular property patterns and filtering of public datasets of antimalarial hits and drugs, MedChemComm, 1: 325-330, 2010)Science Mobile ApplicationsWilliams co-developed a Wiki with Ekins called Science Mobile Applications(The SciMobileApps Wiki) launched June 21 2011(Announcement of the SciMobileApps Wiki). Initially this grew out of a desire to track chemistry Apps(Chemistry in Your Hands and in Your Face article from Chemistry World) (for a paper submitted) and then Apps for science in the chemistry classroom (Smart Phones, a Powerful Tool in the Chemistry Classroom).ReferencesExternal links*Williams LinkedIn profile*Williams Mendeley Profile*Williams ChemConnector Blog*Williams ResearcherID Profile*The ChemSpider Website
30911400
Rudolph_Glossop
alma_mater         College London, UKSchool of Mines, UK Rudolph Glossop (17 February 1902  1 March 1993) was a mining and civil engineer and one of the founders of Geotechnical Engineering in the UK.(Ronald E. Williams, Rudolph Glossop: and the Rise of Geotechnology,  Whittles, 2010 accessed 16 February 2011)The Glossop Lecture at the Society is named after him.References(External links* Geological Society Glossop LectureGlossop
30938578
Yew_Tree_Colliery
Yew Tree Colliery was a mine operating on the Coalfield after 1845 in Tyldesley, Manchester, then in the county of Lancashire, England.In 1845 George Green of Wharton Hall, Hulton, and his brother leased land at Yew Tree Farm and sank a shaft to prospect for coal. This became Yew Tree Colliery. Before 1851 Green built a tramroad to link the colliery to the Canal east of Astley Green. At the Tyldesley end, the tramway was worked by cable down the steep slope of the Tyldesley Banks and horse-drawn wagons completed the journey.After 1870 the colliery was part of the Coal Company.() The coliery had two shafts, sunk originally to the mine at 600 feet. The shafts were deepened in the early 1890s to access the and White mine.()An explosion of firedamp, ignited by a lamp, in1858 cost the lives of 25 men and boys. This was the worst mining disaster to occur in Tyldesley.()()References;Bibliography*
30945264
List_of_Copper_Country_mines
CopperCountryMI sepia.jpg|thumb|250px|Miners pose with lunch pails in hand on a mine rock pile outside of the Tamarack mineshaft.Many copper mines have existed in the Country of Michigan. These include both large-scale commercial ventures and small operations. There are numerous ancient mine pits in and around the Copper Country area, especially on Royale (several of these were developed). Numerous small modern diggings exist around the area as well, including some around Fort Wilkins and the Harbor Light.Mines* mine - In Michigan* mine - in Michigan* Mining, Exploring, & Manufacturing Company mine - On Isle Royale National Park * & Isle Royale mine - On Amygdaloid Island, Royale National Park* mine - Near Michigan* Mine - Near Mine, Michigan* mine - In Range, Michigan* Calumet and Helca mines* mine - In Michigan and Michigan* mine* mine - In Michigan* & Isle Royale mine - On the northwest shore of Royale National Park* mine - Near Harbor, Michigan* mine - In abandoned Michigan.  Operated from 1845 to 1878. * Falls mine - Harbor, Michigan* mine - On Isle Royale National Park * mine - In the abandoned town of Michigan, twelve miles south of Copper Harbor.* location - Near Duncan Bay on Isle Royale National Park* Eagle mine - A mine under construction since 2010 near Dog Plains.* mine - On Isle Royale National Park* mine - Bought by Mine in 1908.* mine - On Isle Royale National Park* Royale mine - South of Michigan* mine - In the abandoned town of Michigan, outside of Copper Harbor, near the Clark mine.* mine - In Michigan.  Bought by Mine in 1897.* mine - In Michigan* mine - In Michigan* mine - On Royale National Park* mine - In Michigan* mine - In Michigan* Kearsarge mine - Michigan and Michigan* mine - Near City, Michigan.  Operated from 1867 to 1912.* Mines - In Michigan* mine - One shaft north of the Mine, acquired by Quincy in 1891 and renamed to the Quincy #6 shaft.* mine - in Michigan* mine - Bought by Mine in 1897.* Mine - In Michigan* mine - Opened in 1847 in Michigan* mine - On Isle Royale National Park* mine - Near Scoville Point in Harbor on Isle Royale National Park.* mine - In Michigan* mine - In Rock Harbor on Isle Royale National Park* mine - Near the end of Rock Harbor on Isle Royale National Park.* mine* mine - In Michigan, closed in 1921* mine - In the settlement of Wendigo on Isle Royale. * Pine mine - Was the last mine to close in the Copper Country in 1995.  Located in Ontonagon County* Mine - East of MichiganSee also* mining in Michigan* of Copper Country smelters* of Copper Country mills* of copper mines in the United States
30950275
Harry_Marks
Marks Vanity Fair 8 June 1889.jpg|thumb|right|Financial NewsHarry Marks as caricatured in Vanity Fair, June 1889Harry Hananel Marks (9 April 1855  21 December 1916) was a British politician and journalist, who founded the Financial News in 1884.Early lifeHarry Marks was born in London on 9 April 1855, a younger child of Woolf Marks and his wife Cecilia.(Porter (2004) lists Harry as the fifth of six children; Who Was Who, meanwhile, records that he was the fifth son. Epstein (2006) notes that the family had two daughters and four sons. Given that Claud Marks was born in 1863, per Porter, it is likely that Harry was the fifth child and third son.) David Woolf Marks, who came from a London merchant family, was a prominent reformist rabbi at the London Synagogue, and the professor of Hebrew at College London. Harrys younger brother, Claud Marks, would go on to gain distinction in the Army, being awarded the Service Order for his service in the War.(Epstein (2006)) Marks attended College School from 1864 to 1868, followed by a period at the Royale in Brussels, before travelling to the United States aged sixteen, in 1871.(Epstein (2006). It is interesting to note that in Whos Who, Marks presented this as attending University College London rather than the school.)United StatesAfter arriving in Orleans, Marks first job was selling sewing machines, before talking his way into a position writing for newspapers in Texas on the grounds of (non-existent) previous journalistic experience. In 1873 he moved to New York, where he worked for the York World for five years, before later becoming editor of the Daily Mining News. This was his first foray into financial journalism, and there were widespread rumours that he had freely speculated in mining company shares, as well as more scandalous allegations involving seducing and defrauding the widow of one of his former business associates.(Epstein (2006))Whilst in the United States, Marks published Leaves from a Reporters Note-Book (1882), which reflected on the life of a newspaper journalist. He also published the sharp satire Down with the Jews! Meeting of the Society for Suppressing the Jewish Race (1879), which attacked anti-semitism among American politicians. He returned to England in 1883.(Epstein (2006))Whilst still editing the Daily Mining News, Marks founded the London halfpenny Evening News in 1881 in partnership with Kennard; although initially successful, the paper lost most of its circulation by the early 1890s and was eventually sold to Harmsworth for 25,000 in 1894.(Brake & Demoor (2009), p. 210; Boyce (2004))Financial NewsShortly after his return to London, Marks founded the Financial and Mining News (later simply the Financial News) on 23 January 1884, with financial backing from an American, Colonel McMurdo.(Brake & Demoor (2009), p. 220) He later floated the paper on the stock market in 1885 at a valuation of 50,000, reconstructing the company in 1890 to raise 100,000, whilst retaining a controlling interest throughout.(Brake & Demoor (2009), p. 220) The Financial News was a major step forwards for British newspapers; it was the first London financial paper to publish on a daily basis, and pioneered a popular, Americanised, accessible style of writing that appealed both to the industry professionals and to small private investors. The Financial News was active at reporting, exposing a number of fraudulent share schemes as well as playing a part in the corruption scandals that led to the downfall of the Board of Works in the late 1880s.(Epstein (2006)) As a result, it achieved a good reputation for integrity and honesty, widely respected among small investors.(Robb (1992), p. 117) His contemporary Harris later summed Marks up as a man of few scruples and many interests;(Harris (2006), p. 302) nowhere was this more clear than the way in which he exploited his papers reputation for his own commercial schemes.(Robb (1992), p. 117) His first major fraudulent venture was the Rae-Transvaal Gold Mining Company, formed to cash in on a boom in South African mining stocks. Marks had bought a farm in the Transvaal for 10,000, promptly selling it on to a newly-created shell company at a notional value of 50,000. He then floated it in January 1887, with the Financial News stoking up enthusiasm for the stock. As the stock prices inflated, helped by the paper publishing fictional values, Marks sold out; the company was wound up in May 1888, by which time it had become apparent the Rae mine - and the company itself - was worthless.(Johnson (2002)) In 1890 he sued two journalists for libel over a pamphlet exposing his involvement in the matter; after an eight-day trial in which Marks less salubrious past was extensively debated, the jury held that the content of the pamphlet was true, and that publishing it was justified in the public interest; Marks was forced to pay costs.(; )Political careerMarkss first political venture was in 1889, when he stood as a Moderate for election to the newly formed County Council, in the East Marylebone district. Both seats in the district were won by the Moderate candidates, with Marks receiving 1,874 votes and Horace Farquhar 1,815; the nearest Progressive candidate, Sir Farrer, received 1,300.(Stead (1892), p. 89) He was only a moderately active member, attending most council sessions but a substantially lower proportion of committees.(Stead (1892), p. 43) He stood down from the LCC to contest the 1892 general election, where he was the Conservative candidate for Bethnal Green North East, running against the Liberal-Labour incumbent, George Howell. Howell won with a comfortable majority of almost six hundred, around 10% of the votes cast.(Who Was Who. Marks does not appear to have contested the LCC election at all in this year, per Stead (1892). Voting figures from The popular guide to the new House of Commons (1892), p. 38)In the council elections of 1895 he was re-elected, to represent St George, Tower Hamlets; later that year, in the 1895 general election he contested the same constituency, narrowly defeating the Liberal John Williams Benn. His parliamentary election was marred by allegations of practices, though these were dismissed by a court. Marks stood down and did not contest the seat in the 1900 general election, but returned to the Commons in a 1904 by-election as the member for the Isle of Thanet. He defended the seat in the 1906 general election, but stood down for the second and final time in 1910, on grounds of ill health.(Epstein (2006))Later lifeFollowing a stroke in 1909, Marks handed over the editorship of the Financial News to Ellis Powell, but retained a interest and the post of editor-in-chief. He and Powell frequently clashed over Markss involvement in the daily running of the paper; Powell later claimed Marks had tried to sell his interest in the paper to a German agent in 1915, but it is unclear how accurate this claim was.(Epstein (2006))Marks died on 21 December 1916, due to complications arising from diabetes; he had suffered a stroke in 1909, and been in poor health since. His wife Annie had died earlier in the year, and he was survived by a son and a daughter, to whom he left an estate valued at 31,000.(Epstein (2006))NotesReferences*********Marks, Harry Hananel, in * External links * 
30959365
SMS_Stuttgart
{|Ship notesShip notes|}SMS Stuttgart was a Knigsberg class cruiser of the Marine, named after the city of Stuttgart.DesignThe Stuttgart was one of the three light cruisers whose eighth funnel was detached, meaning the distance to the central funnel was greater than that between the middle and front funnels. These cruisers are usually called the Nrnberg class after its SMS Nrnberg or the Stettin class after the SMS Stettin, the first such cruiser to enter service, with the Knigsberg class proper only consisting of the SMS Knigsberg herself.History1905-1914She was laid down in 1905 at the Werft Danzig and launched on 22 September 1906 by Dr Gau, then lord mayor of Stuttgart. She entered service on 1 February 1908 and her testing was completed on 9 April that year, but the Marine did not have enough men to crew her and she was laid up in reserve for a year. On 16 February 1909 she became an artillery training ship within the Schiffsartillerieinspektion, replacing SMS Nymphe. Over the next five years the Stuttgart remained in the reserve fleet, spending the time entirely on manoeuvres and parades, apart from 1913 when she was sent to help the stricken heavy cruiser SMS Blcher.1914-1920At the outbreak of war the Stuttgart was at the Kaiserliche Werft in Danzig. Put back into full service, on 7 August 1914 she was assigned to the 4th Scouting Group of the Seas Fleet in Wilhelmshaven. Used for screening, reconnaissance and mining operations, in May 1915 she was sent to take part in a German offensive in the Sea, where she saw action against Russian warships. She then returned to the Sea, before spending more time in the Baltic between October 1915 and January 1916. She then was sent to Wilhelmshaven for a refit.She fought at  as part of the 4th Scouting Group and survived the battle undamaged. On 15 December 1916 she was taken out of service and her crew used to man the new light cruiser SMS Emden. From February to May 1918 the Stuttgart was converted into a seaplane carrier at Wilhelmshaven, with six of her 10.5mm cannon replaced with two 8.8 cm cannon, enabling her to carry one plane below decks and two on the deck. She recommissioned as such on May 16, 1918 and from then until the end of the war carried out reconnaissance in the Bight. She was then taken out of service on 17 December 1918, struck from the navy list on 5 November 1919, sailed to Britain on 20 July 1920 and scrapped there.Stuttgart
30973343
Pesawaran_Regency
Pesawaran Regency is a regency of Lampung, Sumatra, Indonesia. It has an area of 2243.51 km and a population of 418,256 people. The capital lies at Tataan. HistoryIn September 2010, a number of people in Baru were rushed to a community health center after consuming water poisoned by industrial waste which was allegedly dumped in the River by the gold mining company Napal Umbar Picung (NUP).()Administrative divisionsIt is divided administratively into 7 districts (kecamatan):# Tataan# Kedondong# Katon# Cermin# Pidada# Tegineneng# LimaReferencesPesawaranPesawaranPesawaran
30986471
Fredette_Lake
Fredette Lake is a remote northern lake of Saskatchewan, Canada, located north of Saskatchewan. () The lake has several islands the largest being Island.Since all of the northern mining operations are downstream of the lake, it is commonly used as a reference site to determine normal background levels when studying other surrounding areas near Uranium City. ()See also*of lakes in SaskatchewanReferences
31003357
Jeff_Knaebel
Jeff Knaebel (Francisco, CA, 1939 -- Jaipur, 2011) was an American expatriate, author, and self-proclaimed stateless citizen. He was a surveyor, geologist, and miner who graduated with a professional degree from the Colorado School of Mines (Engineer of Mines) in 1963. Stationed in Vietnam 1964 through 1967, he served as Company Commander of Navy Seabees. Co-founder and active director of Resource Associates of Alaska, Ltd., one of the largest mining, resource management, civil engineering, architecture, and city planning firms in Alaska during the 1970s, early 1980s, until a conscience call awakened him to the futility of war, and made him aware of government aggression against the native peoples of Alaska, and the fact that his tax payments were being used to support activities which he utterly opposed. He eventually lost his interest in business, and began devoting his time to fostering his own spiritual growth, as well as that of members of the Alaska indigenous community.(How I Became A Voluntaryist: A Farewell to Tax-Financed Murder,  The Voluntaryist, Whole No. 137, 2nd Quarter 2008, pp. 1-8.)By 1995, he arranged his personal/financial affairs in the United States so that he could make his full-time domicile in India, and avoid any tax obligations to the United States Internal Revenue Service. In India, he supported and sponsored a wide range of charitable endeavors, such as adult literacy programs, peace conferences, education of Tibetan refugee children, and publication of peace education manuals (which were adopted by the Indian central government).In 2006, he wrote and published Experiments in Moral Sovereignty: Notes of an American Exile in which he published My Personal Declaration of Severance and Independence from the United States.(Experiments In Moral Sovereignty: Notes of An American Exile, Pune: by Friends of the Gandhi Museum, 2006.) This set the stage for his protest at the Gandhi Samadhi at Rajghat in New Delhi, India, where he burned his American passport and renounced his American citizenship on June 19, 2009, thus making himself stateless. The New Delhi police refused to arrest him, after which he began a one man, 2000 kilometer walk across India (from Jaipur to Sarahan), promoting his idea that a man needs a country, but would be better off without a government.He maintained that government taxation and government restrictions on personal movement and domicile were tantamount to slavery, especially when taxpayers could not opt out of having their tax money spent on war. His refusal to lie low and be quiet brought him to the attention of local Indian authorities, who then threatened to arrest his host families. Finally, Knaebel petitioned the Supreme Court to grant him asylum, which was denied. On July 12, 2010, the Court ordered him to apply for Indian citizenship if he wished to remain in the country. Not complying, he refused to leave India or to use his Service Authority passport because he believed that his peaceful activities should not require any documentation.He wished to prove by his actions that the current system of World States makes it nearly impossible for a truly nonviolent person to exist. He wanted to move about freely without hiding or risking harassment of his hosts by governmental authorities. Furthermore, he wished to demonstrate that governments were truly coercive because they did not allow one to withdraw from citizenship, from paying taxes, and from using government identification documents. As a final protest, he completed his book-length manuscript, Message From A Moral Sovereign, and made plans for his own self-directed death.(Message From A Moral Sovereign: That We May Create a Human Community of Love and Reason  The Life and Death True Story of an Americans Journey from Warpath to Gandhi Path,  (forthcoming, to be published in India, 2011)) He was found January 25, 2011,  burned to death by his own hand (self-immolation) near the ancient monastic ruins of Bairat. He chose this location as an expression of his hope that the peoples of the world would follow the example of King Asoka  (d. 232 B.C.) who renounced violence and declared that he would no longer seek conquest by war. BibliographySome Thoughts on Civil Disobedience: My Duties and Responsibilities Gandhi Marg 24.2 (2002) and reprinted in David M. Gross, We Wont Pay: A Tax Resistance Reader (2008), pp. 475-501.How I Became A Voluntaryist: A Farewell to Tax-Financed Murder,  The Voluntaryist, Whole No. 137, 2nd Quarter 2008, pp. 1-8.Experiments In Moral Sovereignty: Notes of An American Exile, Pune: by Friends of the Gandhi Museum, 2006.Hetto Bhardawaj, Where There Is No Ruler, in the Hindi magazine, Aha! Zingi (JLN Marg, Jaipur, India) November 2008, pp. 12-15.An Open Letter to the President of the United States and the Prime Minister of India,  January 2011, forthcoming The Voluntaryist.Message From A Moral Sovereign: That We May Create a Human Community of Love and Reason  The Life and Death True Story of an Americans Journey from Warpath to Gandhi Path,  (forthcoming, to be published in India, 2011)References* http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/india/US-admirer-of-Gandhi-sets-himself-on-fire-in-India/articleshow/7379430.cms* http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/city/jaipur/US-Gandhian-cremated-in-Jaipur/articleshow/7387182.cms* http://news.webindia123.com/news/articles/India/20110128/1677060.html* http://dailycaller.com/2011/01/28/us-admirer-of-gandhi-sets-himself-on-fire-in-india/External links* http://www.jeffknebel.org* http://www.freeofstate.org
31025705
Medard_Mulangala
 parliamentary grouping          Sacree pour lAlternanceMdard Mulangala Lwakabwanga (Commonly known as Medard Mulangala; born 17 January 1957) is a politician from the Republic of the Congo. He is President of the Union for a Republican Majority and a leader of the Union Sacree pour lAlternance, a umbrella grouping of opposition parliamentary parties and community groups that forms the third largest political structure within the opposition and Rapporteur of the National Assemblys Committee on Economics and Finance, making him the oppositions lead spokesman on budgetary, economic and investment policy in the Republic.A renowned political commentator on the affairs of DRC, the Lakes of Africa and the African continent,(Medard Mulangala Lwakabwanga) Mulangala is widely seen as a leading candidate for President of the Democratic Republic of Congo in the forthcoming Presidential Elections of 2011 as a unity figure able to bring together the disparate parliamentary and nationwide opposition.BiographyEarly lifeMulangala was born on 17 January 1957 in Kananga, capital of Western Kasa Province of Congo to Franois Lwakabwanga Mukungishi and Thrse Shaumba wa Shaumba, the fourth of seven children.Mulangalas father was politically active and was one of the founders of Lulua Frres the leading socio-political movement in western Kasa before Independence. As a leader of Lulua Frres he was a delegate to the Round Table of 1960 held in Brussels during which Independence from Belgium was negotiated. Following Independence, Mulangalas father was elected as a provincial MP of Western Kasai and then three times as Governor of Western Kasa, and from 1966  1969 he served as the Governor of Bandundu, Kivu and Bas Congo provinces. After growing disenchanted with Mobutu regime he became a leading figure in the founding of the Union pour la Dmocratie et le Progrs social (UDPS), an opposition movement to Mobutu formerly launched in February 1982. He is now retired from politics.Much of Mulangalas early life was spent away from his parents with much of his informative years spent in Belgium. He did, however, return each summer to his family in DRC to the various provinces where his father was assigned, and later, to Kinshasa after his familys relocation there in 1970.EducationMulangala started primary school in 1963 at the Institut Saint Dominique Savio in Mikalayi (Western Kasa) and completed this stage of his education at Collge Saint Joseph in Mouscron, Belgium. His secondary education was begun and completed at Collge Saint Henri in Comines, a catholic boarding school in Belgium.In 1979 Mulangala received a BA Hons in Business & Finance from the Institut Catholique des Hautes Etudes Commerciales (ICHEC) in Brussels, Belgium.In 1996, Mulangala attended the College of Petroleum and Energy Studies, part of the Oxford-Princetown Programme, in Oxford, England.Political CareerIn 1990, as calls for democratic reforms in the then Zaire became unstoppable, President Mobutu Sese Seko began to bow to the calls from the international community and the opposition to widen his government and initiate moves towards multiparty democracy.1990 Mobutu began to open his government to groups and individuals other than his own supporters and Mulangala joined the Government. In that year, Mulangala then a senior corporate banker in the region and because of his family and political roots in the important business and mining province of Western Kasa was appointed to the reformist Government of Prime Minister Bululu, initially as Minister of Mining and Energy. Between 1990 and 1992 he held various ministerial positions in the reformist transition government including Minister for Petroleum, Minister for Land and Mines, and Minister for Industry and SME development. Mulangala remained in the Cabinet until the election of Tshisekedi wa Mulumba as Prime Minister in September 1992.Mulangala remained in the country during Kabilas seizure of power at the end of the Congo War hoping the change of regime would bring about the badly needed reforms that Congolese had been waiting for. However, he quickly became disillusioned as corruption and political repression grew in the years after 1997. In 1998, Mulangala became a member of the executive of the Rally for Democracy (RCD), a group in opposition to Kabilas continuing leadership of the country.In disagreement with RCDs strategy of direct action against the Government, Mulangala later resigned from the executive and the organisation, and became in 2000 a founder member of FRUONAR (The United Opposition Front for Non-Armed Struggle) and its representative in Europe.Mulangala was an active figure (he chaired the working group responsible for drafting the resolution on the sensitive nationality issue)at the Global et Inclusif of 2002 in Pretoria (peace talks between warring factions, non armed opposition and civil society) organised under the umbrella of South Africa that that put an end to what is generally recalled as the African first world war and paved the way for a power sharing agreement implemented in 2003. He was designated MP to the Transitional Parliament as a representative of the non-armed political opposition. In this transitional government, he served as the Rapporteur of the Reconstruction and Development Committee.In 2005, as Presidential and Parliamentary elections loomed, Mulangala founded the political party UMR (Union pour la Majorit Rpublicaine) and became the partys President and its candidate for the constituency of Demba in Western Kasai Province. The 2006 election saw Mulangala elected to the National Assembly and five other candidates returned for the party. During the second round of the Presidential poll of that year, the UMR and many other opposition groups supported the candidacy of Bemba against the eventual victor and incumbent President, Kabila.Following his election at the 2006 polls, Mulangala was in 2007 appointed as Rapporteur to the Economics and Finance Committee of the Assembly, making him the lead opposition spokesperson on budgetary and economic policy, including policy towards foreign direct investment.Mulangala founded the UK-DRC All Parliamentary Friendship Group in 2004, and has led important election observation missions on behalf of the DRC or as a member of Africa Unions team including to the United Kingdoms 2005 General Election and to the post-conflict General Elections in Liberia in 2005 and Sierra Leone in 2007.Presidential and Parliamentary elections 2011In 2010 Mulangala was one of the driving forces behind the move to unite a series of parliamentary opposition and community groups under a single banner in advance of the 2011 Presidential and Parliamentary elections. This umbrella body, from September 2010 began to work in the National Assembly and organize across the country as a single unit and is called Union Sacree pour LAlternance (Sacred Union for Change).In this organization he has been joined by other prominent opposition figures including former RCD leader Wamba dia Wamba, Eugne Diomi Ndongala, Ne Mwanda Nsemi, Christian Badibangi, Lisanga Jean Pierre, and former President of the National Assembly, Bembe. Union Sacree pour LAlternance is expected to agree a single, united candidate to contest the 2011 Presidential poll.Mulangala announced the launch of the new group internationally in an article in the US news outlet Post in September 2010.Mulangala has been a key figure amongst both the opposition and in the international media in protesting against the planned changes to the electoral system in DRC for both parliamentary and Presidential polls. Under a change of law initiated by President Kabila, the proportional voting system for elections to the National Assembly will be replaced for the 2011 poll by a first-past-the-post system and the Presidential poll will be conducted in a single round, rather than the current two-round contest. In an article in the UKs Magazine in January 2011, Mulangala stated thatKabilas reforms threaten to weaken consensus politics in the DRC. After ten years of civil war and a further ten of brittle peace, consensus is crucial and minorities must never be allowed to wield power over the majority. He also used the article to confirm that the opposition had, however, secured seats in a newly constituted electoral commission to oversee the elections, and that the importance of a balanced electoral commission cannot be overstated: it was just such a body that finally called the election for opposition leader Ouattara in Cote dIvoire.During a visit to London in May 2011 Mulangala was invited to address the of Economic Affairs on the future of the Mining and Extractives industry in DRC and how to bring transparency to this crucial industry (the IEA website hosts an MP3 recording of the speech.(http://www.iea.org.uk/multimedia/audio/medard-mulangala-bringing-transparency-to-the-drc)During the same visit, Mulangala was interviewed by David Frost on his international interview programme Over the World on the English news network, becoming the first politician from the Democratic Republic of Congo to be interviewed by the renowned interviewer. (http://www.youtube.com/watch?vrP9j2Xn_NLU)Political views and positionsThroughout his political career, Mulangala has present consistently centrist and liberal views, first in opposition to the Mobutist regime and then to both Kabila and Joseph Kabilas governments. His politics have consistently espoused:* Citizen-ownership schemes for businesses on a similar model to Economic Empowerment schemes in South Africa* Equal rights for women* Support for foreign investors to provide their DRC employees with equity/ ownership of local subsidiaries* Support for the UN mandated forces in Eastern Congo, in order support security in the region, to help guarantee an free and fair election in 2011* Support for an international transparency and certification initiative for minerals (similar to the Kimberley Process for diamonds), and for this to be monitored in the Congo by the UN in conjunction with the DRC Government* Guaranteed basic education for all DRC citizens up to the age of 15* A programme of national works to improve sanitation and guarantee the right to clean water* Support for the continuation of the current proportional electoral system for parliamentary contests, and a two-round poll for the Presidential election* Action to ensure DRC abides by international treaties on transparency in legal agreements, and concerns that Chinese investment in DRC may embolden the Government to lessen its commitment to abiding by international legal requirements in business and human rightsCareer outside politicsIn 1979 Mulangala joined Citibank in Kinshasa, rising over the years of its operations to Director of the subsidiary and Member of the Credit Committee of the bank. During his service to the financial institution at which he worked until his appointment to the Government as a Cabinet Minister in 1990, he assisted with the development, design and implementation of first money and foreign exchange marketplace in DRC, and export credit lines to mining and extractive companies, including La Gnrale des Carrires et des Mines, the state-owned mining company.In 1995 Mulangala became a founding partner of Kaulu Investissement Holding (KIH), a consultancy specialising in bringing foreign investors operating in the international trade finance, mining and petroleum industries to DRC. Mulangala and KIH were crucial to the entry of South African-based oil company Engen to DRC, which ended in the companys temporary withdrawal in 1997 alongside the majority of western investors due to the onset of the Congo War.In 2008 the company was appointed as a strategic partner of First Bank, a Franco-African investment bank for the development of banking operations in Kananga, capital of Kasai Province.Personal LifeIn 1981, Mulangala married Marianne who he had first known in Belgium during his secondary school and university years.Marianne holds a law diploma from the Universit Libre de Bruxelles, ULB, and a business management diploma from Guildhall University. She is founder and chair of lAssociation des Femmes dAffaires du Congo (AFAC), an organisation for the development and empowerment of Congolese women in business.They have four children: Vanessa, a TV producer and former broadcast journalist with the World Service, Gregory, a management undergraduate from the University of London employed by a leading international mining company, Andy, adoptive son, sales manager in a marketing company, and Charles Edouard, a senior high school student aspiring to become a paediatrician.References External links * Comment article on companies mining and trading in conflict minerals, and a call for shareholder action in The Guardian* Interview with EUObserver Magazine during visit to European Parliament in Strasbourg to discuss EU funding for the DRC General Election with European leaders* Report on UPI on Mulangala visit to European Parliament in Strasbourg* Comment article on changes to Electoral laws in DR Congo in Prospsect Magazine* Comment article on Chinese vs. Western Investment in DR Congo in Huffington Post* Comment article in Mail & Guardian South Africa* Letter to The Guardian on conflict minerals* Quotation on Bloomberg regarding electoral law changes* Comment article on new political movement in DR Congo * Quotations in Globe and Mail (Canada) article on Chinese investment in Africa
31036642
Ahmad_Amran
Ahmad Amran is a Yemeni writer. He has a PhD in mineral exploration and mining. In 2000, he published a story collection entitled A New Horizon for a Newer World. A story from that book (A Poet and a Dancer) was translated into Italian and included in a 2009 anthology of Yemeni literature called Perle dello Yemen.(Profile in Arablit website (translated from Italian)) Amran lived in Hungary for many years.Reference
31051632
Thomas_Cawthron
Thomas Cawthron (25 May 1833 in Newington, Surrey - 8 October 1915 in New Zealand) was a Zealand businessman and philanthropist responsible for the establishment of the Cawthron research institute.Its establishment was not only of great value to agriculture but it also stimulated scientific research throughout the whole of New Zealand.Sir Theodore Rigg, former Cawthron director, Encyclopaedia of New Zealand 1966Many fortunes were made and lost in New Zealands 19th Century gold rushes. Canny merchant Thomas Cawthron amassed his pile of wealth from offices in the beached hulk of a ship at Port Nelson, but most of his money came through the hunt for coal and copper and from sending supplies to gold miners in Golden Bay and Hokitika.Over a hundred years later the name of this retiring but generous man lives on in one of New Zealands leading scientific research organisations, Nelsons Cawthron.Thomas Cawthron was born at Newington, Surrey, on 25 May 1833 and was 15 years old when his parents and family set out for Nelson in the sailing ship Mary. He worked in Wellington, then followed the gold miners to Australia, spending several years as a contractor for miscellaneous goods on the goldfields of Bendigo and Ballarat. Returning to Nelson in the mid 1850s when his father became ill, he won a contract to dig the test drives for copper deposits on the Dun Mountain, going on to contract for the supply of food and stores for the copper-mining project and for the Jenkins Hill coal mine.He delivered supplies to miners in the rough Mineral Belt country, around 20 km by a mountainous track from the Nelson township. He was an investor in property, shares, local bodies, war loans and mortgages and seemed to have a golden touch in all his business transactions. By the time of his retirement in the late 1880s he had amassed a considerable fortune.After his retirement he lived quietly and frugally with his sister Mrs Wright. He seemed to have few interests other than the investment and care of his money. However, behind the scenes he helped out in many individual cases of hardship and distress and contributed to causes such as relief funds, church organisations and educational and recreational schemes. In his later years, he made larger and more public gifts, including the Cathedral steps, the Rocks Road chains, Cawthron Park (in the hills to the east of the city), contributions towards a public hospital and nurses home, and smaller donations to the Nelson Institute (which used to run the Nelson library), the Nelson School of Music and its pipe organ.  Thomas Cawthron died on 8 October 1915. He bequeathed 231,000, practically the whole of his estate, for the development of an Industrial and Technical School, Institute and Museum to be called the Cawthron Institute. This was officially opened in 1921 with Thomas Easterfield, emeritus professor of chemistry at Victoria University College, as its first director. References Sources**Theodore Rigg, Encyclopaedia of New Zealand. 1966; *Karen Stade, www.theprow.org.nz 2009.External links*The Cawthron Institute
31060004
Herman_Heijenbrock
Herman Heijenbrock (1871, Amsterdam &ndash; 1948, Blaricum), was a Dutch writer, painter, pastel draughtsman, and lithographer. He founded the Museum van den Arbeid in 1923, that later grew into the Amsterdam Science museum called NEMO.BiographyHe was the son of a baker and merchant in marine equipment. According to the RKD he learned to paint at the Academie voor Beeldende Kunsten in Rotterdam.(Herman Heijenbrock in the RKD) Soon after graduation he visited the Borinage, a coal-mining district in Belgium. He found work in a theater making backdrops and later went to work as an art-journalist and draughtsman for the Nieuwsblad, which he quit in 1898 to become a professional landscape painter in Noordwijk. He returned to the Borinage to make sketches of the picturesque surroundings, but became depressed by the working conditions and the high amount of disease among the miners and their families. He tried to convince various influential artists to help him work on improving the working conditions of the common man, but met with little success. He wrote a pamphlet called Onze samenleving in woord en beeld (Amsterdam, circa 1899) in which he explained his view on working conditions, though he felt that democracy was not the answer.(Heijenbrock in the BWSA) Laren art colony and politicsHe married in 1899 and moved to Melkweg 2, Blaricum where he became active in the colony in the neighboring town of Laren. He and his wife became friends with the artist R.N. Roland Holst and his wife, the poetess Henriette Roland Holst, and the poet Gorter, who all lived near their home in Blaricum. He began corresponding with van Eeden over his interest in improving working conditions, and responded to Van Eedens 1899 lecture Waarvoor werkt gij? (Why do you work?) with another pamphlet Over de Nieuwe Tijden (About modern times). He shared the political views of de Clercq and in 1901-1902 they organized some lectures where Van Eeden spoke.( He travelled with Van Eedens brother-in-law to the Ruhrgebiet to see the industrial lifestyle there.( Heijenbrock agreed with the American writer Stanley Lee who said Not to see poetry in the machinery of this present age, is not to see poetry in the life of the age. It is not to believe in the age.(Voice of the Machines, by Gerald Stanley Lee, 1906, Mount Tom Press) In 1910 Van Eeden brought the writer Lee over to the Netherlands to hold lectures on his Voice of the Machines and they visited Heijenbrock.( Van Eeden described him after that meeting in his diary as our greatest painter.( Trips to industrial centersHeijenbrock began to travel everywhere that had an industrial center to paint and sketch modern industrial workers at everyday tasks. He visited Saargebiet, Wales, the Midlands in Engeland and shipyards in Scotland. In Sweden he painted quarries and pine forests to show the raw materials for building roads, railways, and the paper industry. In the Netherlands he mostly painted the harbours, but when WWI broke out he was confined to the Dutch borders and began to visit local industrial sites.( In his enthusiasm to show the entire industrialization process, he began to collect various modern instruments and inventions.In 1921 he joined the board of the Vereeniging voor Beeldende Kunsten Laren-Blaricum, an artist collective that still exists today in Laren and Blaricum.(website of the artist collective Laren-Blaricum) In the same year he wrote to Van Eeden that he had collected enough for a museum, and in 1922 he held an exhibition at the Amsterdamse Stedelijk Museum. A year later his wife died, but he managed to found the Stichting Museum van den Arbeid and installed his budding museum collection in the attic of the Veiligheidsmuseum, Amsterdam. Museum van den ArbeidThe Museum van den Arbeid was opened in 1929 and was situated in an old school located on the corner of the Marnixstraat at Rozengracht 224-226 in Amsterdam (torn down, the site is currently a fire station ). In 1980 the name was changed to Nederlands Instituut voor Nijverheid en Techniek (NINT) and moved to the Tolstraat 127 (the former headquarters of the Asscher Diamond Company). In 1997 the NINT closed and the collection was absorbed by NEMO. Nemo sold 400 of his works to the Gemeente Museum Helmond.(website Galleries.nl) The archive of his museum is in the hands of the City Archives.(NINT Archive)His work is mostly inspired by factories and industrial workers of all shapes and kinds. The works he made of the area where he lived in Laren and Blaricum are confined to the few textile factories that the area had during his time there. He became known as de schilder van licht en arbeid (the painter of light and work) and won many commissions for portraits of factories by leading Dutch businessmen. Heijenbrocks works often hang in museums near the old factories that commissioned them, such as the Hoogovensmuseum, Nemo, the Museum, and the museum in Helmond. He became a member of the Amsterdam artist collective et Amicitiae, and in 1933 he helped found the Goois Museum in Hilversum.(website De Valk Lexicon kunstenaars Laren-Blaricum)(website Museum Hilversum)Publications*Over de Nieuwe Tijden: naar aanleiding van de lezing van Fr. van Eeden, waarvoor werkt gij?, 1899*Onze samenleving in woord en beeld, 1899References*Herman Heijenbrock on ArtnetHeijenbrock
31079434
Diamond_Frontier
Diamond Frontier is a 1940 American film directed by D. Schuster and starring McLaglen, John Loder and Nagel.(http://ftvdb.bfi.org.uk/sift/title/31286) A man tries to enforce the law in a rowdy African diamond-mining town. It was based on the story Modern Monte Cristo by Rubin and L. Hartmann.Principal cast* McLaglen ... Terrence Regan * John Loder ... Doctor Charles Clayton * Nagel ... Jeanne Krueger * Kellaway ... Noah * Dorn ... Jan Stafford De Winter * Ford ... Derek Bluje * Belmore ..  Piet Bloem * Selbie ... Julia Bloem * Sothern ... Travers * Taylor ... Paul Willem * Anthony Hughes ... Matt CampbellReferences(External links*
31096522
Miami_High_School_(Arizona)
Arizonas Miami High School is located in the town of Arizona. It is the only high school in the Miami Unified School District.HistoryThe high school opened in 1916 in this small mining town. From 1925 to 1934, it housed grades 7 through 12, and it housed just grades 10 through 12 through 1937.Enrollment before the Baby Boom averaged 400 students. In 1967, it reached its all-time enrollment high, 801 students, and it did not go below 700 for another decade. Enrollment has mostly declined since.(http://www.aiaonline.org/story/uploads/schools_as_of_9_3__1118250409.pdf)References
31109229
Horwood_Bagshaw_Ltd.
Horwood Bagshaw Ltd. is an Australian agricultural machinery manufacturer and dealership chain whose origins date from the late 1800s.Horwood and SonsJoel Horwood (ca. 1800 &ndash; 18 May 1864) was a mechanical engineer who arrived in South Australia on the Baboo in 1848 and the following year founded the Colonial Iron Works in Hindley Street, Adelaide. At least three of his four sons were educated at J. L. Youngs Educational Institution; all followed in the same line of business, initially with him, then in different parts of Australia. His firm thus became Horwood & Sons, then with his death and changes in ownership, it became successively Horwood, Ellis & Stevens, Horwood & Ellis in 1866(Advertisement South Australian Register 6 November 1866 p.1 accessed 19 June 2011) then Ellis & Chittleborough in 1868. That firm failed and the business was taken over by James A Whitfield in 1869.(Colonial Iron Works South Australian Register 15 May 1869 p.2 accessed 19 June 2011) A fascinating account of Adelaides iron foundries and heavy engineering workshops of the period may be found herehttp://trove.nla.gov.au/ndp/del/article/39182355.In 1856 his first son, also named Joel Horwood, opened a branch of Horwood & Sons in Vine Street, Bendigo (then called Sandhurst).(Miscellaneous South Australian Advertiser 27 May 1864 p.6 accessed 19 June 2011)He died on 4 May 1900 aged 68 or 70 at his home Glendure on Myrtle Street Bendigo, survived by his second wife Rachelle. The foundry was taken over by the foreman Frank M. Brown in 1902 (http://host3.designexperts.com.au/~bwarchiv/?p9716) Joel (jnr)s son Edward James Horwood was notable in Hill, New South Wales as manager of BHPs mine works.(Sudden Death of Mr. E. J. Horwood Barrier Miner (Broken Hill) 14 November 1940 p.3 accessed 19 June 2011)Joel Horwoods second son, Thomas Horwood (ca. 1829 &ndash; 12 August 1898), ran a Horwood and Son foundry at Wallaroo, ownership of which was taken over in 1869 by T. R. Heath.(Topics of the Day South Australian Advertiser 20 May 1869 p.2 accessed 19 June 2011) He continued to manage the business, then moved to Bendigo.His fourth son, John William Horwood (ca. 1834 &ndash; 23 September 1915) returned to England in 1865 to study engineering and subsequently purchased the Albion Foundry in Victoria.(Personal The Argus (Melbourne) 28 September 1915 p.6 accessed 19 June 2011)J. H. Horwood and Co.His third son, Joseph Henry Horwood (1841 &ndash; 17 April 1913) worked at the Bendigo Iron Works constructing mining equipment. He returned to Adelaide in 1867 to supply the Montacute goldmine with a ten head battery, which he bought back the following year and installed it at the Echunga goldmine. He then spent some time with his mining engineer brother John William Horwood in Victoria before returning to Adelaide in 1872. He built a crushing plant in the Valley, then moved to Moonta to work on the copper mines. On 18 March 1875 he married Maria Brooks, and in the same year started work for Francis Clark & Sons, managing their machinery dealership on Grenfell Street then Blyth Street which they sold in 1882. He then joined Samuel Strapps to form a machinery manufacturing and sales business in Currie Street, bringing foreman Thomas Ward with him.(Obituary The Advertiser 10 September 1927 p.16 accessed 16 June 2011) Horwoods specialty was well-drilling and he built the first steam-powered rock drilling machine, as well as being a pioneer in tube-lined bores.  His fence-wire tensioning device and windmills won several prizes at the Royal Agricultural and Horticultural Society shows. The business moved to Franklin Street in 1906 and became J. H. Horwood and Co. Ltd. in 1912.(Cumming, D. A, Moxham, G They Built South Australia Published by the authors February 1986 ISBN 0 9589111 0 X) Horwood Bagshaw Ltd.His son, Horace R. Horwood (1885?) was apprenticed to his fathers company in 1903, and on completion became a salesman, selling farm machinery from the new Currie Street showrooms. In 1924, after acquiring J.S. Bagshaw & Sons Ltd, he was appointed General Sales Manager and director in the firm newly formed Horwood Bagshaw Ltd((http://www.gabr.net.au/biogs/ABE1793b.htm) and retired in 1953.(Horwood Bagshaw Limited The Advertiser 30 June 1954 accessed 17 January 2011)Around 1960 the company acquired David Shearer Ltd of South Australia.BibliographyHorwood Bagshaw : 125 years progress, 1838-1963 Horwood Bagshaw Ltd, Adelaide, 1963References(
31129049
Alaska-Gastineau_Mining_Company
The Alaska-Gastineau Mining Co. had its offices in 25 Broad St., York City, York, USA.()  It was the operating company for the Alaska Gold Mines Co. in Alaska, USA. It worked the Mine/Perseverance Mine in the Bow Basin, approximately  from Juneau and processed its ore at an old remodeled mill and crushing plant at Sheep Creek.   The property of the Alaska Juneau Gold Mining Co. adjoined the Alaska Gastineau on the west.(HistoryAround 1900, Joseph Gilbert bought the Perseverance claims and, with the assistance of Col. W. J. Sutherland, formed the Alaska Perseverance Mining Co. Their mill began operations in 1907. In 1910, the Alaska Perseverance Mining Co. was reorganized under the name of the Alaska-Gastineau Mining Co.() The company incorporated in York in 1911.() In 1912, the Alaska Gold Mines Co. was organized as a holding company to finance the Alaska-Gastineau Mining Co., and large scale development of the mine commenced in July, 1912.(The mill was constructed in Thane.  It was designed by George Bradley, who also designed the Utah Copper Company mill. Robert Semple began excavating for the foundations in November, 1913. Construction was under the supervision of C. Jackling, the original companys managing director. After 1910, L. Thane, the mining engineer who pioneered hydroelectric power in Alaska,() became managing director.() Charles E. Bruff was superintendent of machinery installation,() while Charles Hayden was the company President.( The average number of employees during 1913 was 900.() It was announced on Nov. 21, 1914, that the first section of the companys reduction works would be in operation after January 1, 1915.() The first unit started up on February 18, 1915. By June 30, 1915, 4000 tons of ore were being crushed daily.() The Alaska Juneau Mining Company purchased all of the Alaska-Gastineau Mining Co. properties and assets in 1934.()HoldingsBy 1915, the companys properties included a net area of 2,166 acres, consisting of 1,672 acres of lodes, 219 acres of placers and 275 acres of millsites and homesteads. The mining claims consisted primarily of four groups, formerly owned and operated independently of each other, locally known as the Alaska Perseverance, Ground Hog, Silver Bow Basin, and Sheep Creek groups. They covered a lode system in excess of 2 miles. The company also owned the 310-acre mill site on the Channel. In addition, the company owned and controlled lands, reservoir sites, power plant sites and rights-of-way on Salmon Creek, emptying into Gastineau Channel; also on Annex Creek and Carlson Creek, emptying into the Inlet; and on Granite Creek, Gold Creek and Lurvey Creek.(OperationsWith the exception of the coarse-crushing plant, the four sections of the mill were housed in one large building. The mill was built of concrete and structural steel.  The coarse-crushing plant was situated on the mountainside at the terminus of the railroad at an altitude of  above sea level. The fine-crushing plant was housed in the same building as the concentrating mill. The lowest floor of the concentrating mills was  above sea-level, affording ample grade for the disposal of the tailing, which was carried into the Gastineau Channel.(About 6,000 horsepower of electricity was required to operate the mines and mills. The big Salmon Creek power stations, owned by the company and erected at the same time as the mine and mill development, furnished the power. There were two stations, one at sea-level near the mouth of the stream, and the other at the upper end of the first basin at an altitude of  immediately below the falls. A concrete dam held in storage  of water as reserve to keep the wheels moving during the winter months.(The office was situated in the companys store. A school was established in a building provided by the company. Private businesses were conducted nearby by consent of the company, including a steam laundry.  Liquor was not sold on the premises, but it could be obtained in Douglas or Juneau.(Major projectsWhile under Thanes management, the company conceived of and constructed the Creek Dam and hydroelectric facilities (completed in 1912), and also the Annex Creek plant (completed in 1916), both designed by Harry L. Wallenberg, chief engineer.() Salmon Creek Dam, the first thin arch dam ever constructed, was built by Thane with the assistance of some of his former football teammates.()References
31143185
Bridgetree
thumb|altAlt|The Cartoonist StudioBridgetree, Inc. is a Mill, South Carolina based company(Bridgetree Official Website Contact Us - US accessed March 10, 2011.)(Moore and VanAllen Notable Cases accessed March 10, 2011.) that collects data and does analysis, related application and programming(My Lowes Coupons Disclaimer accessed on March 14, 2011.), and logistical services(Richard Lee Business People July 23, 2009, accessed March 10, 2011)(United States District Court Bridgetree Vs. Red F Complaint Page 4, May 19, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.). Bridgetree provides services to a variety of industries, such as retail(Lowes Jimmie Jam Sweepstakes Jimmie Jam Sweepstakes Official Rules accessed on March 14, 2011.), services, travel, products, entertainment and non-profits(North American Farmers Direct Marketing Association Speaker Highlights April 14, 2003, Accessed March 10, 2011.) .  The company has corporate operations and data centers in the States with programming and analysis locations in India; India(Muthukalee Data Analyst Jobs in Bangalore : Bridgetree Research Services December 4, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.) and Xian, China(Bridgetree Official Website Contact Us - US accessed March 10, 2011.)(Meck Times - Caitlin Coakley  $6.5M in bonds approved for building rehab November 18, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.).  The company also has a capital arm, where business infrastructure is supplied to companies such as thecartooniststudio.com(Michael C. Juliano Stamford cartoonist drawn to his fans February 8, 2011, accessed on March 9, 2011.), twobitdog.com(United States District Court Bridgetree Vs. Red F Complaint Page 4, May 19, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.)(Bridgetree, Inc. et al v. RED F Marketing LLC et al May 18, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.) and others as an LLC equity stake.  thumb|altAlt|Two Bit Dog History This held company was founded in 1995(Charlotte Business Journal, Ken Elkins Red F stole secrets, Mooresville tech firm claims in suit May 24, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.) as WIT Development, Inc by Mark Beck(Winston Salem Journal - Richard Craver  Shareholders weigh options at Wachovia October 03, 2008, March 10, 2011.) and Charles Albright in 1995 with a motto to make marketing work better.  Early on, the company provided USPS logistics for initial clients Reynolds(North American Farmers Direct Marketing Association Speaker Highlights April 14, 2003, Accessed March 10, 2011.) , Furniture and Airways.   The founders split their business interests in 1997 which led to Mark Beck, renaming his part of the company Bridgetree, Inc.  At this time, Beck added data-mining, data production and consumer databases to the companys list of services.(Bridgetree Official Website History accessed March 10, 2011.)  The company opened Bridgetree Research Services in 2000, added data gathering, programming, and its first data center in 2001.(Bridgetree Official Website History accessed March 10, 2011.)   The company opened a second data center in 2006 and launched Bridgetree Technology Service in Xian, China in 2007.(Bridgetree Official Website History accessed March 10, 2011.)(United States District Court Bridgetree Vs. Red F Complaint Page 4, May 19, 2010, accessed March 10, 2011.)  It started its venture IT partners program in 2008 and opened a mobile application programming(Android Market - Lowes Realtor Program App Lowes Realtor - Bridgetree accessed March 14, 2011.) operation in India in 2010.(Bridgetree Official Website History accessed March 10, 2011.) Work Bridgetree does work for Lowes Home Improvement(My Lowes Coupons  Privacy accessed March 14, 2011.)(Android Market - Lowes Realtor Program App Lowes Realtor - Bridgetree accessed March 14, 2011.), of America, Motorsports, and Adidas. External links * Bridgetree Official Website* Bridgetree on Facebook* Bridgetree on Linked In* The Cartoonist Studio* Two Bit Dog References 
31167189
Ancient_Israelite_cuisine
Ancient Israelite Cuisine refers to the food eaten by the ancient Israelites during a period of over a thousand years, from the beginning of the Israelite presence in the of Israel at the beginning of the Age until the Roman period. The dietary staples were bread, wine and oil, but also included, in varying degrees, legumes, fruits and vegetables, products, fish and meat. Religious beliefs, which prohibited the consumption of certain foods, shaped the Israelite diet. There was considerable continuity in the main components of the diet over time, despite the introduction of new foodstuffs at various stages and the food of ancient Israel was similar to that of other ancient Mediterranean diets.SourcesInformation about the food of the ancient Israelites is based on written sources, archaeological records and comparative evidence from the wider region of the ancient Levant:The primary written source for the period is the Bible, the largest collection of written documents surviving from ancient Israel. Other texts, such as the Sea Scrolls, Apocryphal works, the Testament, the Mishnah and the Talmud also provide information. Epigraphic sources include ostraca from Samaria and Arad.()The Bible provides names of plants and animals that were used for food, such as the lists of permitted and forbidden animals (for example,  and ), and the lists of foods brought to the kings table (for example, ) or the foods that the Israelites are said to have longed for after leaving Egypt (). These lists indicate the potential foods that were available, but not necessarily how regularly the food was eaten or how significant it was in the cuisine, which needs to be derived from other sources.(()Archaeological remains include the items used for the production of food, such as wine or presses; stone and metal implements used in the preparation of food; and amphorae, jars, storerooms and grain pits used for storage. Animal bones provide evidence of meat consumption, the types of animals eaten, and whether they were kept for milk production or other uses, while paleobotanical remains, such as seeds or other carbonized or desiccated plant remains provide information about plant foods.(Using both written and archaeological data, some comparisons can be drawn between the food of ancient Israel and its neighbors. Although there is much information about the foods of ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia, the inferences that can be made are limited due to differences in topography and climate; Israelite agriculture also depended on rainfall rather than the river-based irrigation of these two civilizations, resulting in the preference for different crops. Ugarit and Phoenicia were closer neighbors of ancient Israel, and shared a topography and climate similar to that of ancient Israel. Thus, conclusions about the food and drink in ancient Israel have been made with some confidence from this evidence.(()HistorySignificant milestones in the availability and development food production characteristic of Israelite cuisine occurred well before the Israelite period. On the other hand, vestiges of the cuisine and the practices associated with it continue to resonate in later cuisine and traditions that developed in Israel and Babylonia during the Talmudic period (200 CE  500 CE), and may still be discerned in the various culinary styles that have developed among Jewish communities since then.()Pre-IsraeliteWild species of barley and emmer wheat were domesticated and cultivated in the Jordan River Valley as early as the 9th century BCE.() Archaeologists have found the carbonized seeds of two kinds of primitive wheat, einkorn and emmer, and two-rowed barley, in the earliest levels of digs at Jericho, one of the first inhabited cities in the world.()During the Pottery Neolithic period (6000  4300 BCE), the development of pottery enabled people to produce portable containers for the transportation and storage of food, and an economy based on agriculture and herding developed.() Archaeological evidence indicates that figs,  lentils and broad beans were being cultivated from Neolithic times.()During the Chalcolithic period (4300  3300 BCE), large pottery containers indicative of settled peoples, appear in the archaeological record. palm cultivation began in the Jordan River Valley, and the earliest date pits have been discovered at Gedi by the Sea. In the Golan, olives trees were grown and olive oil was produced there.(Chickpea cultivation dates back to the Bronze Age (3300  1200 BCE)( and grapes and olives became important crops in the hill country. Wine and oil were traded for wheat with the cities on the coastal plain, and for meat and skins with semi-nomadic herders. Wine and carobs were also exported to Egypt during this period. At Arad in the northern Negev, the remains of wheat, barley and legumes have been found, along with stone lined storage pits for grain from this period. Pottery was imported from Cyprus and Mycenae in Greece for the first time, probably for use as good quality tableware. After the Age collapse of urban culture, there was an increase in herding and the disappearance of smaller agricultural communities.(Israelite periodFile:Derech Hadorot 3.JPG|right|thumb|Granaries from an Iron Age Israelite fortress in the Negev, reconstructed at Derech Hadorot, Museum, Haifa.  The Israelite presence emerged during the Early Iron Age  (12001000 BCE), at first in the central hill country, Transjordan and the northern Negev, and later in the Galilee, while the Philistines and other Peoples arrived at roughly the same time and settled in the coastal regions. Pastoralism and husbandry remained important, and walled open spaces in villages that probably served as paddocks have been discovered. The construction of terraces in the hills, and of additional plastered cisterns for water storage, enabled more cultivation than before. Storage pits and silos were dug into the ground to hold grain. Under the united Israelite monarchy, central store cities were built, and greater areas of the northern Negev came under cultivation. The Gezer agricultural calendar detailing the crops that were raised, dates from this period.(After the division of the Israelite kingdom, Jerusalem and a number of other cities expanded, supported by the surrounding villages and farms. These were called daughters of the major towns in the Hebrew Bible (for example,  and ). Large food storage facilities and granaries were built, such as the city of Hazor. During the later Iron Age (Iron Age II) period, roughly the same period as the Israelite and Judean monarchies, olive oil and wine were produced on a large scale for commerce and export, as well as for local consumption.(The ancient Israelites depended on bread, wine and oil as the basic dietary staples() and this trio is often mentioned in the Bible (for example,  and ) and in other texts, such as the Samaria and Arad ostraca.() Written and archaeological evidence indicate that the diet also included other products from plants, trees and animals. Seven basic agricultural products, called the Species, are listed in the Bible: wheat, barley, figs, grapes, olives, pomegranates, and dates ().( The Bible also often describes the land of Israel as a land flowing with milk and honey (for example, ).()The cuisine maintained many consistent traits based on the main products available from the early Israelite period until the Roman period, even though new foods became available during this extended time. For example, rice was introduced during the Persian era; during the Hellenistic period, as trade with the Nabateans increased, more spices became available, at least for those who could afford them, and more Mediterranean fish were imported into the cities; and during the Roman period, cane was introduced.(Post-Second Temple eraThe symbolic food of the ancient Israelites continued to be important among Jews after the destruction of the Temple in 70 CE and the beginning of the Diaspora. Bread, wine, and olive oil were seen as direct links to the three main crops of ancient Israel  wheat, grapes, and olives. In the Bible, this trio is described as representing the divine response to human needs () and particularly the need for the seasonal rains vital for the successful cultivation of these three crops. ().() The significance of wine, bread and oil is indicated by their incorporation into Jewish religious ritual, with the blessings over wine and bread for Sabbath and holiday meals and at religious ceremonies such as weddings, and the lighting of Sabbath and festival lights with olive oil.(()()CharacteristicsThe daily diet of the ordinary ancient Israelite was mainly one of bread, cooked grains and legumes. Bread was eaten with every meal. Vegetables played a smaller, but significant role in the diet. The Israelites drank goat and sheeps milk when it was available in the spring and summer, and ate butter and cheese. Figs and grapes were the fruits most commonly eaten, while dates, pomegranates and other fruits and nuts were eaten more occasionally. Wine was the most popular beverage and sometimes other fermented beverages were produced. Olives were used primarily for their oil. Meat, usually goat and mutton, was eaten rarely and was reserved for special occasions such as celebrations, festival meals or sacrificial feasts. Game, birds, eggs and fish were also eaten, depending on availability.()()Most food was eaten fresh and in season. Fruits and vegetables had to be eaten as they ripened and before they spoiled. People had to contend with periodic episodes of hunger and famine; producing enough food required hard and well-timed labor, and the climatic conditions resulted in unpredictable harvests and the need to store as much food as possible. Thus, grapes were made into raisins and wine; olives were made into oil; figs, beans and lentils were dried; and grains were stored for use throughout the year.( The diet was essentially vegetarian. A typical daily meal is illustrated by the biblical description of the rations that Abigail brought to Davids group: bread, wine, roasted grain, raisins and fig cakes ().((The text also mentions five sheep, but ordinarily, meat was reserved for special occasions)FoodsGrains and breadImage:Wheat P1210892.jpg|right|thumb|wheat was the wheat most commonly grown in ancient IsraelGrain products comprised the majority of the food consumed by the ancient Israelites. The staple food was bread, and it was such a vital part of each meal that the Hebrew word for bread, lehem, also referred to food in general. The supreme importance of bread to the ancient Israelites is also demonstrated by the fact that Hebrew has at least a dozen words for bread, and bread features in numerous Hebrew proverbs (for example, , ).(() Bread was eaten at just about every meal, and is estimated to have provided from 50 to 70 percent of an ordinary persons daily calories. The bread eaten until the end of the Israelite monarchy was mainly made from barley flour; during the Second Temple period, bread from wheat flour become predominant.((Porridge and gruel were made from ground grain, water, salt and butter. This mixture also formed the basis for cakes, to which oil and fruits were sometimes added before baking.()The Israelites cultivated both wheat and barley. These two grains are mentioned first in the biblical list of the Seven Species of the land of Israel and their importance as food is also seen in the celebration of the barley harvest at the festival of Shavuot and of the wheat harvest at the festival of Sukkot.(Rice was introduced during the early Second Temple period through contact with the Persians. By the Roman period, rice had become an important export, and the Talmud states about rice that there is none like it outside Israel, and that notable rabbis served rice at the seder.(()BarleyImage:Hordeum-barley.jpg|right|175px|thumb|Barley was the grain most commonly used to make into flour for bread in Iron Age Israel. Barley (hordeum vulgare) was the most important grain during the biblical period, and this was recognized ritually on the second day of Passover in the Omer offering, consisting of barley flour from the newly ripened crop. Furthermore, its significance to Israelite society, not only as a source of food, is illustrated by the biblical method for measuring a field by the amount of barley (rather than of wheat) with which it could be sown.()Barley was initially predominant because it matured earlier and tolerated harsher conditions than wheat, growing in areas with less rainfall and poorer soils, such as the northern Negev and the hill country.( It had a high yield potential and was resistant to insect infestation. It could be sown without plowing, and could therefore be grown on small plots of land that oxen or even donkeys could not reach, and it did not need artificial irrigation. It ripened a month earlier than wheat and was thus available to replenish supplies used up during the winter sooner than wheat, and also provide some security if the more vulnerable wheat crop was poor or failed.(Two varieties of barley were cultivated: two rowed and sixed rowed. Two rowed barley was the older, hulled form; six rowed barley was unhulled and easier to thresh, and since the kernels remained intact, store for longer periods. Hulled barley was thus the prevalent type during the Iron Age, but gruels made from it must have had a gritty taste due to the barleys tough outer layers.(Bread was primarily made from barley flour during the Iron Age (, ), as barley was more widely and easily grown, and was thus more available, cheaper, and could be made into bread without a agent( even though wheat flour was regarded as superior.( It was presumably made from dough that was a simple mixture of barley flour and water, divided into small pieces, formed by hand into round shapes and then baked.(However, barley declined as the staple from the biblical period, to a poverty food by the end of the Second Temple period, and by the Talmudic era it was regarded mostly as animal fodder.(WheatEmmer wheat (triticum dicoccum) was initially the most widespread variety of wheat, as it grew well in the warm climate and was resistant to fungal rot. It was high yielding, with large grains and relatively high amounts of gluten, and bread made from emmer wheat flour was thus fairly light in texture. However, emmer required time-consuming pounding or roasting to remove its husk, and during the Iron Age, durum wheat (triticum durum), a descendent of emmer, gradually replaced emmer and became the favored grain for making fine flour. Durum grew well in the rich soil of the larger valleys of the central and northern areas of the country, where rainfall exceeded 225 millimeters per year, was higher yielding than emmer, and its grains released more easily from the chaff. It could therefore be separated from the husk without roasting or pounding first, thus reducing the work required for threshing, and also leaving most of the grains whole, which was better for longer storage.(()However, durum is a hard grain and was difficult to grind with the early hand-held grindstones. The flour also had to be sifted repeatedly to obtain fine flour (such as the solet required in the Temple offerings). Thus, durum was primarily used for porridges, or parboiled and dried, or roasted and boiled, and barley flour continued to be used for making bread, until another hybrid of emmer, common or bread wheat (triticum aestivum) replaced barley as the primary grain after the Greek conquest of the land of Israel and, together with durum wheat, became widespread during the Greco-Roman period, constituting the bulk of the grain crop by the end of the Second Temple period. The introduction of common wheat, which contained more starch and had a higher level of gluten, spread the use of wheat for bread-making and led to the production of loaves that were more lightly textured than barley and durum wheat breads.()Preparation of grainsA series of developments in technology for threshing, milling and baking improved both the quantity and the quality of the grain and the means for preparation that were available, from the beginning of the Iron Age until the end of the Second Temple period:In the early Iron Age, grain was threshed to remove it from the stalks by beating it with sticks or by oxen treading on it. This usually broke most of the grain kernels, which limited their storage time because broken kernels spoil more quickly than unbroken ones. The development of the threshing-board, which was pulled over the stalks by oxen, left most of the grain kernels intact and enhanced their storage time. Numerous floors and threshing boards have been discovered at archaeological sites of ancient Israel.(Once separated from the stalks, the grain was used in a number of ways: Most simply, unripe kernels of grain were eaten fresh, particularly in the spring, before ripe grain was available, and both unripe and ripe grain was roasted over fire for immediate use. Ripe grains of wheat were also parboiled and dried, like modern bulgur, and then prepared as porridge. Whole or cracked grain was also used to make gruel and in stews. Most frequently, grains were ground into flour to prepare bread.((Bread makingBread was the main source of nourishment in biblical times and making bread was a daily activity:(File:Meule et broyeur - Orgnac.JPG|250px|thumb|An upper hand stone was used to grind grain on the lower stone.Bread making began with the milling of the grain. It was a difficult and time-consuming task, performed by women. Each household stored its own grain, and it is estimated that it required at least three hours of daily effort to produce enough flour to make sufficient bread for a family of five. The earliest milling was performed with a and mortar, or a stone quern consisting of a large lower stone that held the grain and a smooth upper stone that was moved back and forth over the grains (). This often left small pieces of grit in the flour. The use of the millstone became more widespread during the Iron Age, resulting in greater speed and increased production of flour. Smaller versions for household use, the rotary or beehive quern, appeared during the early Persian period.((After the grain was milled into flour, it was mixed with water and kneaded in a large trough. For dough made with wheat flour, starter, called seor, was added. The starter was prepared by reserving a small portion of dough from a previous batch to absorb the yeasts in the air and thus help leaven the new dough. Seor thus gave the bread a sourdough flavor.(Once prepared, the dough could be baked in various ways:Initially, the dough was placed directly on the heated stones of a cooking fire or in a griddle or pan made of clay or iron (). In the time of the Temple, two types of oven were used for baking bread: the jar oven and the pit-oven. The jar-oven was a large pottery container, narrowing into an opening toward the top; fuel was burned on the inside to heat it and the dough was pressed against the outside to bake. The pit-oven was a clay-lined excavation in the ground in which the fuel was burned and then pushed aside, and the loaves were baked on the heated surface. People also began placing a convex dome, initially earthenware and later metal, over the pit-oven and cooking the flatbreads on the dome instead of on the ash-covered surface; this type of oven is probably what was meant by the biblical machabat, often translated as griddle.(The Persians introduced a clay oven called a tanur (similar to the Indian tandoor), which had an opening at the bottom for the fire, and through which the bread was placed to be baked on the inner wall of the upper chamber from the heat of the oven and ashes after the flames had died down. This continued to be the way in which Jews baked bread until modern times. The remains of clay ovens, and fragments of bread trays have been found in several archaeological excavations.((All these methods produced only quite thin loaves and the custom was thus to break bread rather than cut it. The bread was soft and pliable and used for dipping and sopping up gravies and juices.((The Romans introduced an oven called a furn (purni in Aramaic), a large, wood-burning, stone-lined oven with a bottom on which the dough or baking sheet was placed. This provided a major advance in bread and pastry baking, and made the baking of much thicker loaves possible.(A variety of breads was produced. Probably most common were unleavened flat loaves called ugah or kikkar.( Another type was a thin wafer, known as a rakik. A thicker loaf, known as hallah was made with the best quality flour, usually for ritual purposes.((Bread was sometimes enriched by the addition of flour from legumes (). The Mishna (Hallah 2:2) mentions bread dough made with fruit juice instead of water. The sugar in the juice, interacting with the flour and water, provided some leavening and sweetened the bread.( The Israelites also sometimes added fennel and cumin to bread dough for flavor, and dipped their bread in vinegar, () olive or sesame oil for extra flavor.(LegumesAfter grain, legumes such as lentils, broad or fava beans, chickpeas and peas were the main element in the diet and were the main source of protein, since meat was rarely eaten.()Broad beans, chickpeas and lentils are the only legumes mentioned in the Bible but lentils, broad beans, chickpeas, fenugreek, peas and bitter vetch have been found at Iron Age Israelite sites. By the Roman period, legumes are mentioned frequently in other texts. They are cited as one of the elements of the wifes food basket in the Mishna (Ketubot 5:8), by which it is estimated that legumes supplied 17% of daily calories at that time.(Lentils were the most important of the legumes and were used to make pottages and soups, as well as cakes made from ground roasted lentils pressed and fried in oil and called ashishim, such as those that King David is described as distributing to the people when the of the Covenant was brought to Jerusalem.()Stews made of lentils or beans were common and they were cooked with onion, garlic and leeks for flavor. Fresh legumes were also roasted, or dried and stored for extended periods. They were then cooked in a soup or a stew. The Bible mentions roasted legumes (), and relates how Jacob prepared bread and a pottage of lentils for Esau ().((VegetablesVegetables are not found often in the archaeological record and it is difficult to determine the role that they played, because plant foods were often eaten raw or were simply boiled, without requiring special equipment for preparation, and thus barely leaving any trace other than the type of food itself.() Vegetables also are not mentioned often in the written record, and when the Bible does mention them, the attitude is mixed: sometimes they are regarded as a delicacy, but more often, they were held in low esteem (for example, (, ).(() Vegetables were perhaps a more important food at the extremes in society: the wealthy who could afford to dedicate land and resources to grow them, and the poor who depended on gathering them in the wild to supplement their meager supplies. More people may have gathered wild plants during famine conditions.(Vegetables that were commonly eaten included squash, leeks, garlic and onions, black radishes, net or muskmelons (sometimes misidentified as the cucumber) and watermelons.() Other vegetables played a minor role in the diet of the ancient Israelites. Field greens and root plants were generally not cultivated and were gathered seasonally when they grew in the wild.( Leafy plants included dandelion greens and the young leaves of the orach plant.((Leeks, onions and garlic were eaten both cooked in stews, and uncooked with bread, and their popularity may be indicated by the observation in the Bible that they are among the foods that the Israelites yearned for after leaving Egypt.(() Squash and melons were eaten raw, or flavored with vinegar. Black radishes were also were eaten raw when in season during the autumn and winter. The Talmud mentions the use of radish seeds to produce oil, and considered eating radishes to have health benefits.(virosa 20052001.JPG|thumb| Wild lettuce, or chazeret, was eaten as a bitter herb at the Passover mealWild herbs were collected and were eaten uncooked or cooked. These are known to have included garden rocket and mallow( and both leaf chicory and endive.()Wild lettuce, known as chazeret, was a leafy herb with prickly, red tinged leaves that became bitter as they matured. It was cultivated from around 800 BCE. Sweeter head-lettuce was only developed and introduced by the Romans. Bitter herbs eaten at the Passover sacrifice with the unleavened bread, matza, were known as merorim. Chazeret is listed in the Mishna (Pesahim 2:6) as the preferred bitter herb for this Passover ritual, along with other bitter herbs, including chicory or endive (ulshin), horehound (tamcha), reichardia or eryngo (charchavina) and wormwood (maror).(()Mushrooms, especially of the Boletus type, were gathered in many areas, particularly when plentiful after a major rainfall. The Talmud mentions mushrooms in connection with their exemption from tithes and as a desert at the Passover seder.()Sesame seeds were used in the preparation of oil, or were eaten dry, or were added to dishes such as stews as a flavoring; the leftovers after pressing out the oil were eaten in a cake form.() The Hebrew for sesame, shumshum, is related to the Akkadian samassammu, meaning oil plant, as the seeds contain about 50% oil, which was pressed from the seeds. Sesame is not mentioned in the Bible, but the Mishna lists sesame oil as suitable for lighting the Sabbath lights, and the oil was also used for frying.()FruitFruit was an important source of food for the Israelites, particularly grapes, olives and figs. Grapes were grown mostly for wine, although some were eaten fresh at harvest time, or dried as raisins for storage while olives were grown exclusively for their oil, until the Roman period. Other fruits that were eaten were the date, pomegranate and sycamore fig.()()The ancient Israelites built terraces of leveled areas in the hill country for planting a variety of crops, including grains, vegetables and trees.() All the trees, with the exception of the olive, produced fruit that could be eaten fresh or be made into fresh juice while in season. Fruit was also processed for later use in a variety of ways: Fruit with high sugar content was fermented to make alcoholic beverages; grapes were most commonly used for this. Fruit was also boiled down into thick, sweet syrup, referred to in the Bible as dvash (honey). Grapes, figs, dates and apricots were also dried and preserved individually or put on a string or pressed into cakes. Since dried fruit are an efficient source of energy, they were prepared as provisions for journeys and long marches.(()Olives and olive oilThe olive is one of the biblical Seven Species and one of the three elements of the Mediterranean triad in Israelite cuisine. oil was used for not only as food and for cooking, but also for lighting, sacrificial offerings, ointment, and anointment for priestly or royal office.()left|thumb|Olives were one of ancient Israels most important natural resourcesThe olive tree was well suited to the climate and soil of the Israelite highlands and a significant part of the hill country was allocated to the cultivation of olive trees, which were one of ancient Israels most important natural resources.( Olive oil was more versatile and longer-lasting than the oil from other plants, such as sesame, and was also considered to be the best-tasting.(Although olives were used to produce oil from the Bronze Age, it was only by the Roman period that the techniques were introduced to cure olives in lye and then brine to remove their natural bitterness and make them edible as a food.()()Olives were harvested in the late summer and were processed for oil by crushing the olives, pressing the mash and separating the oil from the flesh. In the early Iron Age period, this was done by treading the olives in basins cut into rock, or with a mortar or stone on a flat slab. In the later Iron Age period, the introduction of the beam press made large scale processing possible.(The discovery of many ancient olive presses in various locations indicates that olive oil production was highly developed in ancient Israel. The oil production center dating from the 7th century BCE discovered at Ekron, a Philistine city, has over one hundred large olive oil presses, and is the most complete olive oil production center from ancient times to be discovered. It indicates that ancient Israel was a major producer of olive oil for its residents as well as for other parts of the Near East, such as Egypt and especially Mesopotamia.(( In addition to the large-scale olive oil production for commerce and export, presses have been found in ordinary houses, indicating that this was also a cottage industry.(Archaeological remains at Masada and other sites indicate that the most common olive cultivar was the indigenous Nabali, followed by the Souri. In Roman times, other olive cultivars were imported from Syria and Egypt.(There is also some written information about olive oil. The Bible describes its use in relation to certain sacrifices in which olive oil is used (for example, (, ). However, these sacrificial recipes can be assumed to represent some of the everyday uses of oil and methods for cooking and frying.( Olive oil was mixed with flour to make bread in the story of Elijah and the widow of Zarephath () and is also noted as a valuable product for eating (). Olive oil is also mentioned on the Samaria and Arad ostraca.(The consumption of olive oil varied with social class  it was less available to the poor, but it may have become more available later in the Israelite period as the means of production improved and became more widespread. By early Roman times, the Mishna indicates that it was one of the four essential foods that a husband had to provide his wife, and it has been calculated that at a minimum, this represented about 11 percent of the overall calories supplied by the food basket described at that time.(GrapesGrapes are another of the biblical Seven Species and were used mainly for the production of wine, although they were also eaten fresh and dried. Grapes were dried in the sun to produce raisins, which could then be stored for a long time. Raisins were also pressed into clusters and dried as cakes, which kept the interior raisins softer.(()Grapes were also used to produce a thick, honey-like liquid, called grape honey (dvash anavim) that was used as a sweetener. Grape honey was made by treading the grapes in vats, but instead of fermenting the liquid produced, it was boiled to evaporate the water content, leaving behind the thick grape-honey syrup.( Figs Figs (1).jpg|right|thumb|Dried figs were a significant source of winter food Figs were an important source of food. Figs were cultivated throughout the land of Israel and fresh or dried figs were part of the daily diet. A common way of preparing dried figs was to chop them and press them into a cake.()Figs are one of the biblical Seven Species and are frequently mentioned in the Bible (for example, ,  and ).( The remains of dried figs have been discovered from as early as the Neolithic period in Gezer, Israel( and Gilgal in the Jordan Valley.() The fig tree (ficus carica) grew well in the hill country and produced two crops a season. Early ripening figs were regarded as delicacy because of their sweetness and were eaten fresh. Figs ripening in the later harvest were often dried and strung into a chain, or pressed into hard round or square-shaped cakes called a develah, and stored as a major source of winter food. The blocks of dried fig were sliced and eaten like bread.(( The Mishna mentions figs as one the components of the prescribed wifes food basket and they are estimated to have constituted 16% of the overall calories of the basket.( Dates Dates were eaten fresh or dried, but were used mostly boiled into thick, long-lasting syrup called date honey (dvash temarim) for use as a sweetener. This syrup was prepared by soaking the dates in water for some time until they disintegrated and then boiling the resulting liquid down into thick syrup. The honey in the Biblical reference of a land flowing with milk and honey is date honey.(()Fresh, ripe dates were available from the mid- to late-summer. Some were sun-dried and pressed into blocks to dry completely, and then used throughout the year, especially as food for travelers. Dates were also fermented into one of the strong drinks referred to in the Bible as shechar.(The date palm required a hot and dry climate and mostly grew and produced fruit in the Rift Valley, from Jericho to the of Galilee.( In these arid areas, the date was sometimes the only plant food available, and was a primary component of the diet, but it was less important elsewhere.( Pomegranates File:Half Shekel.jpg|thumb| Silver half shekel coins minted during the JewishRoman War show three pomegranates on the reverse.Pomegranates were usually eaten fresh, although occasionally they were used to make juice or wine, or sun-dried for use when the fresh fruit was out of season. They probably played a minor part in Israelite cuisine, but were symbolically important, as adornments on the hem of the robe of the high priest and the Temple pillars, and embossed on coinage, and are also listed in the Bible as one of the Seven Species of the Land of Israel.(()Other fruits and nutsFruit, such as the sycamore fig, carob, mulberry, and possibly the apple were also eaten.( Usually, these fruits were not cultivated but were picked in the wild when they were in season.(The fig (ficus sycamorus) was very common in the warmer parts of Israel and was grown primarily for its wood, but it provided a steady supply of small figs, eaten mainly by the poor.(Other native trees producing fruits included the carob, which was probably popular due to its sweet taste, and the black mulberry.(The tapuah, which means apple in modern Hebrew, is mentioned in the Bible, but it is not clear if this referred to another fruit, such as the quince.()Almonds, walnuts and pistachios were eaten and are mentioned in the Bible. Almonds were widespread in the region from prehistoric times and the Bible mentions almonds (shaked) and pistachios (botnim) as among the choice fruits of the land sent by Jacob as a gift to the ruler of Egypt (). Almonds and pistachios were probably eaten primarily by the wealthy. The walnut reached Israel from Mesopotamia by at least 2000 BCE and is mentioned once in the Bible (). Walnuts became common during the Second Temple period and so widespread that the word for walnut, egoz, became the generic Hebrew word for nut at that time.(()Wine and other drinksThe Israelites usually drank water drawn from wells, cisterns or rivers. They also drank milk (for example, as mentioned in the Bible in ), often in the form of sour milk, thin yoghurt or whey, when it was available in the spring and summer. They drank fresh juices from fruits in season as well.( The most strongly preferred beverage was wine, although some beer may have also been produced() and wine was an important part of the diet and a source of calories, sugar, and iron.( Making wine was also a practical way to preserve fruit juices for long-term storage. Usually, wine was made from grapes for everyday use, as well as for rituals, such as sacrificial libations. Less often, wine was made from pomegranates and dates.(WineThe Mediterranean climate and soil of the mountainous areas of the area are well suited to viticulture, and both archaeological evidence and written records indicate the significant cultivation of grapes in ancient Israel and the popularity of wine-drinking. The production capacity apparent from archaeological remains and the frequent biblical references to wine suggest that it was the principal beverage of the ancient Israelites. Based on the remains of wine production facilities and storage rooms, it has been estimated that on average, people could have consumed one liter of wine per person per day.()File:MigdalHaemek5.jpg|left|thumb|Ancient Israelite wine press at HaEmek. Many rock-hewn winepresses and vats, dating to the biblical period, have been found. One typical example at Gibeon has a wide surface for treading the grapes and a series of collecting vats. Archaeological finds at Ashkelon and Gibeon indicate large large-scale wine production in the eighth and seventh centuries BCE, which most likely developed to supply the Assyrian empire, and then the Babylonians, as well as the local population. Vineyards are mentioned many times in the Bible, including in detailed descriptions of the method for establishing a vineyard () and the types of vines ().(() The Bible refers to several types of wine and one of the Arad ostraca also mentions wine among the supplies being sent to a garrison of soldiers.(Another indication of the importance of wine in ancient Israel is that Hebrew contains numerous terms for various stages and types of vines, varieties and words for wine. The word yayin was used both as a generic word for wine and as a term for wine in its first year, once it had undergone sufficient fermentation from the initial stage, when it was called tirosh.( The type of wine was determined by the grapes, the time allowed for fermentation, and the of the wine.(The often coarse and unrefined taste of wine was adjusted to make it more drinkable. Spices were added directly to the wine to improve the aroma, and other ingredients, such as honey, pepper, herbs and even lime, resin or seawater were added to improve the flavor or disguise a poor-tasting wine. Wine was also sweetened by the addition of grape juice syrup.() Wine was also sometimes given an aroma by rubbing the winepress with wood resin.( On the other hand, wine could also be added to drinking water to improve the taste, especially towards the end of the summer when rainwater had been standing in a cistern for at least six months. This also had the beneficial effect of lowering the bacteria content of the water.(right|thumb| Grapes were important for the production of wine in ancient IsraelAfter the grape harvest in mid-summer, most grapes were taken to wine presses to extract their juice for winemaking. Once fermented, wine was transferred to wineskins or large amphorae for storage. Israelite amphorae were typically tall with large handles and little decoration, and the handles were often inscribed with the name of the city in which the wine had been produced, the winemakers stamp and sometimes the year and the vintage. Amphorae made long term storage possible, especially in caves or cool cellars. Glass bottles were introduced only in the 1st century CE by the Romans.(The insides of amphorae were often coated with a preservative resin, such as from the terebinth, and this imparted a pine flavor and aroma to the wine. Before the jars were sealed with pitch, they were filled completely and often topped with a thin layer of olive oil to prevent spoilage due to exposure to air.(During the Greek period, the style of winemaking changed. grapes were first dried to concentrate the sugars, and these then produced a much sweeter and higher content wine that needed to be diluted with water to be drinkable. Before this, watered-down wine was disparaged, but by the time of the Talmud, wine that did not require dilution with water was considered unfit for consumption.(BeerBeer, produced by brewing barley, was another alcoholic beverage common in the ancient Near East. Beer was the primary beverage of ancient Egypt and Mesopotamia and it can be assumed that in Israel, which is located between the two, beer was also known. The biblical term sekhar may refer to beer or to alcoholic drinks in general.(()The production of bread and beer were closely linked, since barley was the same key ingredient used for both, and most of the tools used in beer production, such as mortars, querns and winnowing baskets were also the same as for bread making. Archaeological evidence specific to beer making is thus uncommon, and earlier indications were that the ancient Israelites did not often drink beer. More recently, Iron Age sites in Israel have produced remains such as beer jugs, bottles, strainers and stoppers, all of which provide evidence that the Israelites drank beer.( Nonetheless, the widespread cultivation of grapes, used primarily for winemaking, indicates that wine drinking was probably far more common than beer drinking.(MeatThe Israelites usually ate meat from domesticated goats and sheep. Goats meat was the most common. sheep were the predominant variety of sheep in ancient Israel but as sheep were valued more than goats, they were eaten less often. The fat of the tail was considered a delicacy() and even until modern times, it was prized in the of the Mizrahi Jews. Beef and venison were eaten primarily by the elites, and fattened calves provided veal for the wealthy (for example, as mentioned in the Bible, ).()For most people, meat was eaten only a few times a year when animals were slaughtered for the major festivals, or at tribal meetings, celebrations such as weddings, and for the visits of important guests (). Only at the kings table was meat served daily, according to the Bible.(Although most meat was obtained from domesticated animals, meat from hunted animals was also sometimes available, as the story of Isaac and Esau (), certain Biblical lists (for example, ), and archaeological evidence indicate. The remains of gazelle, deer and deer are the most commonly found in the archaeological record. Archaeological evidence from an Iron Age market excavated at Ashkelon shows that game was also sold to those who could not hunt or trap them themselves.() However, meat from wild animals was more common at times of economic distress and in the northern areas, where forests and open land provided a habitat for more wild animals.()Meat was prepared in several different ways. The most common was to cook it with water as a broth or a stew (for example, ). Meat stewed with onions, garlic and leeks and flavored with cumin and coriander is described on ancient Babylonian cuneiform tablets, and it is most likely that it was prepared similarly in ancient Israel. Stewed meat was considered to be a dish worthy of serving to honored guests (). A less common way to prepare meat was to roast it over an open fire, but this was done particularly for the meat of the Passover lamb. For long-term storage, meat was smoked, dried or salted, according to indications in texts and ethnographic studies.((Poultry and eggsThe Israelites ate domesticated birds such as pigeons, turtledoves, ducks and geese, and wild birds such as quail and partridge. Remains from archaeological excavations at the Ophel in Jerusalem and other Iron Age sites show that domestic birds were available, but consumption was small. The inclusion of pigeons and turtledoves in the Biblical sacrifice lists implies that they were raised domestically, and the remains of dovecotes discovered from the Greek and Roman periods confirm this. Biblical references and archaeological evidence also demonstrate that wild birds were hunted and eaten.()()The turtledove was present from about April to October, while the pigeon was available throughout the year. The pigeon appears to have been domesticated in Sumeria and Canaan during the second millennium BCE, and remained the predominant fowl in ancient Israel until the end of the Second Temple period. Nonetheless, to avoid the spread of disease, pigeons could only be raised in small numbers and were thus fairly costly and not a regular part of the diet.()Geese, originally domesticated in ancient Egypt, were raised in ancient Israel. They are most likely the fattened fowl on King Solomons table ().  Goose breeding is also discussed in the Mishna.( Like other animals, birds were fattened for consumption on special occasions, and for the wealthy.(It is unclear when chicken became part of the diet. There are some archaeological remains from Iron Age sites, but these were likely from roosters as a fighting bird, which are also pictured on seals from the period as a symbol of ferocity, such as on the 6th century BCE onyx seal of Jaazaniah.(() Chicken became common around the 2nd century BCE, and during the Roman period, chickens emerged as an important feature of the cuisine, with the Talmud describing it as the choicest of birds.() By Roman times pigeons and chickens were the principle poultry.(Until the domestication of the chicken, eggs were available in limited quantities and were considered a delicacy, as in ancient Egypt.() The most common birds  turtledoves and pigeons   were reared for their meat and not for their very small eggs. Biblical references to eggs are only in reference to gathering them from the wild (for example,  and ).(( Eggs seem to have increased in use for food only with the introduction of chickens as food, and were commonly used as food by Roman times.()FishThe Israelites ate a variety of fresh and saltwater fish, according to both archaeological and textual evidence.() Remains of freshwater fish from the Yarkon and rivers and the Sea of Galilee have been found in excavations, and include St. Peters fish and mouthbreeders. Saltwater fish discovered in excavations include bream, grouper, meager and gray mullet. Most of these come from the Mediterranean, but in the later Iron Age period, some are from the Sea.()Fishermen supplied fish to inland communities, as remains of fish, including bones and scales, have been discovered at many inland sites. To preserve them for transport, the fish were first smoked or dried and salted.( Merchants also imported fish, sometimes from as far as from Egypt, where pickled roe was an export article.( Remains of Nile Perch from Egypt have been found, and these must have been smoked or dried, before being imported through the trade network that connected ancient Near Eastern societies.( Merchants shipped fish to Jerusalem and there was evidently a significant trade in fish; one of the gates of Jerusalem was called the Fish Gate, named for a fish market nearby (, , , , ).((()It is unclear to what extent fish played a role in the cuisine, but it is apparent that fish became steadily more available during the Israelite and Judean monarchies. Fish products were salted and dried and sent great distances. However, even in the later Persian, Greek and Roman periods, the cost of preserving and transporting fish must have meant that only wealthier inhabitants of the highland towns and cities could afford it, or those who lived close to the sources, where it was less expensive.(Dairy foodsGoats, and to a lesser extent, sheep, provided milk for part of the year, and milk and products were a significant source of food. Dairy products are mentioned in the Bible (for example, , , and , and a repeated description of the Land of Israel in the Bible is a land flowing with milk and honey (for example, , , and ).()()Fresh milk could not be stored for long without spoiling. Typically, thick sour milk called laban was drunk because the Israelites stored the milk in skin containers, in which it curdled quickly.(((DailyLife, pg. 68: However, the meal that Abraham is described as serving to his guests (Gen 18:8) shows that fresh milk was an important part of a sumptuous meal. Fresh milk was also a thirst-quenching drink, as described in the story of Yael and Sisera (Judges 4:19).)Milk had to be processed to preserve it. This was done by first churning it, using a goatskin or clay container to separate the butterfat from the whey. The butterfat was processed by boiling and then cooling it to make butter, which could then be stored for a long time.(() Clarified butter was used principally for cooking and frying. churns have been excavated at Beersheba, dating from the 4th century BCE, and other ancient Israelite sites.((Goat milk and sheeps milk cheeses were the most prevalent types of cheese. Soft cheese was made using cloth bags filled with soured milk. The thin liquid was drained through the cloth and soft cheese remained in the bag. A hard cheese was made from fermented soured milk: Milk was poured into special moulds in which it curdled and was then hardened by drying in the sun or by heating and numerous small cheese molds with holes for the draining the whey have been discovered. Cheese is not mentioned often in the Bible, but in one case, David is sent to take a gift of cheese to the commander of the army ().((()The Mishna and Talmud mention using the sap of fruit trees, such as figs, to harden cheese (a method still used by nomadic herders of the region until modern times). Using fig sap instead of animal enzymes to make cheese also conformed to the prohibition on mixing meat and milk.(HoneyFruit syrup called dvash served as the primary sweetener and was most often made from dates. It was not until Talmudic times that the word dvash, now translated as honey, generally meant bee honey. The Biblical term dvash usually did not mean bee honey, but thick syrup obtained from grapes, figs or dates. This syrup was similar to the date syrup, or halek, that many Mizrahi Jews continue to use in modern times.((Roden pg. 627)()The Biblical references to honey from the crag () or honey from the rock () could refer either to fig honey, as fig trees commonly grew in rocky outcrops, or to honey collected from wild bees, which made their nests in these places, as they still do in the region until today. The Bible refers to honey from bees in only a few instances, for example, when Samson eats honey from bees made in the carcass of a lion () and when Jonathan eats honey from a honeycomb (), and these references are to honey obtained from the wild.(Nonetheless, the oldest archaeological find relating to beekeeping discovered to date is an apiary dating from about 900 BC at Rehov, a Bronze- and Iron Age site in the Jordan Valley. The hives, made of straw and unbaked clay, could have housed more than a million bees, and indicate that honey was produced on a large scale.() It is most likely that the inhabitants of Tel Rehov imported the bees from Anatolia because they were less aggressive than the local bees and produced a higher yield of honey.() It is also possible that the domestication of bees for honey production was introduced from Egypt during the Iron Age and honey was being obtained from domesticated bees from late in the Iron Age period.(()SeasoningsFile:Majorana syriaca - zaatar.jpg|right|thumb|Hyssop, called ezov, was used as a seasoning. The most common and important seasoning was salt (), demonstrated by the fact that it is referred to throughout the Bible and its use was mandated with most sacrifices (). Salt was obtained from the Mediterranean or the Sea. It was produced by evaporating seawater from both natural and artificially created drying pans along the Mediterranean coast. It was also obtained by mining salt deposits, such as at Sodom near the Dead Sea. Salt had to be transported to other locations, so most communities had to purchase it.(((()Food was also flavored by plants, most native to the region and either cultivated or gathered in the wild, although a few spices were imported. Garlic and onions, and possibly fenugreek, were used to season cooked foods, as well as being eaten as vegetables. Herbs and spices included capers, coriander, cumin and black cumin, dill, dwarf chicory, hyssop, marjoram, mint, black mustard, reichardia, saffron and thyme. Some seasonings were imported, such as myrrh, galbanum, saffron and cinnamon, but their high cost limited their widespread use. Spices for special feasts were imported by the wealthy and royalty from Arabia and India, and were highly valued. These included various types of pepper, and ginger.(((Another seasoning was vinegar, which was produced by extra fermentation of new wine. It was used for seasoning foods, pickling vegetables, and medicinal purposes.(()Storage and preparationStoring water and food was critical for survival, and particularly, being able to store enough food for use from one harvest to the next. To protect grain from damp and vermin, underground granaries were used for the bulk storage of grain. Families also stored grain, wine and oil in large pottery jars in their houses. When well protected, wheat, barley, legumes and nuts could be kept for long periods. Rainwater from roofs and courtyards was collected in cisterns to supplement natural sources like springs and wells.()()Fermentation, oil extraction and drying were all ways of converting food into products that could be stored. Feeding crops to animals was also a means of storage on the hoof with the animals converting the fodder into meat or milk.((Food was cooked in pots made of clay and placed on earthenware stands built in a horseshoe shape, so that the fire could be lit through the opening, under the pot, or pots were suspended above the fire from tripods.(Cooked food included soups and stews that were a mixture of meat and vegetables. Beans and lentils were likely to have been cooked several times a week. However, vegetables, such as squash, garlic, leek and onions were also eaten uncooked.(MealsMeals eaten by the Israelites fell into two categories: daily meals, and festive or ritual meals.Daily mealsDaily meals were prepared by women. Two daily meals were usually eaten by the family, either in the home or in the field. The first meal was eaten in the late-morning, as a break in the workday, and could include roasted grain, olives, figs or some other fruit, bread, dipped in olive oil or vinegar, or eaten with garlic, onions or black radishes for flavor, and water or wine.() A description in the of Ruth provides an example of this kind of meal: the harvest workers eat bread, dipped in vinegar, and parched or roasted grain (). Agricultural workers, who comprised the largest part of the population, also ate a light meal in the early morning before leaving for their work in the fields ().(()The second meal was the main meal of the day and was eaten in the evening. In addition to bread, it typically included soup or a stew of vegetables or legumes, served in a common pot into which everyone dipped their bread. Also served from time to time were cheese and fruits such as fresh figs and melon when in season, as well as dried fruits. Water, wine and milk could also accompany the meal.((()()Small bowls were used for both eating and drinking. Small jugs contained condiments like olive oil, vinegar and sweetners. Wide-mouthed pitchers held water and milk, while spouted decanters with narrow, ridged necks with built-in strainers held wine.(Festive meals and feastsFestive meals were held to mark significant occasions, entertain important guests, or as sacrificial or ritual meals. The meal was prepared by both men and women. Meat was always served at these meals and many people participated so that there would be no leftovers that would go to waste. Ritual feasts and banquets in ancient Israel, and the ancient Near East in general, were important for building social relationships and demonstrating status, transacting business and concluding agreements, enlisting divine help, or showing thanks, devotion or propitiation to a deity, and for conveying social instruction. These meals were imbued with significance by the occasion and were a time for entertainment and enjoyment.(()israelite house, Monarchy perios.jpg|left|thumb| Food dishes, bowls and serving jugs shown in a reconstructed Israelite house. Festive meals were held only from time to time, but they are the ones recorded by biblical and extra-biblical sources. Many biblical stories are set within the context of a meal, such as the accounts of the food Abraham prepares for his visitors (), the stew which Jacob prepares for his father, Isaac, and the Passover meal ().((In the story of Abraham hosting the three visitors, Abraham offers cakes, a well prepared young calf, curds, and milk. This meal has similar elements to an earlier meal described in the of Sinuhe, an Egyptian nobleman who lived for a time in Canaan around 1900 BCE, at which bread, wine, cooked meat, roast fowl, and dairy products were served.(One of the distinguishing features of the meals of the wealthier social class, as illustrated in the stories of Abraham and Sinuhe, was the more frequent consumption of meat. A description of the provisions for Solomons kitchen also illustrates this: Solomons daily provisions consisted of 30 kor of fine flour and 60 kor of flour, 10 fat oxen, 20 pasture-fed oxen, and 100 sheep and goats, in addition to deer and gazelles, roebucks and fattened geese (). This account describes the provisions that were possible to obtain for those with the resources to purchase them and indicates they were sufficient to provide sumptuous meals for thousands of people.((Another example of a lavish meal celebrating an important occasion is the inauguration of the Temple by Solomon (, ). Similar meals are described regarding Hezekiahs temple consecration () and Passover celebration ().(In contrast to the simplicity of the daily fare of ordinary people, the cuisine of the royal courts of the ancient Near East was sophisticated, and it is assumed that the dishes served at the table of King Solomon and other Israelite kings were also elaborate. King David had officials who were in charge of wine cellars, olive stores, cattle, olive and fig trees () and the royal kitchen was a complex organization.(The kings of Israel are recorded as having displayed an extraordinary measure of royal hospitality, like other kings of the ancient Near East who held elaborate banquets. Solomons royal table is described as providing such a variety of foods that the of Sheba is said to have been amazed that the reports of Solomons wealth did not exceed what she had seen (). Royal entertainment in Israel included music (), large numbers of guests (), and presumably many servers and cupbearers, though these are not expressly mentioned in the Bible.(Feasts and banquets were important social and political tools throughout Israels history, especially in the early years of the Israelite monarchy, when an invitation to the kings table was important for creating and maintaining political support and was also an important marker of social status and influence.(Regular meals too, developed as expressions of common identity, social unity and communal celebration. By the Roman period, Jewish communities came together at banquets for both food and company and the weekly Sabbath meal was an occasion for families to gather and enjoy both food and company.(HospitalityThe practice of hospitality was a fundamental custom of Israelite society and serving food was integral to the hosting of guests. As in other ancient Near Eastern societies, hospitality for guests, both known and strangers, was motivated by the desire to win divine pleasure and reward in an after-life, and more pragmatically, in the expectation that this kindness would be returned when needed. Additionally, in ancient Israel, the belief that God had delivered Israel from slavery resulted in the social imperative and religious commandment to look after guests and strangers as an act of recognition and gratitude.(The importance of hospitality to the Israelites can be inferred from the texts of the Bible, in numerous instances, including the stories of Abraham hosting the messengers, Gideons call to leadership (), the hospitality of the woman from Zarephath towards the Prophet Elijah () and the Shunammite woman towards Elisha (), Davids hosting of Mephiboshet, son of Jonathan () and Hezekiahs invitation to the people of the northern kingdom of Israel to celebrate the Passover in Jerusalem ().()Meals at which important guests were present were viewed as special occasions, and as such, meat was served. The order in which the guests were served indicated the recognition of the social status of the guest. The choice of meat and dishes indicated the importance of the occasion. The Bible illustrates this in relating how Samuel hosted Saul, who, seated at the head of the hall is served first with a portion of meat that has been especially reserved for him (). Certain parts of the animal, such as the breast and the right thigh, were considered to be the best portions and were reserved for the most honored participants in the meal. Guests were always served before family members. The host would also sit with the guests to encourage them to eat and see to all their needs, as related in the story of Abraham, who waited on his visitors while they ate.(Sacrificial mealsSacrificial meals were eaten when a portion of a sacrifice was reserved for the priest (kohen) or the ordinary Israelite who brought the offering was permitted to eat a portion with his family at a festive meal. The offerings considered most holy were eaten by the males of the priests in the court of the Temple sanctuary (). The meal was considered to be a part of the priests duties. Other offerings could be eaten by the priests with their families in any ritually clean place (). The ordinary Israelite had to eat his share within a fixed time, with his family, guests, and any Levites and strangers that he invited.()()Depending on the type of sacrifice, the animals that were brought as sacrifices could be a lamb, kid, goat, ram, calf, bull or cow; bird offerings were doves and turtledoves (pigeons).() Of these, the offering (asham) () and the communal peace offering (shalmei tzibur) () were eaten only by the male priests (kohanim). Other offerings, such as the Firstborn offering (), could be eaten by the priests and other members of their households, while for the personal peace offering (shalmei yachid) () and Thanksgiving offering (), the breast and thigh meat were eaten by the priests and other members of their households and the remainder by ordinary Israelites. The Tithe offering () could be eaten by anyone and the Passover offering () was eaten by all who had purchased a share in the sacrifice.(()Meal offerings called mincha all consisted primarily of flour and were either completely or partially burned on the altar. Those not entirely burned on the altar were eaten by the priests. Some mincha offerings were fried or baked before being offered. Types of mincha included fine flour (solet) mixed with oil and of which a portion was given to the kohen; flour mixed with oil and fried on a griddle or on a pan; bread called challot mixed with oil and baked in an oven; and wafers (rekikim) smeared with oil baked in an oven.(There were also baked goods, all made of wheat flour and baked in an oven, which were not burned on the altar. These were the twelve unleavened and specially shaped showbreads, eaten by the priests after they had been displayed; two loaves of leavened bread prepared for the festival of Shavuot and eaten by the priests; thanksgiving breads, which included leavened bread, unleavened bread, unleavened wafers and scalded loaves, with one of each kind given to the priests and the remainder eaten by the owner and guests; and the unleavened loaves and wafers accompanying the Nazirites sacrificial ram, one of each kind given to the priests and the remainder eaten by the Nazirite and guests.(Whole extended families or clans also participated in a sacrifice that was offered on occasions such as the New Moon, and it is referred to as both the sacrifice of days and a kinship sacrifice. In the early Israelite period, before the centralization of sacrificial offerings as an exclusive part of the Temple services, these sacrifices were offered at various locations. David is described as leaving Sauls table to participate with his family in Bethlehem () and Elkanah goes to Shiloh to participate with his household in the annual sacrifice ().(Perhaps the oldest and most important feast celebrated by the Israelites (and later by Jews) is the Passover. The original feast, with its origins in the story of the Exodus, consisted of a sacrificial lamb, bitter herbs and unleavened bread eaten by each family at home. Under the Israelite monarchy, and with the establishment of the in Jerusalem, the sacrifice and celebration of Passover became centralized as one of the three pilgrimage festival. Families who were able to travel to Jerusalem ate the Passover meal together in Jerusalem. Those who could not make the pilgrimage celebrated the holiday by holding a special meal and observing the Feast of Unleavened Bread.(Forbidden foodsIn addition to requiring that certain foods be eaten for sacred purposes, the Israelite diet was shaped by religious practices which prohibited the consumption of certain foods, both in terms of the animals permissible for eating, and the manner of their preparation. The cuisine of the Israelites thus differed from that of their neighbors in significant ways. For example, ancient Mesopotamian recipes describe foods cooked with animal blood and milk added to meat stews; this would have been avoided by the ancient Israelites.((Only animals specifically slaughtered for food or for use in the sacrificial service could be eaten.( Detailed lists of which animals, birds and fish could be eaten and which were prohibited appear in () and (), and animal bones found in the archaeological record tend to support this, with some exceptions. For the Israelites, food was one way for self-definition. While it is impossible to know to what extent dietary laws were observed, self-definition is a most likely the basis for certain biblical lists listing different kinds of animals permitted or forbidden for consumption.( The taboo against eating certain animals, particularly the pig, may have developed from the early Iron Age.((Borowski, Every Living Thing, 140-44)Archaeological evidence from various sites shows that the consumption of pork, while limited, was higher in the early Iron Age but had mostly disappeared during the later Iron Age. Sites in the highlands and the coastal plains show low levels of pig utilization in the early Iron Age, but on the coastal plain, excavations such as Ekron show a higher consumption of pig; this is usually associated with the arrival of the Philistines. However, even at Philistine sites, pig remains were a small proportion of the bones discovered and decline after the initial period of settlement. This may have been due to unsuitable environmental factors for raising pigs.() At archaeological excavations at Ebal in Samaria, from the period immediately after the Israelite conquest, animal bones discovered were only from animals considered permissible, such as cattle, sheep, goats and deer.()In addition, some taboos did not relate to the source of the food but to the way in which they were prepared, as in the prohibition against boiling a young goat in its mothers milk (and mentioned in the Bible in three separate instances: , , ). Milk and its by-products served as offerings in Near Eastern pagan worship to gods and kings and milk was used in connection with the phenomenon of reproduction, and a goat kid would be cooked in its mothers milk.( Thus, the Israelite practice was to avoid an act similar to that carried out by the Canaanites as part of their cult worship ().(The Israelites, like other ancient peoples, believed that an animals blood carried the soul of the animal and therefore should not be consumed (). The blood of a slaughtered animal was thus drained before the meat was used and the blood itself was not used as a cooking liquid or drink.(There are no biblical lists containing forbidden plants, so it can be assumed any plant or fruit was permissible as food, and their use limited only by taste or toxicity (for example, ) and the fulfillment of religious requirements such as the tithe.(See also*archaeology*cuisineBibliographyReferences cited*************Further reading**ReferencesExternal links*Bread  the Daily Grind in Canaan and Ancient Israel - University of Pennsylvania Museum of Archaeology and Anthropology*Biblical meals - Kedumim Biblical Landscape Reserve
31176124
Wyoming_Highway_372
next_route374Wyoming Highway 372 is  Wyoming Road, named La Barge Road,  located in Sweetwater and Lincoln counties.Route descriptionWyoming Highway 372 begins its southern end at Highway 374, west of James Town, near exit 83 of Interstate 80/U.S. Route 30.()(aaroads.com - Wyoming Highway 372) Highway 372 travels northwesterly, roughly paralleling the Green River, although from a considerable distance. Nearing 21 miles, Highway 374 passes along the western side of the National Wildlife Refuge. Shortly thereafter the western terminus of Highway 28 is intersected and acts the main route to Riverton and Lander.(Past WYO 28, Highway 372 continues northwest before turning north for a short stretch to serve Fontenelle, where it then turns west. Leaving Fontenelle, WYO 372 heads southwest and then turns west for the last leg of its trip. WYO 372 reaches U.S. Route 189 southwest of the Reservoir.((HistoryIn 1994, WYO 372 was reconstructed and widened to accommodate additional traffic due to the mining and exploration operations north of Green River.(Major intersectionsnotesSouthern terminus of WYO 372Near Exit 83 (I-80/US 30)notesWestern terminus of WYO 28notesNorthern terminus of WYO 372References External links *Wyoming State Routes 300-399*WYO 372 - WYO 374 to WYO 28*WYO 372 - WYO 28 to US 189
31197216
National_Audubon_Society_v._Superior_Court
website  audubon.orgthumb|Landsat image of Mono Lakethumb|Lakeside of Mono Lake 1999The case of National Audubon Society v. Superior Court (Supreme Court of California, 1983) was a key case in California highlighting the conflict between the trust doctrine and appropriative water rights.() The Public Trust Doctrine is based on the principle that certain resources (such as navigable waters) are too valuable to be privately owned and must remain available for public use.( In National Audubon Society v. Superior Court, the court held that the public trust doctrine restricts the amount of water that can be withdrawn from navigable waterways.() The basis for the Public Trust Doctrine goes back to Roman law. Under Roman law, the air, the rivers, the sea and the seashore were incapable of private ownership; they were dedicated to the use of the public.() In essence, the public trust doctrine establishes the role of the state as having trustee environmental duties owed to the public that are subsequently enforceable by the public.( There is judicial recognition of this, dictating that certain rights of the public are key to individual common law rights (such as state recognition of the public right or trust for waterways and coastal zones).( Judicial recognition of the public trust doctrine has been established for tidelands and non-navigable waterways,(Phillips Petroleum Co. v. Mississippi, 484 U.S. 469 (1988)) submerged land (such as lake beds) and the waters above them,(New York v. DeLyser, 759 F. Supp. 982 (W.D.N.Y. 1991))(Ill. Cent. R. R., 146 U.S. 387 (1892)) and preservation of a public interest (such as recreation, swimming, access, and sport fishing).(Marks v. Whitney, 98 Cal. Rptr. 790, 491 P.2d 374 (1971))In National Audubon Society v. Superior Court, it was alleged by the plaintiffs that the public trust doctrine was being violated due to environmental damages to Lake in the form of significant water level declines as a result of water diversions by the City of Los Angeles Department of Water and Power (DWP).() DWP based their defense on the fact that they held permits, issued by the state for the diversions, and so the diversions were allowable.( The central issue in the case was whether appropriative water rights (granted in the past) must consider the public trust doctrine, requiring protection of natural resources by the state.() More specifically, the issue being addressed by the court was whether Mono Lake was subject to a public trust, which would invalidate Los Angeles use of the streams feeding the lake.() The California Supreme Court held that the state, under the public trust doctrine, had continuing responsibility for the states navigable waters and that the public trust doctrine, therefore, prevented any party from appropriating water in a manner that harmed the public trust interests.( However, the court also recognized that LA depended on these diversions as a critical water source, and this in turn mitigated the rule of law as the court held that water transfers were permissible even though some damage to the environment would occur as long as this was kept to minimal harm to the extent feasible.( This ruling established that the public trust doctrine and appropriative water rights are part of an integrated system of water law and so both must be considered when determining appropriate use of water in California.((Case SummaryIn 1979, the Audubon Society and others (Audubon) filed a suit against City of Los Angeles Department of Water and Power DWP to suppress their diversion of the four tributaries that originally supplied Lake with water from Sierra snowmelt.( The trust doctrine is the cornerstone and crux of this court case; the doctrine originates from law and has persisted throughout European and English law. The Institutes of Justinian from the Sixth Century A.D. stated: by the law of nature these things are common to mankind -the air, running water, the sea and consequently the shores of the sea.  Spanish and Mexican law also recognizes the trust doctrine; the of Guadalupe Hidalgo guarantees these rights in California.(	Thus, the trust doctrine is a philosophical and realized extension of the concept of communal property, which belongs to the people and is to be held in a trust by the government.() The  trust doctrine holds that our water, fish, and wildlife are shared resources to be held in an exalted position, above that of any industrial, commercial, or private uses in any administrative or judicial review of water allocation, and establishes that the government must uphold and protect this trusteeship as a moral obligation.()Audubons original complaint, filed with the Superior Court of Mono County, asserted the diversions were a violation of the trust doctrine, were both a public and private nuisance, and a violation of California State Constitution Article X, Section 4 & Article XVI, Section 6, which respectively prohibit obstruction of navigable waters and gifts by the state of a state asset. The suit attempted to establish Public Trust rights in Basin, and sought declaratory and injunctive relief.( This case eventually reached the Court of California, where a landmark ruling was handed down in favor of Audubon, which held that the trust doctrine applied to the Angeles Basin diversions and that the state must exercise continuous supervision to ensure that trust values are continuously considered.( Background The leading case that established the trust doctrine in the U.S. is the 1892 Supreme Court case Central Railroad v. Illinois. The Court held that public trust submerged lands belong to the respective States within which they are found, with the consequent right to use or dispose of any portion thereof, when that can be done without substantial impairment of the interest of the public in the waters. setting a precedent for strict scrutiny of any private taking of public trust land. The Court in Illinois voided the deed because under public trust law it did not promote a primary public purpose.() This meaning has been supported by Federal and California Court decisions in Woodruff v. North Bloomfield, People v. Gold Run Ditch Mining Co., People ex rel Ricks Water Co. v. Elk River Mill and Lumber Co and People v. Truckee Lumber Co. These cases make it clear as a matter of law one must exercise rights or use property so as not to infringe on the rights, interests or properties of others.(Procedural History1928: California State Constitution Article X, Section 2 states that all waters of the state must be put to reasonable and beneficial use.() Any waters in excess of the reasonable and beneficial uses are considered surplus waters available for use by others, as stipulated under the appropriative water rights administered by State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB) ( Water rights are granted by the SWRBC after an application to appropriate water is approved and a permit is issued.( The permit allows construction of a project needed to divert the water according to the terms and conditions of the permit, which includes submission of  periodic progress reports by the applicant with SWRCB  to ensure the application of the water is for beneficial use. If the conditional terms of the permit are met, SWRCB may issue a license to confirm the appropriative rights to the water.(1940: the City of Angeles Department of Water and Power (DWP) was granted permits allowing appropriation for the entire flows of four out of five of Mono Lakes  tributaries (Lee Vining, Walker, Parker, and Rush Creeks) for municipal use and hydropower generation. Mono Lakes tributaries contain glacial fed snowmelt from the Sierra Nevadas and thus convey potable water, whereas the water in Lake itself was and is not potable due to its salinity. Despite being granted permits, DWP lacked the appropriate conveyance facilities to physically appropriate and transport the volume of water that was granted at the time.( 1963: The City of Angeles authorized the construction of a new aqueduct, the Second Los Angeles Aqueduct to transport surface water from Basin and both surface and groundwater from Owens Basin.(1974: SWRCB issued licenses confirming DWPs right to divert water from Mono Lake tributaries, resulting in annual diversions of approximately  of water from Basin since the aqueduct was completed in 1970.() The diversions from the second aqueduct caused the surface area of the lake to decrease by one-third and the lake level to drop , exposing  of lakebed.(1977: A Stanford biologist named David Gaines published a study on Mono Lakes ecosystem highlighting the dangers of water diversion that garnered national attention to the potentially catastrophic ecological impacts to Lake from the DWP diversions.() This led to the formation of the Mono Lake Committee and a grassroots movement spanning over 30 years to stop the diversions and restore the basin Water Wars. 1979: The Department of Water Resources (CDWR) and the States Department of the Interior (USDI) undertook a joint study of Basin. The study concluded that the level of Lake should be stabilized at . To achieve this goal, drastic reductions of water exports from Mono Basin were recommended from the present annual average of  to a limit of . Legislation was introduced to implement this recommendation, but was never enacted.( 1979: The Audubon Society (Audubon), Lake Committee, of the Earth, the Los Angeles Audubon Society, and Mono Basin landowners initiated the original lawsuit with the Superior Court of Mono County in 1979 against  Angeles Department of Water and Power (DWP), asserting that the diversions were a violation of the trust doctrine, were both a public and private nuisance, and a violation of California State Constitution Article X, Section 4 & Article XVI, Section 6, which respectively prohibit obstruction of navigable waters and gifts by the state of a state asset. The suit attempted to establish Public Trust rights in Basin, and sought declaratory and injunctive relief.(The Public Trust Case was originally argued as: National Audubon Society v. Los Angeles. Superior Court of Alpine County No. 6429.()  The case was transferred to Alpine Superior Court; DWP filed a cross-complaint seeking adjudication of Basin water rights to all appropriators, naming 117 cross-defendants, including the plaintiffs, the State, States Forest Service, U.S of Land Management, and other private water users.(  DWP also sought a Congressional declaration stating they consented to the impairment of navigable waters of Lake. Finally, DWP asserted that any nuisance at Lake was attributable to the newly exposed lakebed and sought a declaration that conditions resulted from a valid exercise of the police power by the State of California. Simultaneously, Audubon sought permission to include a cause of action based on the federal common law of nuisance, asserting that Lake is an interstate or navigable water in which there is an overriding federal interest, and DWPs diversions were causing water and air pollution.(  Due to the inclusion of federal agencies, the suit was transferred to Federal District Court, where they decided abstention was appropriate and remanded. Accordingly, Audubon was instructed to file an action in state court to resolve two key issues: 1.) The interrelationship between the California water rights system and the trust doctrine: Is the trust doctrine in this context subsumed in the California water rights system, or does it function independently of that system? Could the plaintiffs challenge the DWPs permits by asserting the trust doctrine limits their permits and licenses, or argue that the water diversions are not reasonable or beneficial, as required under the California water rights system? And 2.) Whether exhaustion of administrative remedies was pursued or is applicable in this context.(   This case eventually reached the Court of California, carrying this title: National Audubon Society v. Superior Court. 33 Cal. 3d 419 (1983).(CaseAt the beginning of the 20th century, the city of Angeles, which lies south of Lake, began to undergo huge growth. As a result of this growth, the city needed additional sources of water. Around 1905, former Los Angeles Mayor, Eaton, and his colleague Mulholland, began to buy land in the Sierra region to secure water supply. The River was utilized as a water source until 1919, and when the Owens River Valley began to dry up, Los Angeles investigated the Mono Basin area. In the 1930s, Los Angeles purchased  of land in the Mono Basin. Over the next decade, Los Angeles took water from creeks and streams in the area.(Kastner, D. 2003. Volcanoes of the Eastern Sierra Nevada: Geology and Natural Heritage of the Long Valley Caldera. Accessed online on April 21, 2011, at: http://www.indiana.edu/~sierra/papers/2003/Kastner.html) In 1919, Mono Lake had a water surface elevation of  above mean sea level. In 1955, the elevation of the lake was reduced to 6,405 and still dropping. The decrease in water volume of the lake subsequently increased lake salinity, adversely affecting the local food chain. In 1980, there was a documented fifty percent reduction in the resident shrimp population, and by the spring of 1981, this reduction reached ninety five percent. Also, as the water level of Mono Lake dropped, an island within the lake that was key nesting habitat for bird species became accessible from shore (effectively becoming a peninsula), allowing coyotes access to the nesting habitat. The subsequent predation on nesting birds significantly reduced population numbers. As the level of the lake continued to drop, shoreline area increased, resulting in airborn dust and sediment transport that covered the lake with very fine silt and impacted water quality.(In 1976, a group of students from the of California began to study the Mono Lake environment. Their research concluded that the lakes reduction in water level caused environmental damage, including the loss of the lakes shrimp, loss of migrating and nesting birds, and the destruction of the Mono Lakes natural beauty. In 1979, the National Audubon Society, Lake Committee, of the Earth, and four Mono Lake landowners filed suit against the DWP. Plaintiffs claimed that the waters of Mono Lake were protected from the DWP diversions by the public trust doctrine. The Supreme Court held that the state has an obligation to protect Mono Lake once the diversions begin to harm public trust interests.(13 Environs Envtl. L. & Poly J. 16 1989-1990) The court also held that California water law permitted the State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB) to objectively study Mono Lake water rights after the agency granted the rights. Audubon claimed that air pollution in the form of alkali dust storms were caused by Mono Lakes dropping water level. On October 6, 1988, the United States Court of Appeals, Ninth Circuit, held that Audubon could not claim a federal common law nuisance based on air pollution.( In 1984, when DWP threatened to once again dry the creek, a trout fisherman, Dick Dahlgren, joined by Trout, filed suit against the DWP. Plaintiffs argued that not only did DWP violate the Public Trust Doctrine, it also violated the Department of Fish and Game Code  5937. From this case, the court required the DWP to release  into lower Rush Creek. In 1986, the Mono Lake Committee brought a similar lawsuit to protect Vining Creek. The court ordered the DWP to maintain a flow of  to the creek.( In 1989, the court halted the case for four years to allow the State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB) to produce an Impact Report in order to recondition DWPs water right licenses, and to prove compliance with the Public Trust Doctrine and the Fish and Game codes. On September 28, 1994, the court ordered that the lake must be restored to a height of  above sea level within the next 20 years. The DWP can continue to divert water during these 20 years, but only an average of   per year and the DWP must restore waterfowl and stream damage that resulted from past diversions.(IssuesIn this case, the California courts resolved  two issues: The first issue was, whether the Public Trust Doctrine functions independently of the California Water Rights System. The public trust doctrine defines its purpose as maintaining, All of its navigable, commerce, fishing, swimming, and other recreational purposes as trustee of a public trust for the benefit of the people. Therefore, the waterways cannot belong to just one person as private property; they must be available to all people.(Meidinger, E. 2001. Prior App/Pub Trust. Accessed online on April 21, 2011, at http://www.law.buffalo.edu/homepage/eemeid/monolake.html)The Public Trust Doctrine has also been expanded to protect lands in their natural state to serve as ecological units for scientific study. Mono Lake is a navigable waterway, and it harvests shrimp for sale as fish food. Under the traditional public trust cases, the lake is identified as a fishery. Plaintiffs sought to protect the lakes exceptional recreational and ecological value of the lake and its shore, the purity of the air, and the use of the lake for nesting and feeding by birds. Quoting Marks v. Whitney, the court said, There is a growing public recognition that one of the most important public uses of the tidelands and use encompassed within the tidelands trust is the preservation of those lands in their natural state, so that they may serve as ecological units for scientific study, as open space, and as environments which provide food and habitat for birds and marine life, and which favorably affect the scenery and climate of the area. As a result, Mono Lake is a navigable water, and the beds, shores, and waters of the lake are protected by the public trust.(7 UCLA J. Envtl. L. & Poly 79 1987-1988) During the trial the court brought up two cases that dealt with non-navigable waterways. In 1884, the court considered impairment of navigability in the American and Sacramento rivers due to mining on their non-navigable tributaries. Gold Run Ditching and Mining Company used water cannons to wash gold bearing gravel from the hillsides. As a result, 600,000 cubic yards of sand and gravel went into the River and washed downstream into the beds of the both the American and Sacramento rivers. The court said The State holds the absolute right to all navigable waters and the soils under them. The soil she holds as trustee of a public trust for the benefit of the people; and she may, by her legislature, grant it to an individual; but she cannot grant the rights of the people to the use of the navigable waters flowing over it  In the second case, in 1901, the defendant in People v. Russ had built dams on sloughs, which flowed from the Salt River. The dams had been built to prevent water from flowing on to the defendants land, but the state said they were a public nuisance. In the National Audubon case, DWP argued that when the Water Board approved a permit, the water right became a vested right. The California Supreme Court held that the public trust is an affirmation of the duty of the state to protect the peoples common heritage of streams, lakes, marshlands and tidelands, surrendering that right only in rare cases when the abandonment of that right is consistent with the purposes of the trust. (7 UCLA J. Envtl. L. & Poly 67 1987-1988)The second issue in this case was whether plaintiffs must exhaust their remedies before the Water Board prior to bringing action in court. The California Supreme Court determined that remedy can be pursued from the Water Board by challenging the unreasonable or unbeneficial use of appropriated water or by bringing an independent public trust claim. Therefore, the plaintiffs could claim that DWPs use of the water was unreasonable. Plaintiffs also could bring the public trust claim pursuant to section 2501 of the Water Code, which said, The board may determine, in the proceedings provided for in this chapter, all rights to water of a stream system whether based upon appropriation, riparian right, or other basis of right. Section 2501 refers to water rights as bringing the proceedings before the Water Board.( Decision The California Supreme Court entered its decision in 1983 with the majority opinion written by Justice Broussard with Justices Bird, Mosk, Kaus and Reynoso, concurring. A separate concurring opinion by was entered by Kaus. Justice Richardson issued an opinion concurring in part and dissenting in part.( While the trust doctrine protects navigable waterways like Mono Lake, the question remained whether diversions of non-navigable waters like the Mono Lake tributaries might also fall under the doctrines scope. The majority concluded that when diversions of non-navigable tributaries impair the public interest in navigable waterways, the scope of the trust doctrine is sufficiently broad to proscribe such actions.(() The applicability of the  public trust doctrine to the case was described by the court as follows:()The principal values plaintiffs seek to protect . . . are recreational and ecological . . . the scenic views of the lake and its shore, the purity of the air and the use of the lake for nesting and feeding by birds. Under Marks v. Whitney, supra, 6 Cal.3d 251, 98 Cal. Rptr. 790, 491 P.2d 374, it is clear that protection of these values is among the purposes of the public trust. (In examining the relationship between the public trust doctrine and appropriative water rights in California, the court determined that, in some cases, the public interest served by water diversions may outweigh considerations of harm to public trust sources.( The population and economy of California depend on the appropriation of vast quantities of water for uses unrelated to trust values.( However, the court held that harm to public trust resources should be avoided or minimized if feasible. The court stated that, under Article X, section 2 of the Constitution all uses of water, including public trust uses, must conform to the standard of reasonable use.( In concluding, the court stated that the water rights held by Los Angeles were granted in absence of consideration of the effects of the diversions on the public trust resources of the Mono Basin and that the allocation of water from the basin streams should be reconsidered. The state has a duty to protect the publics common heritage of streams, lakes, marshlands, and tidelands.( The court also ruled that the State Water Resource Control Board (SWRCB) and the courts have concurrent jurisdiction to consider the effect of water diversions on public trust resources.( The court ordered a study to be prepared to determine the impact of DWPs diversion upon the public trust of Mono Lake.( In subsequent proceedings following this decision, DWP has been ordered to reduce diversions by approximately two thirds until the water levels in Mono Lake recover to an acceptable level (expected to take decades).(DissentRichardson concurred with parts one through four of the majority opinion (background and history of the Mono Lake litigation; the public trust doctrine in California; The California water rights system; and, the relationship between the public trust doctrine and the California water rights system) and with the analysis of the relationship between the public trust doctrine and the water rights system in this state.( However, Richardson entered a dissent from part five of the opinion (exhaustion of administrative remedies)  where the majority held that the courts and the California Water Resources Board have concurrent jurisdiction in cases of this kind. Richardsons dissent of part five concluded, The majoritys suggestion that various statutory provisions contemplate the exercise of concurrent jurisdiction in cases of this kind is unconvincing.( In support of this, Richardson cited the Water Code ( 2000, 2001, 2075) as well as  Environmental Defense Fund, Inc. v. East Bay Mun. Utility Dist (1980) and (1977).(Legal and Policy ImplicationsThe decision of the court expanded the reach of the public trust doctrine to non-navigable tributaries of navigable waters.() This allows for legal challenges to be made to administrative decisions made by the state in regards water appropriations where natural resource values are affected.( This potential for legal challenge on the basis of natural resource values forces administrative decisions to include specific consideration of long-term resource impairment in tandem with economic development.() Therefore, although the public trust doctrine doesnt preclude the conveyance of water rights to a private party where a natural resource held in the public trust may be affected, following National Audubon Society v. Superior Court (1983), it does impose a condition on the future use of waters appropriated to further the public interest (the finding that harm must be minimized to the extent feasible).( There are, however, broad discretionary powers for states and legislatures to define exactly what the public purpose is.( As technology has advanced, waters of the U.S. have been used less for commerce and navigation, the basis for most current environmental law,() and more for recreational purposes. In recognition of this, the public trust doctrine can also be employed, using the discretionary powers enjoyed by states for determining public purpose, as the basis for the preservation of a public interest in recreation.( Other states, such as Montana, have integrated natural resource values and the public trust doctrine into appropriative water rights through allowing water to be appropriated for future uses that are protective of the environment or a resource (such as maintaining instream flows for water quality or habitat connectivity).( In this way, states may establish an appropriative right for water that is integrated with the system of water law as the water is not used in the traditional sense of being diverted for commercial, agricultural, or industrial use, but is appropriated to remain in the stream channel.( The overriding legal implication of the courts decision in National Audubon Society v. Superior Court (1983) is that traditional use of the public trust doctrine to ensure that valuable public resources are not lost to the public through diversion to public control has been altered to encompass an all-embracing environmental protection mechanism.( In cases in which the traditional doctrine evolved to protect common rights of access for commercial purposes, the modern public trust doctrine proclaims conservationist principles.(See alsoLakeAngeles Department of Water and PowerWater WarsReferences refs() External links  
31211099
Rami_Khalif
Rami Khalif is a Lebanese composer, pianist and artist. A musical shape-shifter, Khalifs body of work is as eclectic as it is bold.He is the son of legendary Oud player, composer and Artist for Peace, Khalife. Heralded as a musician of extreme calibre and pure expressiona welcome experimental detour from the norm of today and in the relatively conformist world of classical compositionhe is positively brand new, by the Star (Lebanon), its no wonder that Rami Khalif has emerged as one of the most exciting young composers of the 21st century.Born September 25, 1981 in Beirut, Lebanon, he furthered his home grown musical training in Paris, France at the Conservatoire National de Rgion de Boulogne Billancourt under the direction of Alfred Herzog who described Rami Khalif as a prodigious talent, one is struck by the contrast between the attenuated silhouette on the one hand, and the rich and coloured sound on the other. His musical imagination and his extraordinary improvisations are a joy to those who listen to him. Rami Khalif studied under the likes of Louis Claude Thirion and Marie Paule Siruguet, with private tutelage at the hand of pianist Abd El Rahman El Bacha.Rami Khalif pursued his higher education at the Juilliard School of Music in York, there Hungarian pianist Sndor, Bartks protge, mentored the young student. It was at Juilliard that he acquired a taste for live improvised performances.A sought after composer of music, Rami Khalif has scored a number of short and feature-length films, working with the likes of Wael Noureddine and Hala Abdullah. Together with his brother, musician Bachar Khalif, he scored, and performed a live soundtrack to the 1920s German film Faust, by Wilhelm Murnau.Rami Khalif received several awards, most notable among them the France, UFAM and Claude Kahn piano competitions. In 2009 he honored with a plaque of recognition by the Lebanese Social Ministry for his efforts in raising the profile of de-mining initiatives and his advocacy for peace through music.An active performer alongside composer and Oud player Marcel Khalife, Rami has performed Arab music in the U.S, America, Asia, Canada, Europe, Australia, in such venues as the Center (D.C., USA), the Opera House (Sydney, Australia), Opera House (Doha, Qatar), des Arts (Montreal, Canada), Dar el Opera (Damascus, Syria), Elizabeth Hall (London), Pleyel (Paris, France) UNESCO Palace (Beirut, Lebanon).Rami Khalif has featured as soloist alongside some of the worlds most prized orchestras, including, a solo recital the Gaveau Music Hall, on a tour of the East with the Boulogne Billancourt Orchestra where he performed Rachmaninoffs Piano Concerto No. 4 and Ravels Concerto in G, Prokofiev Concerto No. 5 with Globalis Orchestra and Rachmaninoff Piano Concerto no. 4 and Gershwin in Blue with the Qatar Philharmonic Orchestra. He performed Abdullah Al Masri piano concerto with both Liverpool Orchestra and the Qatar Philharmonic Orchestra.As part of electro-classic group Aufgang, Rami Khalif, Francesco Tristano and Aymeric Westrich, have featured at prominent festivals and venues, including the likes of, Sonar (Barcelona), L.E.V. Festival (Gijn, Spain), Berghain (Germany), La Roque Dantheron (France). Aufgang performed live for Radio France and ARTE.(Brian Howe, of www.pitchfork.com), celebrated Aufgangs unique merger of classic-electro, if youve ever listened to Bachs Variations and thought, Pretty cool; could use some hot beats, then youre going to love Aufgang. They blend pianos, live drums, and techno-inspired electronics into invigorating displays of virtuosity, which evoke the club and the conservatory without really belonging to either one. (Their name is German for stairway-- an intermediate place, neither here nor there.) Given to singing out ecstatically, Aufgangs self-titled debut highlights the emotional extravagance these two different worlds have in common. It sounds kind of posh on paper, but its actually really buoyant and fun.Rami Khalifs studio album projects are available all over the world, his discography includes, Live in Beirut, Piano Concertos, Scene from Hellek, Pop Art (in collaboration with Francesco Tristano), Chaos, Aufgang,  Air on Fire (Aufgang). Rami Khalif has contributed to the works of Bachar Khalifs Oil Slick and Francesco Tristanos Not for Piano. His classic electro styling has also appeared on the remixes compilation albums of Craig and Agoria.Discography:Rami Khalif releasedAir on Fire (Aufgang | 2010)Aufgang (Aufgang | 2010)Chaos (2009)Pop Art (Rami Khalif & Francesco Tristano | 2008)Scene from Hellek (2005)Live in Beirut (2002)And featured on...Concerto Al Andalus (Marcel Khalif |  2002)Caress (Marcel Khalif | 2004)Damascus Festival Chamber Players (2008)Aah (Yolla Khalif | 2011)Oil Slick (Bachar Khalif | 2010)No for Piano (Francesco Tristano)The Green Armchair (Agoria | 2006) References  External links * http://www.ramikhalife.com*http://www.marcelkhalife.com* http://www.bacharkhalife.com* http://www.infine-music.com/artist/7/aufgang* http://www.pitchfork.com/reviews/albums/13875-aufgang
31231798
Halyvourgiki_S.A.
Halyvourgiki S.A. () has historically been one of the main steel producers in Greece and the second largest after Viohalko.(    Kathimerini newspaper, 5 December 2006.) It effectively started business in 1925 as a trading company, moving into wire production in 1932 and steel production in 1938.Production was modernized and expanded after War II, with the company moving production into a new factory in Elefsina in 1953. The following years were its golden age, as a construction boom connected with the economic miracle lead to a huge increase in demand for steel.Halyvourgiki faced serious economic problems during the economic crisis of the late 1980s and early 1990s in Greece, but has managed to survive following through a modernization program, involving new products and technologies. Its huge, brightly colored facilities have almost become a landmark of the Elefsina area.    References External links *Company website*Leaders Mining & Metallurgy 
31259478
Sheffield_Attercliffe_by-election,_1894
A by-election was held for the House of Commons constituency of Sheffield Attercliffe on 5 July 1894.  It was the first parliamentary election contested by the Labour Party.(June Purvis, Emmeline Pankhurst: a Biography, p.41)BackgroundThe election was caused by the succession of Coleridge to the peerage.  He had been the Liberal Party Member of Parliament for the seat since its creation for the UK general election.  He had been re-elected at the 1886 and UK general elections, but the Conservative Party had taken more than 40% of the vote on each occasion.  G. Hill Smith stood for the Conservatives in 1892, receiving 43.1% of the vote, and reducing Coleridge to his smallest majority to date.(The seat of Attercliffe had a large class population, many working in trades which were well unionised: ironworking, toolmaking and coal mining.  Local labour movement leaders believed that the new representative for the seat should be a worker.(Joyce Brown, Attercliffe, 1894: How One Local Liberal Party Failed to Meet the Challenge of Labour, The Journal of British Studies, Vol.14, No.2, pp.48-77)CandidatesThe Conservative Party re-selected their candidate from 1892, G. Hill Smith.(Several possible Liberal candidates were discussed, including Hadfield, Rowntree and P. Scott, but two names came to the fore: Batty Langley and Charles Hobson.  Hobson, the leader of the Federated Trades Council, was a President of the Electoral Association and would have stood as a Liberal-Labour candidate.  Local Liberal leaders hoped that, if he were selected, it would discourage more radical labour movement activists from standing their own candidate.  Langley ran a large saw mill in the city, and was an alderman on Sheffield Town Council.  He had served as Mayor of Sheffield in 1892&ndash;93, when he took the initiative in resolving a major coal strike.(On 18 June, the trades council unanimously endorsed Hobson as a candidate.  Several leading trade unionist wrote in support of this decision, including William Bailey of the Miners Association, Edwin Harvey of the Miners Association and Wilson of the Sailors and Firemens Union.  The Independent Labour Party (ILP), although only recently established, was strong in Sheffield, with four main branches and around 400 members, many formerly of the Democratic Federation.  As its central purpose was to campaign for independent labour representation, it strongly opposed Langley, but its representatives on the trade council decided to endorse Hobson.(Mappin, Liberal MP for nearby Hallamshire spoke strongly against any working class candidate, holding that they would lose the seat.  Clegg, leader of the Liberal group on the council, argued against selecting Hobson, because he believe that he would prove unable to raise the necessary money to stand.  Henry Wilson, MP for Holmfirth, Secretary of the Sheffield Liberal Association, and John Wycliffe Wilson both favoured Hobson but, following Mappin and Cleggs comments, agreed to support Langley.  On 22 June, an open meeting of the Liberal Council chose Langley by 160 votes to 2 for Hobson, and 2 for Robert Cameron, who had stood for the party in 1892 in Sheffield Central.(The selection did not entirely settle the issue.  At a meeting of the trades council on 23 June, Hobson announced that he would not oppose Langley, but the Chronicle still wrote of him as the ideal candidate.(   The ILP responded by proposing one of their own members, Frank Smith.  He was narrowly endorsed by the trades council, although some liberal delegates refused to support the decision.CampaignHardie, Mann, Pankhurst and Tillett all campaigned for the ILP.((  Hobson spoke alongside Hardie at a meeting on 1 July, although he stated that he had some differences with the party and considered himself independent.(Langley was only given weak support by the Liberal Federation, who did not send any speakers.(  Pickard, General Secretary of the Miners Association, sent a telegram supporting Langley.(David Howell, British Workers and the Independent Labour Party, 1888-1906, p.19)  Philip Stanhope arranged a meeting between Frank Smith, Hardie and local Liberals, in the hope of persuading the ILP to withdraw, but Smith and Hardie complained that they had been tricked into attending, and left.(ResultLangley held the seat for the Liberals, with their majority only slightly reduced.  Both the Liberal and Conservative votes fell, but the ILP only took 13.5% of the votes cast.(  The News claimed that this was the Liberals greatest victory since the 1892 general election, while Hardie claimed that the result would harden divisions between the Liberals and the labour movement.  The Gazette held that Langley had only won because he was able to take some votes from the Conservatives.(Immediately after the election, Macdonald wrote to Hardie, requesting membership of the ILP.  In his letter, he noted that ...Attercliffe came as a rude awakening, and I felt during the contest that it was quite impossible for me to maintain my position as a Liberal any longer...(The Liberal Party were soon reconciled with the majority of the trades council, and the first independent labour MP for Sheffield was not elected until Brightside by-election, 1907.(  Langley held Sheffield Attercliffe until the 1909.  Frank Smith eventually became Labour Party MP for Nuneaton, but Hobson never stood for Parliament.See also:Attercliffe by-election, 1909References(
31275519
Avi_Gopher
Avi Gopher is a Israeli Archaeologist and a Professor at the of Tel Aviv in Israel.(Estrin, Daniel., Archaeologists May Have Found the Earliest Evidence Yet for the Existence of Modern Man, Art Daily, Article from Associated Press, 27 December 2010.) He completed his B.A. there in 1978, M.A. in 1981 and PhD in 1986 and specialises in prehistoric Israel. He and is notable for his work and discoveries at Qesem with Ran Barkai and Israel Hershkowitz that has unearthed the oldest sapiens remains yet found at the cave near HaAyin in central Israel. Teeth were recovered from a human individual dated to be around 400,000 years old.Fieldwork* 1977-1980 - Excavations with Prof. Bar-Yosef and Prof. Goring-Morris of projects in the southern Sinai such as Madi.* 1979 - Excavations at Qadesh Barnea 3 and Highlands.* 1977-1979 - Excavations at Cave, Galilee, directed by Prof. Ofer Bar-Yosef.* 1980-1981 - Excavations at Issaron, Valley, co-director with Prof. Nigel Goring-Morris.* 1980-1981 - Excavations at Negev Highlands Project co- director with Prof. Nigel Goring-Morris.* 1982 - Excavations at Qadeis, co-director with Prof. S.A. Rosen and Prof. A. N. Goring-Morris.* 1980-1986 - HaGdud, Lower Valley, co-director with Prof. O. Bar-Yosef.* 1985 - Excavations at Mujahia, Heights.* 1985-1989 - Excavations at the Upper Galilee Project, Galil and Betzet I.* 1986-1991 - Excavations at the Qana Cave, Samaria, co-director with Dr. T. Tsuk.* 1987 - Excavations at Zehora I, Hills and Rabah.* 1988-1990 - Survey and excavations at Palmahim.* 1991-1993 - Excavations at Poleg 18 N.* 1992 - Excavations at Yarak (Lod), Shephelah.* 1994-1996 - Excavations at Darat, Desert.* 1997-1999 - Excavations at Hadera V, co-director with Dr. R. Barkai.* 1997-1999 - Excavations at Qumran Cave 24, Judean desert.* 1997-2001 - Survey and excavations in the Central Valley, co-director with Dr. R. Barkai.* 2001-2010 - Excavations at Qesem Cave, western Samaria, co-director with Dr. R. Barkai.Selected BibliographyBooks* Gopher, A., The flint assemblages of Munhata - final report . Les Cahiers Du Centre de Recherche Francais de Jerusalem , Vol. 4. Association Palorient, Paris. 162 pp.; 59 Figs.; 8 Plates., 1989.()* Gopher, A., Arrowheads of the Neolithic Levant - A Seriation Analysis . ASOR - American Schools for Oriental Research Dissertation Series Vol. 10, Eisenbrauns, Winnona Lake , Indiana . 325 pp.; 101 Figs., 1994.()* Gopher, A. and Orrelle, E., The Groundstone Assemblages of Munhata, A Neolithic site in the Jordan Valley , Israel : A report . Les Cahiers Des Missions Archeologiques Francaises en Iserel, Vol. 7, Association Palorient, Paris . 183 pp.; 47 Figs.; 10 Plates., 1995.()* Gopher, A. and Tsuk, T., The Nahal Qanah Cave ,  Earliest Gold in the southern Levant, Monograph Series of the Institute of Archaelology , Vol. 12. Tel Aviv University , Institute of Archaelology Tel Aviv University, Tel Aviv. 250 pp.; 135 Figs.; 11 color Plates., 1996.()* Bar-Yosef, O. and Gopher, A., An Early Neolithic Village in the Jordan Valley , Part I: The Archaeology of Netiv Hagdud . American School of Prehistoric Research Bulletin 43, Peabody Museum of Archaeology and Ethnography, Harvard University . 266 pp.; 165 Figs., 1997.()* Eisenberg, E., Gopher, A. and Greenberg, R., Tel Teo  A Neolithic, Chalcolithic and Early Bronze Age site in the Hula Valley . Israel Antiquities Authority Report Series no. 13. 250 pp.; 110 Figs.; 30 Plates., 2001.()* Bar-Yosef, O., Goring Morris, A. N. and Gopher, A. (eds.)., Gilgal: Early Neolithic Occupations in the Lower Jordan Valley : The Excvations of Tammar Noy . Oxbow Books, Oxford on behalf of the American School of Prehistoric Research.()* Gopher, A. Forthcoming. Village Communities of the Pottery Neolithic Period in the Menashe Hills, Israel , Archaeological Investigations at the Sites of Nahal Zehora. Chapters in books, papers and articles* Bar-Yosef, O. Gopher, A. and Goring-Morris, A.N., Netiv Hagdud: A Sultanian Mound in the Lower Jordan Valley . Palorient 6:201-206, 1980.* Davis, S., Goring-Morris, A.N., and Gopher, A., Sheep Bones from the Negev Epipaleolithic. Palorient 8:87-93, 1982.* Goring-Morris, A. N. and Gopher, A., Nahal Issaron: A Neolithic Settlement in the Southern Negev . Israel Exploration Journal 33:149-162, 1983.* Kislev, M. E., Bar-Yosef, O. and Gopher, A., Early Neolithic Domesticated and Wild Barley from Netiv Hagdud Region in the Lower Jordan Valley . Israel Journal of Botany 35:197-201, 1985.* Gopher, A. and Greenberg, R., Pottery Neolithic Levels at Tel Dan. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society 20:91-113, 1987.* Bar-Yosef, O., Gopher, A., and Nadel, D., The Hagdud Truncation - A new type from the Sultanian Industry at Netiv Hagdud , Jordan Valley. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society 20:151-157, 1987.* Hershkovitz, I. and Gopher, A., Human burials from Horvat Galil: A PPNB site in the Upper Galilee Israel . Palorient 14/1:119-126, 1988* Gopher, A., The Flint industry from Tel Tsaf. Tel Aviv, Journal of the Tel Aviv University Institute of Archeology Vol. 15-16:37-46, 1988-1989.* Gopher, A., Horvat Galil and Nahal Beset I: Two Neolithic Sites in the Upper Galilee . Mitekufat Haeven, Journal or the Israel Prehistoric Society Vol. 22:82-92, 1989.* Gopher, A. and Orrelle, E., The flint industry of Nahal Zehora, a Wadi Raba site in the Menashe Hills. Bulletin of the American Schools for Oriental Research 276:67-76, 1989.* Gopher, A., Neolithic Arrowheads of the Levant : Results and Implications of a multidimensional seriation analysis. In: Aurench, O., Cauvin, M.C. and Sanlaville, P. (eds.) Prhistoire Du Levant - Processus des Changements Culturels. Association Palorient, Paris, pp. 47-60, 1989.* Gopher, A., Diffusion processes in the Pre-Pottery Neolithic Levant: The case of the Helwan Point. In: Hershkovitz, I. (ed.) People and Culture in Change , Proceedings of the 2nd symposium on Upper Paleolithic, Mesolithic and Neolithic populations in Europe and the Mediterranean basin. BAR International series 508, Oxford , pp. 91-105, 1989.* Gopher, A., Tsuk, T., Shalev, S., and Gophna, R., Earliest Gold Artifacts discovered in the Southern Levant . Current Anthropology 31(4):436-443, 1990. * Belfer-Cohen, A., Arensburg, B., Gopher, A. and Bar-Yosf, O., Human remains from Netiv Hagdud, a Pre Pottery Neolithic A site in the Jordan Valley . Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society Vol. 23:79-85, 1990.* Gopher, A., Mujahia - An early Pre-Pottery Neolithic B site in the Golan Heights . Tel Aviv, Journal of the Institute of Archaeology of Tel Aviv University vol. 17(2):115-143.* Hershkovitz, I. and Gopher, A. 1990. Paleodemography, burial customs and food-producing economy at the beginning of the Holocene: A perspective from the southern Levant . Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society Vol. 23:9-47, 1990.* Nadel, D., Bar-Yosef, O. and Gopher, A., Early Neolithic Arrowhead Types in the Southern Levant a Typological Suggestion. Palorient 17/1:109- 119, 1991.* Bar-Yosef, O., Gopher, A., Kislev, M., and Tchernov, E., Netiv Hagdud - an Early Neolithic Village Site in the Jordan Valley . Journal of Field Archaeology 18(4):405-424, 1991.* Gopher, A., Sadeh, S. and Goren, Y. 1992. The pottery assemblage of Nahal Beset I: A Neolithic site in the Upper Galilee . Israel Exploration Journal 42:4-16.* Yellin, J. and Gopher, A., The origin of the obsidian artifacts from Mujahia- A PPNB site in the Golan Heights . Tel Aviv, Journal of the Institute of Archaeology of Tel Aviv University 19:94-99, 1992.* Galili, E., Weinstein-Evron, Hershkovitz, I. , Gopher, A., M., Lernau, H., Kislev, M., Kolska-Horwitz, L. and Lernau, H., Atlit-Yam: A Prehistoric Site on the Sea Floor off the Israeli Coast. Journal of Field Archaeology 20(2):133-157, 1993.* Gopher, A. and Gophna, R., Cultures of the Eight and Seventh Millennia BP in Southern Levant : A Review for the 1990s. Journal of World Prehistory 7(3): 297-353, 1993.* Gopher, A., 6th - 5th millennia B.C. settlements in the Coastal Plain - Israel . Palorient 19(1):55-64, 1993.* Goren, Y., Gopher, A. and Goldberg, P., The beginnings of pottery production in the southern Levant : technological and social aspects. In: Biran, A. and Aviram, J. (eds.) Biblical Archaeology today 1990, proceedings of the 2nd International congress on biblical archaeology, Jerusalem , June 1990, Pre-Congress Symposium: supplement. The Israel Exploration Society, Jerusalem , pp. 33-40, 1993.* Carmi, I. , Segal, D., Goring-Morris, A.N. and Gopher, A., Dating the prehistoric site Nahal Isaaron in the southwestern Negev , Israel . Radiocarbon 36(3):391- 398, 1994. * Gopher, A., Pottery Neolithic 6th - 5th millennia B.C. industries of the Southern Levant seen through PPN glasses. In: Gebel, H.G. and Kozlowski, S. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crscent Studies in Early Near Eastern Production, Subsistence and Environment No. 1, Berlin , Ex Oriente, pp. 563-567, 1994.* Gopher, A., Goring-Morris, A.N. and Gordon, D., Nahal Issaron, the lithics of the later PPNB occupatio. In: Gebel, H.G. and Kozlowski, S. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crescent Studies in Early Near Eastern Production, Subsistence and Environment No. 1, Berlin , Ex Oriente, pp. 479-495, 1994.* Goring-Morris, A.N., Gopher, A. and Rosen , S.A., The Neolithic Tuwailan cortical knife industry of the Negev, Israel . In: Gebel, H.G. and Kozlowski, S. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crescent Studies in Early Near Eastern Production, Subsistence and Environment No. 1, Berlin , Ex Oriente, pp. 511-525, 1994.* Gopher, A., Central and Southern Levant PPN cultural Sequences: time-space systematics through typological and stylistic approaches. In: Gebel, H.G. and Kozlowski, S. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crescent Studies in Early Near Eastern Production, Subsistence and Environment No. 1, Berlin , Ex Oriente, pp. 387-393, 1994.* Barkai, R., Burian, F., Friedman, E. and Gopher, A., 18-X - An Epipaleolithic collection from the Nahal Poleg area. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society . vol. 26:64-73, 1994-5.* Gopher, A., Goring-Morris, A.N. and Rosen , S.A., Ein Qadis I: A Pre-Pottery Neolithic B Occupation in Eastern Sinai . Atiqot vol. XXVII: 15-33. Antiquities Authority of Israel , Jerusalem, 1995.* Gopher, A., Ain Darat - A PPNA site in the Judean Desert , lithic assemblages of the 1994 season. Neo - Lithics 1/1995:7-8, 1995. * Gopher, A., Early Pottery - Bearing Groups in Israel - the Pottery Neolithic Period. In: Levy, T. A. (ed.) The Archaeology of Society in the Holy Land . Leicester University Press, London , pp. 205-225, 1995.* Goren, Y. and Gopher, A., The beginnings of pottery production in the Southern Levant : A model. In: Vincenzini, T. (ed.) The Ceramic Cultural Heritage , Techna Monographs in Materia and Society 2. Florence , pp. 21-28, 1995.* Gopher, A. and Orrelle, E., New Data on Burials from the Pottery Neolithic Period (sixth-fifth Millennium BC ) in Israel . In Campbell , S. and Green, A. (eds.) The Archaeology of Death in the Ancient Near East . Oxbow Monograph 51, pp. 24-29, 1995.* Perrot, J. and Gopher, A., A Late Neolithic site near Ashkelon . Israel Exploration Journal : 46(3-4):145-166, 1996.*  Gopher, A. and Orrelle, E., An alternative interpretation for material imagery of the Yarmukian, a Neolithic culture of the sixth millennium B.C. in the southern Levant . Cambridge Archaeological Journal 6(2): 255-279, 1996.* Gopher, A. and Greenberg, R., The Pottery Neolithic Levels. In: Biran, A., Ilan, D. and Greenberg, R. (eds.) Dan I: A Chronicle of the Excavation, the Neolithic, the Early Bronze Age and the Middle Bronze Age Toombs . Hebrew Union College Annual Series, Jerusalem , pp. 67-81, 1996.* Gopher, A., Infant burials in the Neolithic periods in the Southern Levant-Israel: A social view. In: Otte, M. (ed.) Nature et Culture , Actes du Colloque International, Lige, December 1993, pp. 913-918, 1996.* Gopher, A., What happened to the Early PPNB? In: Kozlowski, S.K and Gebel, H.G. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crescent and their contemporaries in adjacent regions . Studies in Early Near Eastern production, subsistence and environment 3, Berlin , ex Oriente, pp. 151-158,  1996.* Gopher, A., A preliminary report on the flints from Ain Darat: a PPNA site in the Judean Desert . In: S. K. Kozlowski, S.K and Gebel, H.G. (eds.) Neolithic chipped stone industries of the Fertile Crescent and their contemporaries in adjacent regions . Studies in Early Near Eastern production, subsistence and environment 3, Berlin , ex Oriente, pp.443-452, 1996.* Gopher, A., Horvat Galil - An Early PPNB site in the Upper Galilee, Israel. Tel Aviv, Journal of the Institute of Archaeology Tel Aviv University 24 (2):183-222, 1997.* Gopher, A. and Barkai, R., Here are the microliths: a reply to where are the microliths? Neo-Lithics 1/97: 16-18, 1997. * Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., Transversal burins from Nahal Zehora I, A Pottery Neolithic site in central Israel . Neo-Lithics 1/97:20-23, 1997.* Barkai, R., Gopher, A. and Friedman, E., Prehistoric occurrences in the western Samaria , the 1967-1968 survey. In: Finkelstein, I. and Lederman, Z. Highlands of many Cultures, The southern Samaria Survey, The Sites , pp. 857-881, 1997.* Gopher, A. and Tsuk, T., Nahal Qanah Cave : a unique Chalcolithic burial Cave in West Samaria . In: Bansall, C. and Tolan-Smith C. (eds.) The Human Use of Caves , BAR International Series 667, Proceedings of the conference on the human use of caves, New Castle , July, 1993, pp.167-174, 1997.* Gopher, A., Burian, F. and Friedman, E., Prehistoric sites on the northern bank of Nahal Poleg: Site 18M revisited. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society Vol. 28:81-104, 1998.* Gopher, A. and Goring-Morris A. N., Abu Salem: A Pre Pottery Neolithic B camp in the Central Negev Highlands, Israel. Bulletin of the American School for Oriental Research 312: 1-20, 1998. * Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., Reintroducing butt scrapers (racloire sur talon): another look at a non-formal tool type. Lithic Technology 23 (1): 20-26, 1998.* Gopher, A., Orrelle, E., Blockman, N., Barkai, R., Eyal, R. and Naveh, D., The Nahal Zehora village sites: Pottery Neolithic in the Menashe Hills, Israel In: Proceedings of the XIII UISPP, Forli , Italy , pp. 465-468, 1998.* Eyal, R., Naveh, D. and Gopher, A., Pottery vessel handles from Nahal Zehora I and II: an Attribute analysis. In: Proceedings of the XIII UISPP, Forli , Italy , pp. 475-481, 1998.* Blockman, N. and Gopher, A., The Lodian (Jericho XI) assemblage of Newe Yarak - Lod. In: Proceedings of XIII UISPP, Forli , Italy , pp. 489-495, 1998.* Gopher, A., Barkai, R. and Marder, O., Cultural contacts in the Neolithic period: Anatolian obsidians in the southern Levant . In: Otte, M. (ed.) Prehistoire dAnatolie, Gense des Deux Mondes . Lige, ERAUL 85, pp. 641-650, 1998.* Gopher, A. and Orrelle, E., Coffee Beans, Cowries and Vulvas: A Reply to Comments by Y. Garfinkel. Cambridge Archaeological Journal 9 (1):133-137, 1999.* Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., The last Neolithic industry - the flint assemblages of Nahal Zehora I, a Wadi Rabah site In the Menashe Hills, Israel . Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society Vol. 29:41-122, 1999.* Frumkin, A., Carmi, I., Gopher, A., Ford, D. C., Schwarcz, H. P. and Tsuk, T., Holocene millennial-scale climatic cycle from Nahal Qanah Cave speleothem, Israel .The Holocene 9.6 special issue, Pp. 677-682, 1999.* Gopher, A., Lithic industries of the Neolithic period in the southern Levant : a review. In: Kozlowski S. K. The Eastern Wing of the Fertile Crescent , Late Prehistory of the Greater Mesopotamian Lithic Industries . BAR International Series 760, Oxford , Archeopress, pp. 116-138, 1999.* Hershkovitz, I. and Gopher, A., Is tuberculosis associated with early domestication of cattle: Evidence from the Levant . In: Plfi, G., Dutour, O., Dek, J. and Huts, I. (eds). Tuberculosis Past and Present . TB Foundation. pp. 445-449, 1999.* Lev-Yadun, S., Gopher, A. and Abbo, S., The Cradle of Agriculture. Science 288 ( 2 nd June 2000 ): 1602-1603, 2000. * Shimelmitz, R., Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., A Canaanean Blade Workshop at Har Haruvim , Israel . Tel Aviv Journal of the Institute of Archaeology Tel Aviv University Vol.27 (1): 3-22, 2000.* Orrelle, E. and Gopher, A., The Pottery Neolithic period: Questions about pottery decoration, symbolism and meaning. In: Kuijt, I. (ed). Life in Neolithic Farming Communities , Plenum Press. pp. 295-308, 2000.* Gopher, A. Abbo, S. Lev-Yadun, S., The when, the where and the why of the Neolithic Revolution in the Levant . Documenta Praehistoria volume (XXVIII) edited by M. Budja. pp. 49-62, 2001.* Shimelmitz, R; Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., An EpiPaleolithic occurrence at the site of  Ain Miri , Northern Israel . Neo- Lithics 1/01:4-5, 2001.* Yamada, S., Goring-Morris, A. N., Gopher, A. and Perron, T., Analysis of faintly glossed blades from Pre-Pottery Neolithic Nahal Issaron, Israel . In: Caneva, I. Lemorini, C. Zampetti, D. and Biagi, P. (eds.) Beyond tools, redefining the PPN lithic assemblages of the Levant . Berlin , ex oriente, pp.183-204, 2001.* Gopher, A., Barkai, R. and Asaf, A., Trends in sickle blade production in the Neolithic of the Hula Valley, Israel. In: Caneva, I. Lemorini, C. Zampetti, D. and Biagi, P. (eds.), Beyond tools, redefining the PPN lithic assemblages of the Levant . Berlin , ex oriente, pp. 411-426, 2001.* Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., Flint quarries in the southern Levantine Holocene: a routine procedure? New evidence form the upper Galilee , Israel . In: Caneva, I. Lemorini, C. Zampetti, D. and Biagi, P. (eds.), Beyond tools, redefining the PPN lithic assemblages of the Levant . Berlin , ex oriente, pp. 17-26, 2001.* Barkai, R., Gopher, A. and La Porta , P., Palaeolithic landscape of extraction: flint surface quarries and workshops at Mt. Pua , Israel . Antiquity 76: 72-80, 2002. * Galili, E., Rosen, B., Gopher, A. and Kolska-Horwitz, L., The Emergence and dispersion of the Eastern Mediterranean Fishing Village : Evidence from Submerged Neolithic Settlements off the Carmel Coast, Israel. Journal of Mediterranean Archaeology 15.2:167-198, 2002.* Gopher, A., Greenberg, R. and Herzog, Z., Archaeological Public Policy. In: Korn, D. (ed.), Public Policy in Israel: Perspectives and Practices , Lanham, Lexington Books, pp. 191-204, 2002.* Abbo, S., Shtienberg, D., Lichtenzweig, J. Lev-Yadun, S. and Gopher, A., The chickpea, summer cropping, and a new model for pulses domestication in the ancient Near East. Quarterly Review of Biology vol. 78, no. 4:37-50, 2003.* Barkai, R., Gopher, A., Lauritzen, S.E. and Frumkin, A., Uranium series dates from Qesem Cave , Israel , and the end of the Lower Palaeolithic . Nature 423 ( 26 th June 2003 ): 977-979, 2003.* Godfrey-Smith, D.I.; Vaughan , K.B.; Gopher, A. and Barkai, R., Direct luminescence chronology of the Epi-Paleolithic Kebaran site of Nahal Hadera V, Israel. Geoarchaeology 18 (4): 461-475, 2003.* Lev-Tov, N., Gopher, A. and Smith, P., Dental evidence for dietary practices in the Chalcolithic period: the findings from a Burial cave in Peqiin (northern Israel ). Palorient 29(1): 121-134, 2003.* Yerkes, R.W., Barkai, R., Gopher, A. and Bar-Yosef, O., Microwear analysis of early Neolithic (PPNA) axes and bifacial tools from Netiv Hagdud in the Jordan Valley, Israel. Journal of Archaeological Science 30:1051-1066, 2003.* Rosen, S. A. and Gopher, A., Flint tools from the survey. In: Beit-Arieh, I. (ed). Archaeology of Sinai, The Ophir Expedition . Tel Aviv University , Tel Aviv. pp. 184-195, 2003.* Eshed, V., Gopher, A., Galili, E. and Hershkovitz, I., Musculoskeletal Stress Markers in Natufian Hunter-Gatherers and Neolithic Farmers in the Levant : The Upper Limb. American Journal of Physical Anthropology 123:303-315, 2004.* Eshed, V., Gopher, A., Gage, T. B. and Hershkovitz, I., Has the Transition to agriculture Reshaped the Demographic Structure of Prehistoric Populations? New Evidence from the Levant . American Journal of Physical Anthropology 124/4:315-329, 2004.* Gopher, A. and Blockman, N., Excavations at Neolithic Lod (Newe Yarak) and the Lodian culture of the Pottery Neolithic period. Atiquot (English Series) 47:1-50, 2004.* Verri, G., Barkai, R., Bordeanu, C., Gopher, A., Hass, M., Kaufman, A., Kubik, P. Montanari, E., Paul, M., Ronen, A., Weiner, S., and Boaretto, E., Flint Mining in Prehistory Recorded by in Situ Produced Cosmogenic 10 Be. Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences U.S.A. 101(21):7880-7884, 2004.* Shimelmitz, R., Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., The Geometric Kebaran Microlithic Assemblage of Ain Miri , Northern Israel . Paleorient 30(2):27-140, 2004.* Galili, E., Gopher, A., Rosen, A. and Kolska-Horwitz, L., The Emergence of the Mediterranean Fishing Village in the Levant and the Anomaly of Neolithic Cyprus . In: Peltenburg, E. and Wasse, A. (Eds.), Neolithic Revolution , Oxbow books, pp. 91-101, 2004.* Abbo, S., Gopher, A., Rubin, B. and Lev-Yadun, S., On the origin of Near Eastern founder crops and the dump-heap hypothesis. Genetic Resources and Crop Evolution 52:491-495, 2005.* Barkai, R.,Gopher, A. and Shimelmitz, R., Middle Pleistocene Blade Production in the Levant: An Amudian Assemblage from Qesem Cave, Israel. Eurasian Prehistory 3:39-74, 2005.* Galili, E., Eshed, V., Gopher, A. and Hershkovitz, I., Burial practices at the submerged Pre-Pottery Neolithic C site of Atlit-Yam, northern coast of Israel . Bulletin of the American School of Archaeology 339:1-19, 2005.* Gopher, A., Barkai, R., Shimelmitz, R., Khalaily, M., Lemorini, C., Hershkovitz, I. and Stiner, M., Qesem Cave : An Amudian site in central Israel . Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society 35:69-92, 2005.* Verri, G., Barkai, R., Gopher, A., Hass, M., Kubik, P., Paul, M., Ronen, A., Weiner, S., and Boaretto, E., Flint procurement strategies in the Late Lower Palaeolithic recordrd by in Situ produced Cosmogenic 10 Be in Tabun and Qesem Caves ( Israel ). Journal of Archaeological Science 32:207-213, 2005.* Abbo, S., Shtienberg, D., Lev-Yadun, S. and Gopher, A., Prehistoric Spread of Agrotechniques into the Indian Subcontinent as Deduced from the Evolutionary History of Chickpea: Any Lesson for Modern Crop Improvement? In, Y.L. Nene (ed) Agricultural Heritage of Asia: Proceedings of the International Conference, 6-8 December 2004 , Asian Agri-History Foundation, Secunderabad, Andhra Pradesh, India. pp. 197-203, 2005.* Gopher, A., Burian, F. and Friedman, E., Neolithic coastal sites near Palmahim with some comments ofnthe Neolithic period in the Israel coastal plain. In, M. Fischer (ed), Yavneh, Yavneh-Yam and their Neighborhood , Eretz and Tel Aviv University , Tel Aviv, pp. 17-46, 2005.* Alahique, F. and Gopher, A., Animal resource exploitation at Qumran Cave 24 ( Dead Sea , Israel ) from the Pre-Pottery Neolithic to the Chalcolithic. In, H. Buitenhuis, A. M. Choyke, L. Martin, L. Bartosiewicz and M. Mashkour (eds.) Archeozoology of the Near East VI , ARC-Publicaties 123:139-149, 2005.* Lemorini, C., Gopher, A, Shimelmitz, R., Stiner, M., and Barkai, R., Use-wear analysis of an Amudian laminar assemblage from Acheuleo-Yabrudian Qesem Cave , Israel . Journal of Archaeological Science 33:921-934, 2006.* Abbo, S., Gopher, A., Peleg, Z., Saranga, Y., Fahima, T., Salamini, F. and Lev-Yadun, S.,. The ripples of The Big (agricultural) Bang: The spread of early wheat cultivation. Genome 49:861-863.* Lev-Yadun, S., Gopher, A. and Abbo, S. 2006. How and When was Wild Wheat Domesticated? Science 313:296, 2006.* Eshed, V., Gopher, A. and Hershkovitz, I., Tooth wear and dental pathology at the advent of agriculture: New evidence from the Levant . American Journal of Physical Anthropology 130:145-159, 2006.* Gopher, A. and Barkai, R., Flint extraction sites and workshops in prehistoric Galilee , Israel . In: Krlin, G. and Weisgerber, G. Stone Age  Mining Age . Bochum . pp. 91-98, 2006.* Barkai, R., Gopher, A. and La Porta , P.C.,  Middle Pleistocene Landscape of Extraction: Quarry and Workshop Complexes in Northern Israel . In: Axe Age: Acheulian Toolmaking - from Quarry to Discard . N. Goren-Inbar, G. Sharon (eds.) Equinox, London, pp. 7-44, 2006.* Rosenberg, D., Assaf, A., Eyal, R. and Gopher, A., Beisamoun  the Wadi Rabah Occurrence. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society 36:129-137, 2006.* Kerem, Z., Lev-Yadun, S., Gopher, A., Weinberg, P. and Abbo, S., Chickpea domestication in the Neolithic Levant through the nutritional perspective. Journal of Archaeological Science 34(2007):1289-1293, 2007.* Karkanas, P., Shahack-Gross, R., Ayalon, A., Bar-Matthews, M., Barkai, R., Frumkin, A., Gopher, A. and Stiner, M. C., Evidence for habitual use of fire at the end of the Lower Paleolithic: Site-formation processes at Qesem Cave , Israel . Journal of Human Evolution 53:197-212, 2007.* Barkai, R., Gopher, A. and Weiner, J., Quarrying flint at Neolithic Ramat Tamar  An experiment. In: Astruc, L., Binder, D. and Briois, F. (eds.) Systmes des communauts du Nolithiques prcramique au Proche-Orient. Colloque international sur les industries lithiques du Nolithique pr-cramique . Editions APDCA, Antibes , pp. 25-32, 2007.* Abbo, S., Zezak, I. , Schwatrz, E., Lev-Yadun, S. and Gopher, A., Experimental harvesting of wild peas in I srael : Implications for the origins of Near East farming. Journal of Archaeological Science 35:922-929, 2008.* Hershkovitz, I. and Gopher, A., Demographic, Biological and Cultural Aspects of the Neolithic Revolution: A View from the Southern Levant . In, JP Bouquet-Appel and O. Bar-Yosef (eds.), The Neolithic Demographic Transition and its consequences . Springer, pp. 441--479, 2008.* Rosenberg, D., Assaf, A., Getzov, N. and Gopher, A., Flaked stone discs of the Neolithic and Chalcolithic Periods in the southern Levant . Paleorient 34.2:137-151, 2008.* Abbo, S., Zezak, I., Schwartz, E., Lev-Yadun, S., Kerem,Z. and Gopher, A., Wild Lentil and Chickpea harvest in Israel : bearing on the origins of Near Eastern farming. Journal of Archaeological Science 35: 3172-3177, 2008.* Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., Changing the face of the earth: Human behavior at Sede Ilan, an extensive Lower-Middle Paleolithic quarry site in Israel . In, B. Adams and B. Blades (eds.), Lithic Materials and Paleolithic Societies . Blackwell Publications, pp. 174-185, 2009.* Abbo, S., Saranga, Y., Peleg, Z., Kerem, Z., Lev-Yadun, S. and Gopher, A., Reconsidering domestication of legumes versus cereals in the ancient Near East. Quarterly Review of Biology 84(1):29-50, 2009.* Frumkin, A. Karkanas, P.; Bar-Matthews, M.; Barkai, R.; Gopher, A.; Shahack-Gross, R. and Vaks, A., Gravitational deformations and fillings of aging caves: the example of Qesem karst system, Israel . Geomorphology 106:154-164, 2009.* Barkai, R., Lemorini, C., Shimelmitz, R., Lev, Z., Stiner, M. and Gopher, A., A blade for all seasons? Making and using Amudian blades at Qesem Cave , Israel . Human Evolution 24:57-75, 2009.* Boaretto, E., Barkai, R., Gopher, A., Berna, F., Kubik , P. and Weiner, S., Specialized Flint Procurement Strategies for Hand Axes, Scrapers and Blades in the Late Lower Paleolithic: A 10 Be Study at Qesem Cave , Israel . Human Evolution 24:1-12, 2009.* Stiner, C. M., Barkai, R. and Gopher, A., Cooperative hunting and meat sharing 400-200 kya at Qesem Cave , Israel . Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of America vol. 106 no. 32: 13207-13212, 2009.* Galili, E., Eshed, V., Rosen, B., Kislev, M. E., Simchoni, O, Hershkovitz, I. and Gopher, A.. Evidence for a separated burial ground at the submerged Pottery Neolithic site of Neve-Yam , Israel. Paleorient 35.1:31-46, 2009.* Abbo, S., Saranga, Y., Peleg, Z.,Kerem, Z., Lev-Yadun, S. And Gopher, A., Reconsidering domesticationof legumes versus cereals in the ancient Near East. Quarterly Review of Biology 84.1:29-50, 2009.* Abbo, S., Lev-Yadun, S. and Gopher, A., Yield stability: an agronomic perspective on the origins of Near Eastern agriculture. Vegetation history and Archaeobotany 19:143-150, 2010. * Gopehr, A., Ayalon, A., Bar-Matthews, M. Barkai, R., Frumkin, A., Karkanas, P.,and Shahack-Gross, R., The chronology of the late Lower Paleolithic in the Levantbased on U-TH ages of speleothems from Qesem cave, Israel. Quaternary Geochronology 5:644-656, 2010.* Maul, L., Smith, K,. Barkai, R., Barash, A., Karkanas, P., Shahack-Gross, R. and Gopher, A., Microfaunal remains at Middle Pleistocene Qesem Cave, Israel: Preliminary results on small vertebrates, environment and biostratigraphy. Journal of Human Evolution (available online), 2010.* Hershkovitz ,I; Smith, P; Sarig, R; Quam, R; Rodrguez, L; Garca, R; Arsuaga, J-L; Barkai, .R. and Gopher,.A., Middle Pleistocene dental remains from Qesem Cave, Israel. American Journal of Physical Anthropology, 2010.* Barkai, R ., Lemorini, C., and Gopher,.A., Palaeolithic cutlery 400 000200 000 years ago: tiny meat-cutting tools from Qesem Cave , Israel . Antiquity 84 (325), 2010.* Abbo, S., Lev-Yadun, S. Gopher, A., Agricultural origins: centers and noncenters; a Near Eastern reappraisal. Critical Review in Plant Sciences 29: 317-328, 2010.* Gopher, A., Qadesh Barnea 3, A Neolithic site in the western Negev Highlands: A report. Mitekufat Haeven, Journal of the Israel Prehistoric Society 40:183-218,  2010.* Abbo, S., Lev-Yadun, S., Gopher, A., Origin of Near Eastern plant domestication: homage to Claude Levi-Strauss and  La Pense Sauvage , Genetic Resources and Crop Evolution, 2010 (in press).* Stiner, M., Gopher, A. and Barkai, R., Hearth-side socioeconomics, hunting and paleoecology during the late Lower Paleolithic at Qesem Cave , Israel . Journal of Human Evolution,  2010 (in press).Avi Gopher has also instructed several MA and PhD students.(University of Tel Aviv - Staff Page - Avi Gopher)References
31287705
Indigenous_Territory
thumb|right|Current and proposed Indigenous Territories in Brazil.In Brazil, Indigenous Territories or Indigenous Lands (, TIs) are areas inhabited and exclusively possessed by indigenous people. The Brazilian Constitution recognises the inalienable right of indigenous peoples to lands they traditionally occupy(Further defined as those lands on which they live on a permanent basis, those used for their productive activities, those indispensable to the preservation of the environmental resources necessary for their well-being and for their physical and cultural reproduction, according to their uses, customs and traditions.)(Federal Constitution of Brazil. Chapter VII Article 231.)( and automatically confers them permanent possession of these lands. In practice, however, a formal process of demarcation is required for a TI to gain full protection,() and this has often entailed protracted legal battles.()()() Even after demarcation, they are frequently subject to illegal invasions by settlers and mining and logging companies.(There are 672 Indigenous Territories in Brazil, covering about 13% of its land area.() Critics of the system say that this is out of proportion with the number of indigenous people, about 2% of the population; they argue that amount of land reserved as TIs undermines the countrys economic development and national security.((((DistributionThere are 672 Indigenous Territories in Brazil covering 8,511,965 km2  13% of its land area. For historical reasonsPortuguese colonisation started from the coastmost of these are concentrated in the countrys interior, particularly Amaznia.( There are only three federated units without any TIs: the states of Grande do Norte and Piau, and the Federal District.Indigenous Territories by state(Demarcation processThe process of demarcating Indigenous Territories was established in the 1973 Statue of the Indian and has been revised several times, most recently in 1996.()() Under the current legal framework, the initial identification and definition of potential TIs is the responsibility FUNAI, the government body in charge of indigenous affairs, who commission an ethnographic and geographical survey of the area and publish a proposal. This proposal must then be approved by the Ministry of Justice, who consider FUNAIs proposal and any objections from other interested parties with respect to the Constitution. If approved, FUNAI begins physically demarcating the new TI and the National Institute for Colonization and Agrarian Reform undertakes the resettlement of any non-indigenous occupants. Final approval, or homologation, for the demarcation a TI is issued by the President of the Republic, after which it is officially registered.()The Statue of the Indian intended that all indigenous lands be demarcated by 1978,() and the 1988 Constitution also set a five-year deadline.( Neither were met, and demarcation is still ongoing. The process is frequently delayed by legal disputes arising from the objections of non-indigenous settlers and commercial interests in the proposed TI. This has been increasingly common since 1996, when a change in the law required an explicit period to be set aside in the demarcation process for the hearing of complaints.( In 2008 the Federal Court issued a high-profile decision in favour of the continued territorial integrity of Serra do Sol in Roraima. Non-indigenous rice farmers had protested their deportation from the TI, arguing that the reserve undermined Brazils national integrity and the states economic development, and proposing that it be broken up. The ruling established a legal precedent that affected more than 100 similar cases that were before the Supreme Court at the time.(()CriticismLand ownership is a contentious issue in Brazil. In the 1990s, as much as 45% of available farmland in the country was controlled by 1% of the population.() Some advocates of land reform have therefore criticised the extent of land reserved for indigenous peoples, who account for just 0.2% of the population. According to this view the 1988 Constitutions approach towards indigenous peoples right to land is overly idealist, and a return to a more integrationist policy is favoured.() In the Raposa Serra do Sol dispute, the rice farmers and their proponents charged TIs with hindering development in sparsely populated states such as Roraima, where a large proportion of the land is reserved for indigenous peoples despite commercial pressures to develop it for agricultural use.() Socioambiental, a Brazilian indigenous rights group, argue that the disparity between indigenous population and land ownership is justified because their traditional subsistence patterns (typically cultivation or hunting and gathering) are more land extensive than modern agriculture, and that many TIs include large areas of agriculturally unproductive land or are environmentally degraded due to recent incursions.(Opponents of Indigenous Territories also claim that they undermine sovereignty. The promotion of indigenous rights by NGOs is seen as reflecting an internationalisation of the Amazon which is contrary to Brazils economic interests.(( Elements in the military have also expressed concern that because many TIs occupy border regions they pose a threat to national security  although both the army and police are allowed full access.(The current system of Indigenous Territories has also been criticised by proponents of indigenous rights, who say that the process of demarcation is too slow( and that FUNAI lacks the resources to properly protect them from encroachment once registered.()Notes(Referencesindgenas de Brasilindgenas
31306477
List_of_buildings_and_structures_in_Niger
A list of notable buildings and structures in Niger:Agadez*Mosque*Sultans Palace*Palace*TaguelmoustNiamey*Racecourse*Tenere*Sabka Lahiya*Hotel Niamey*Grand Mosque*General Seyni Kountche*de Course*Geographique National du Niger*Muslim Cemetery*Manama*Presidential Palace*General Hospital*Hospital*de Recherche Medicale et Sanitaire*Koira*Grand Market*Municipal Stadium*High School*Museum*Assembly of Niger* Hamani International Airport*School of Administration*Moumouni University*Academy*Institute of Mining, Industry and Geology* National Hospital*University Hospital.Yaama*Mosque
31330417
OKK_Koksovny
OKK Koksovny, a.s. (former names OKD, OKK, a.s. and Ostravsko-karvinsk koksovny, akciov spolenost) is the largest producer of foundry coke in Europe. The Company operates one plant in the City of Ostrava - called Svoboda facility. History The production of coke in the Ostrava area dates back to the 1840s. In 1843 a coking plant named Jan (later renamed President Bene and then Czechoslovak Army was founded.  It was later to become a part of OKK. In 1952 the company OKK was founded and all operating coking plants were merged under one head office, having previously existed as separate state enterprises, except for the metallurgical coking plants (in the Ostrava quarter Vtkovice, in the cities of Tinec and Kladno, and the coking plant Nov Hu Smelting Works founded in the same year). OKK included the coking plants in Ostrava: Svoboda, Jan verma, Karolina, Trojice, Czechoslovak army, and Lazy.In 1994 the joint-stock company OKD, OKK was established on 1 January 1994 by the allocation of OKD, a. s. assets. It became a wholly owned subsidiary of OKD, a. s. The annual turnover of the company was around CZK 5.5 billion. The new enterprise was created by merging two mining coking plants located within the city of Ostrava and one more plant located in the Karvin region.In 2008 after property changes the New World Resources Plc Company (NWR) became a new owner of the OKD, OKK, a.s. NWR is also the owner of the OKD, a.s., a hard coal mining company. Currently (2011) the OKK Koksovny, a.s. operates only one coking plant called Svoboda facility. Company products The main business of OKK Koksovny, a. s. is the production of coke. The company produces coke from virtually all types of coal suitable for coking. Coal is sourced from OKD mines as well as from abroad. OKK Koksovny, a. s. is the largest European producer of foundry coke. The firm offers a broad assortment of coke types for foundry and metallurgical manufacturing, for special metallurgy, heating and other purposes. It also sells chemical products from the high-temperature coal carbonisation that takes place during the coking process. Production (Data from 2010)Achieved annual production of 1,005,500 tonnes of coke. Of that* 0.277 million tonnes was foundry coke* 0.524 million tonnes was blast furnace coke* 0.204 million tonnes was fuel and technological cokeThe coking process yields a number of by-products that are important input materials in the chemical industry. Coal gas is captured during the coking process, with individual chemicals subsequently separated from the gas. OKK Koksovny, a.s. offers its customers:* Coke-oven gas* Tar* Benzol* Ammonium sulphate* Solid sulphur In 2010, OKK Koksovny a. s., produced:* 408 mil. m3 of coke-oven gas* 31,500 tonnes of anhydrous tar* 11,000 tonnes of raw benzol* 7,300  tonnes of ammonium sulphate* 800 tonnes of sulphur
31357424
Dawson_Valley_railway_line
The Dawson Valley Branch Railway was a railway line in Queensland, Australia.  Gold was discovered in the Mount Morgan region of Central Queensland in 1882.  The Mount Morgan Gold Mining Company was authorised by government in 1890 to build a railway link to Rockhampton but it did not proceed.  Revised plans were approved by parliament in December 1896 for a government built line. The line commenced at Kabra about 15 kilometres west of Rockhampton on the central line and struck a southerly path towards Mount Morgan.  The first stage opened on 15 June 1898 and reached Moonmera at the foot of a steep climb to Mount Morgan.  A siding was located en route at Boongary.  The next stage via Moongan, Kirkhall, Baree and Walterhail brought the line to Mount Morgan on 26 November 1898.  A 2315 metre rack section was required between Moonmera and Moongan to negotiate grades as steep as 1 in 16.5.  The rack system consisted of 2 parallel toothed vertical bars fixed between the rails which connected with specially built locomotives.  The additional locomotive joined the rear of the train during ascent and the front during descent. After opening, three trains ran daily to and from Rockhampton.  Two trains ran each way on Sundays thus enabling commuters to conveniently travel the short distance between Mount Morgan and Rockhampton.  The line proved very profitable. The discovery of coal in the Dawson Valley in 1900 generated interest in extending the line from Mount Morgan.  Parliament approved a southwest extension in late 1909 to take the line as far as Baralaba.   It opened in three stages.  Terminating at Wowan, the first stage opened on 16 October 1912 and en route sidings appeared at Talban, Kenbula, Ulogie, Muranu, Walmul, Konara, Gelobera, Wura, Dululu and Littles Crossing.  The second stage took the line via Buneru, Cooneel and Muruguran to Rannes and opened on 2 February 1915.  The third stage opened on 30 July 1917 and terminated at Baralaba after passing through Kokotungo and Kalewa.The transport of coal to Mount Morgan and for the Railways Department was a major contributor to the extended service.   Development of agricultural land prompted approval of a 95 kilometre extension further south from Baralaba along the Dawson Valley in 1922.   It was completed in two stages  via Harcourt, Mungi, Moura and Gibihi terminating at Nipan on 21 June 1926, and then via Willawa terminating at Theodore (previously called Castle Creek) on 7 May 1927.The service to Theodore was laborious.  A mixed train arrived at 4.30am twice a week and departed at 7.30am.  The journey to Mount Morgan took almost 8 hours.  A weekly rail motor service introduced in 1952 reduced the journey to Rockhampton to some 6  hours. The railway section near Mount Morgan was removed in late 1951 or early 1952.  Sections from Kabra to Mount Morgan and Wowan and from Baralaba to Moura were closed from 1 August 1987.   The lines were taken up.  By this stage, Moura was linked with Gladstone via the Moura Short Line.  The line between Wowan and Rannes remains in place but was mothballed from January 1994.  Likewise, a small section north from Theodore to the Goolara terminal was closed at the same time.See also*transport in Queensland References *Triumph of Narrow Gauge: A History of Queensland Railways by John Kerr 1990 Boolarong Press, Brisbane
31375325
Jean_Hissette
Jean Hissette (30 August 1888 &ndash; 26 August 1965) was a Belgian ophthalmologist.Hissette was born in Lwen.  In 1930, he became the first to discover African River Blindness. This is a severe eye disease occurring in people affected by onchocerciasis, a filarial worm infection. Onchocerciasis had already been known for a long time. However, until 1930 no other specialist in tropical diseases had ever identified these severely afflicted blind people anywhere in Africa. He had discovered not only some but thousands of people with river blindness along the Sankuru in the Belgian Congo. Born and grown up in Louvain, Belgium On the 30th of August 1888, Philippe Jean Hissette was born in Louvain as the third child of Jeanne Catherine Wouters (18551936) and the mining engineer, Louis Hissette (18581888). Four months before the birth his father had died at the age of 30. Philippe Jean had two brothers, Louis-Ferdinand (18851972) and Jean-Baptiste (18861887). After her husband, Louis Hissette, had died, Jeanne Catherine remarried to Joseph Pieraerts in 1892. Jean, as he was called visited Schools in Louvain and in Melle, Ghent. From 1908 until 1909 he was recruited for the military service. After that he began to study medicine in Louvain. WWI When the First World War broke out in 1914 Jean Hissette was still a medicine student and had spent his July vacations in Lacuisine. On the 1st of August 1914, mobilization day, he left Lacuisine for the duration of the war. During the First World War and after the war had ended, Jean performed four years of military service as a medically adorned sanitary officer in the medical service unit of the 1st division of the Belgian Army. He was mainly deployed in the front line against the Germans at the Yser. Florenville In 1919 he passed his state examination at the University of Ghent. Later the same year he married the anversoise Hilda de Vriendt (old Flemish painter family) and at this point he settled as a private doctor and obstetrician in the independent practice in Florenville-sur-Semois en Gaume, Rue dOrval Nr.7. Hissette was not very busy because there were a total of four practising physicians. During this time he also visited the eye clinic of Ghents university, which was run by van Duyse, on a regular basis. Soon after, he visited his colleagues and doctor friends, de Mets and Moorkens, in Antwerp to continue his education in ophthalmology. On the farms around Florenville he collected eyes of pigs to train on. In quick succession his five children were born, Madeleine, the oldest (*1920), Marguerite (19222002), Marie Thrse (*1923), Gabrielle (19251983) and his son George (19261988). The family Hissette decided to move into the Belgian Congo They did not have much money and in 1928, at the age of 40, Jean and his wife Hilda decided to move into the Belgian Congo with the Belgian National Mission. On the 27th of February 1929, Hilda, Jean and their two youngest children boarded the Anversville in Antwerp. Passing the Matadi Harbour on their way they moved to the Scheutist missionary station (Mission nationale) in Thielen-Saint Jacques in Kasai (Belgian Congo). The three older children stayed in Belgium for their school education.Although Hissette came to the Congo as a general practitioner his real interest was his specialisation in ophthalmology. With approval of the emissive mission in Thielen-Saint Jacques he set up an ophthalmological centre and straight away conducted eye surgery. Nevertheless, he did not neglect his function as a general practitioner for tropical medicines, nor as obstetrician and carer for newborns. On the Scheutist missionary station lA.M.M. (lAide Mdicale aux Missions) it was his task to take on the medical service. In June 1929 the Belgian nurse, Mademoiselle de Salmon, followed him. The space in the hospital was so tiny that Hissette preferred to operate out on the terrace (Fig.1).Hissette made an effort to gain the trust of the sick people, he showed great compassion for distress and suffering in people regardless of whether they were black or white. After about one and a half years an attentive priest led him to the discovery of his life time: In September 1930, he discovers the first people in Africa affected by river blindness at the Sankuru and Lomami River in the Belgian Congo (Kluxen2011). A year after the initial discovery he undertakes another expedition to the same region to complete his scientific investigations which he includes in his famous work from 1932 (Hissette 1932). Hissette returns to the Congo as the first practising ophthalmologist After receiving further qualifications and becoming equipped with some privileges from the colonial ministry in Brussels he returns to the Congo without his family as a qualified ophthalmologist. In October 1932, he travels via Tunis and Egypt into the Sudan and arrives in the Northeast of the Belgian Congo Colony at the end of the year. Here he also discovers a foyer of ocular onchocerciasis at the Ule. In the year 1933 he is still in Thielen-Saint Jacques but only for a short time until he leaves the Scheutists to establish a dispensary for eye patients in Elisabethville. His family followed him to Elisabethville (Lubumbashi) in 1934/1935 where the children had the opportunity for an accredited school education.In July 1934, as an advisor and guide, he attends the Harvard African Expedition under R. P. Strong to research the onchocerciasis along the Sankuru. In 1938 the results were published in a supplement of the American Journal for Tropical Medicine (Strong 1938, Hissette 1938). His reputation as an ophthalmologist grows to such an extent that patients even come from the neighbouring colonies to be consulted.In June 1936, Hissette presented a slide show in London and became a Fellow of the Royal Society of Tropical Medicines and Hygiene. On the 18th of July 1936 he exhibited his aquarelles on the pathology of ocular onchocerciasis at the Colonial exhibition in Brussels (lInstitut royal colonial belge, lactuelle Acadmie royale des Sciences dOutre-mer) and also published them in the Collection des Mmoires de lInstitut (Hissette 1937). Amongst the aquarelles there is one picture of a typical chorioretinitis of the African ocular onchocerciasis, which creates blotchy scars (Hissette 1937, Hissette 1938). In 1937, he investigates the ocular complications of a measles epidemic in the colonial MPweto Region. Due to measles and a concurrent vitamin A deficiency spontaneous double-sided cornea perforations and blindness were caused in many children. At the beginning of the Second World War Hissette was appointed the position of the provincial doctor in Katanga. In 1952 he and his wife returned to Belgium. Around the same time he fell seriously ill and never really recovered from it, making it impossible for him to ever work in the medical field again. In the first few years the couple stayed in Lacuisine-sur-Semois but soon moved to an apartment in Brussels. Jean died in Brussels on the 26th of August 1965. He and his wife are buried in a family grave in Lacuisine, Florenville. Onchocerciasis in Africa and Central America before 1930 The first persons to mention ocular onchocerciasis were Rodolfo Robles and Rafael Pacheco Luna in Guatemala in 1915/1916 (Pacheco Luna 1918, Robles 1917, Grove 1990). Ophthalmic symptoms and signs were marked in the Triassic, also known as Morbus Robles:1. Filarial worm infection of an adult Onchocerca in America,2. Erisipela de la costa, an oedema of the face,3. Conjunctivitis and iritis of the anterior segment of the eye.The early investigators of onchocerciasis from 1874-1930 in Africa made no mention at all of concomitant severe eye disease. Publications of the observations in Central America by Rodolfo Robles and mile Brumpt in 1917/1919 (Brumpt 1919, Robles 1919) prompted some specialists in tropical medicine to look for eye disease associated with African onchocerciasis. But nobody described any eye involvement leading to blindness.And then, in 1930, Hissette discovered thousands of people with river blindness along the Sankuru in Africa. He demonstrated the pathomechanism of the blindness during his first home leave in Belgium in 1932, when he found microfilariae in various tissues of an enucleated eye that he had brought home with him from the Sankuru: among other injurious effects, these microfilariae cause the severe eye inflammation. His special observational skill and his intuitive grasp of causalities meant that his descriptions were very precise. He described the chorioretinitical scarring of the fundus in onchocerciasis (Hissette 1932).Despite the fact that Ridleys description followed only thirteen years later in 1945 (Ridley 1945), the atrophic flecked retina was referred to simply as Ridley fundus. Now it is more appropriated called Hissette-Ridley fundus. And he found that living microfilariae elicited no or only a very slight reaction in the anterior chamber of the eye, whereas dead ones provoked a strong inflammation. According to the Zeitgeist (spirit of the age) Hissette thought that the latter reaction was probably due to the brisk release of the toxins of the disintegrated parasites. This is not the fact, but research has identified the cause. The very strong inducers of the immune responses are endosymbionts (bacteria called Wolbachia). It has now become increasingly clear that Wolbachia play the major role in the pathogenesis of ocular onchocerciasis (river blindness) in the human host (Saint Andr et al. 2002). The Harvard African Expedition The Harvard African Expedition of 1934 had been arranged and paid for by the Belgian colonial administration. This proves that the expedition indeed had been a control commission assigned to check Hissettes findings on the blind people because they were doubted. Hissette had never mentioned that he was checked. Strong had been urged by the colonial administration to keep silent about the assignment and in 1938 he had hoped to distract from this by writing that the expedition had been entirely his idea. It was feared that the public would have seen the considerable costs of the expedition as a waste since upon their return the Americans confirmed all of Hissettes published findings about ocular affection through onchocerciasis. By no means had Hissette been displeased with the commission, instead he had felt honoured that such renowned tropical scientists showed an interest in his work. If the colonial administration had trusted Hissette, the commission and the Harvard African Expedition would have been dispensable.Confronted in 1934 by a commission in the form of the Harvard African Expedition, Hissette traveled once more to the Sankuru with the Americans as the seventh member of the expedition and showed them his river blindness patients. Richard Pearson Strong was Professor of Tropical Medicine of Harvard University Medical School. His opinion was greatly respected in Tropical Medicine circles. The Americans sailed from Antwerp and disembarked, after a voyage of sixteen days, on the west coast of Africa at Lobito Bay (Angola). The expedition proceeded eastward from Lobito by rail for four days to the city of Elisabethville, now known as Lubumbashi. The train journey was continued, now accompanied by Dr. Jean Hissette. They travelled in a north-westerly direction for nearly three days to the village of Luputa, then by car and truck to the village of Kabinda, then further northward to the village of Pania Mutombo on the Sankuru-Lubilash River. This was exactly the same way Hissette had taken in 1930. Members of the expedition were Sandground, helminthologist, Bequaert, entomologist, and Henry Mallinckrodt, photographer. The first headquarters was established in the village of Kassende, Lusambo. Hissette arranged for the blind people to be brought from the surrounding villages to the expeditions headquarters after an arrangement between the chiefs of the villages there and himself. The great prevalence of disturbances of vision in association with onchocercal infection was by far the most striking clinical phenomena observed in this region. In Kassende multiple tumours, small sized nodules, were present; cases from 25 to 100 or more nodules were not uncommon. The Harvard African expedition of 1934 finally confirmed all the observations on river blindness caused by onchocerciasis (Strong 1938) that had already been communicated by Hissette (Hissette 1932). Hissettes findings prompted renewed efforts to find ocular complications of onchocerciasis in other parts of Africa. Hissette was really able to help only a few of these blind people in 1934. In some cases, he succeeded in attaining a certain restoration of vision by means of cataract extraction or optic iridectomy (Hissette 1932/33).Dr Hissette died in Forest/Brssel. References * Brumpt E (1919) Une nouvelle filaire pathogne parasite de lhomme (Onchocerca caecutiens, n.sp.). Bull Soc Path Exot 12: 464-473* Grove DJ (1990) A history of human Helminthology. CAB International, Wallingford* Hissette J (1932) Mmoire sur lOnchocerca volvulus Leuckart et ses manifestations oculaires au Congo belge. Ann Soc Belge Md Trop 12: 433-529* Hissette J (1932/1933) Lonchocercose oculaire au Congo Belge. Voyage de prospection chez les Babindi, septembre 1930 ( suivre). Bulletin de lAide Mdicale aux Missions 4 (1932) 72-75 ; 5 (1933) 14-17, 42-45* Hissette J (1937) Onchocercose oculaire. Mm Inst Roy Colon Belge, Sect Sci Nat Md  Suppl 5: 1-120* Hissette J (1938 ) Ocular onchocerciasis. (Part II Suppl) Am J Trop Med Suppl 18: 58-90* Kluxen G (2011) Dr. Jean Hissettes research expeditions to elucidate river blindness. Kaden, Heidelberg* Kluxen G, Hoerauf A (2008) The significance of some observations on African ocular onchocerciasis described by Jean Hissette (18881965). Bull Soc belge Ophtalmol 307: 53-58* Pacheco Luna R (1918) Disturbances of vision in patients harbouring certain filarial tumors. Am J Ophthalmol 1: 122-125* Ridley NHL (1945) Ocular Onchocerciasis, including an investigation in the Gold Coast. Br J Ophthalmol 29 (Suppl 10): 1-58* Robles R (1919) Onchocercose humaine au Guatmala produisant la ccit et lrysiple du littoral (Erisipela de la costa). Bull Soc Path Exot 12: 442-463* Saint Andr Av, Blackwell NM, Hall LR, Hoerauf A, Brattig NW, Volkmann L, Taylor MJ, Ford L, Hise AG, Lass JH, Diaconu E, Pearlman E (2002) The role of endosymbiotic Wolbachia bacteria in the pathogenesis of river blindness. Science 295: 1892-1895* Strong RP (1938) Onchocerciasis in Africa and Central America. (Part I Suppl) Am J Trop Med Suppl 18: 1-57 External links * http://www.jean-hissette.de/Hissette
31396580
Gala_Inc.
homepage        http://www.gala.jp/ is a company based in Japan, that administers GALA Group, which is made up of subsidiary companies of Gala Inc.  The group of companies embraces three types of business: MMORPG games, web design and mining.  Within the group companies, Gala Lab Corp., established after the merger of Aeonsoft and nFlavor,() located in South Korea, develops games for the groups online gaming portal gPotato. GALA Group focuses on developing massively multiplayer online role-playing games and licensing games from primarily Asian developers for a North American, European, Asian and South American audience. To cover local areas, there are Group companies located in the EU, the USA, Brazil, Japan and South Korea.  GALA Groups games are free-to-play so no annual/monthly payment is required; revenue is generated from a micropayment system.  Games and their premium item shops can be accessed by the Groups regional gPotato portal sites.   While the majority of GALA Groups business revolves around MMORPG games, not all Group companies are involved in online gaming.  Within GALA Group, Gala Web Inc.s main business is in web design and Gala Buzz Inc. offers data mining and risk-monitoring services. History  Early Years Gala Inc. was originally founded in September 1993 by Kikugawa to create an IT company with the goal of bringing people together from around the world.  While at University, Kikugawa was an avid event planner where he would rent out clubs in Roppongi and students could gather.  He called these events Gala.  With the expansion of the internet in the early nineties, Kikugawa, inspired by his university events, founded Gala Inc. with the goal of bringing people together online.The early business model of Gala Inc. was in homepage creation.  One of Gala Inc.s first website creations was for the Japan Pro Wrestling site in 1996.  The initial business approach was to create home pages free of charge and then share the advertising revenue.   Gala Inc. also set up bulletin boards on sites for visitors to share their thoughts.  In February of 2000, Gala Inc. acquired the company RIS Inc., which was then renamed to Gala Web Inc.  While Gala Inc. acts as the headquarters for GALA Group, Gala Web continues to develop websites and systems for clients in Japan.  Gala Inc.s early business model eventually led to Galas gaming business model, where its games are free and sales are generated from micropayments. Globalization In November 2005, Gala-Net Inc. opened as the North American subsidiary and online games publisher with its office in California.  In October of 2006, Gala-Net established a wholly owned subsidiary, Gala Networks Europe based out of Dublin, Ireland.Also in 2006, South Korean game developers Aeonsoft Inc. and nFlavor Corp. joined GALA Group.  Aeonsofts flagship game was Flyff, while nFlavor brought the Rappelz MMO into the Group. The two game developing companies would later merge to become Gala Lab Corp. in July 2010.() In December of 2007, another subsidiary was created after Gala Inc. split off its buzz research section to create a new Group company named Gala Buzz Inc.  The companys role is to offer data mining and information analysis services for corporate clients through its e-mining and buzz reports.In May 2011, Gala Inc. announced it will enter the smartphone market.  The company will launch a smartphone social game platform and the development of games for said platform.  A new company will be established to operate the platform and Gala Inc.s Seoul-based subsidiary Gala Lab Corp. will develop the games.()Subsidiaries Game Publishing The companies publish games by the Gala Lab development teams in Seoul and other third party developers.  The publishing companies in GALA Group are:* Gala-Net Inc. (Sunnyvale, U.S.A.) - In August of 2005, Gala-Net Inc. opened as a North American subsidiary and online games publisher. The company services the English and Spanish language markets.  Gala-Nets CEO, Jikhan Jung, was an early employee of Gala Inc. in Japan.  According to the Business Bureau, in the 36 months leading up to June 8th, 2011, 20 complaints have been filed against Gala-Net Inc. Gala-Net currently has a BBB rating of A+.()  Games are offered in English and Spanish through their gPotato.com portal site:  Iris Online, Online, Online, Online, TalesRunner, Rappelz and Online, Flyff in English and Flyff in Spanish.  * Gala Networks Europe Ltd. (Dublin, Ireland) - Gala Networks Europe was founded by Gala-Net as a wholly owned subsidiary.  It operates the gPotato brand in Europe by hosting, publishing and distributing free online games through the gPotato.eu portal. Established in Dublin, Ireland, in October 2006, it operates a portfolio of MMORPGs including Flyff, Rappelz, Street Gears, Dragonica, Online, of Heroes, Militaris, Age of Wulin and Online.  The languages serviced by GNE services are French, German, English, Italian, Polish and Turkish.  * Gala-Net Brazil Ltd. (So Paulo, Brazil) - Gala-Net Brazil was founded by Gala-Net in April 2010 as a wholly owned subsidiary that publishes games for the Portuguese market.  Games offered through their gPotato.com.br portal site include Flyff, Rappelz and Iris Online.* Gala Japan Inc.  (Tokyo, Japan) - Gala Japan is the publisher for games in the Japanese market and was established in April 2007.  Games localized into Japanese offered through their gPotato.jp portal site include Iris Online, Flyff, Rappelz, of Heroes and IL: Soulbringer.* Gala Lab Corp. (Seoul, South Korea) - Gala Lab was created by the 2010 merger of former GALA Group companies Aeonsoft Inc. and nFlavor Corp.()  The merged company now publishes games for the Korean market through their gPotato.kr portal site and also develops games for GALA Group as well as third party publishers. Game Development * Gala Lab Corp. (Seoul, South Korea) - Gala Lab Corp. was created by the 2010 merger of former GALA Group companies Aeonsoft Inc. and nFlavor Corp.  Aeonsoft Inc., founded in 2002 in Seoul, developed the game Flyff, meaning Fly for Fun.  nFlavor Corp., founded in 2003 in Seoul, developed the games Rappelz, Street Gears and IL: Soulbringer.# Flyff, or Fly for Fun, is the first MMORPGs to introduce free roaming flight.()  Flyff is a party-oriented MMO game where no character can do everything and efficient play requires working together in groups to level up by defeating monsters. One distinctive feature is its flying system; flying is the normal method of transportation for characters above level 20.  The game offers a vast amount of content that is constantly being updated, and it caters to audiences both young and old.  In June of 2004, the game was awarded the Best Game of the Year from South Koreas Ministry of Culture.()()# Rappelz  is set in a medieval fantasy world, dominated by three races: the Deva, who represent light, the Asura, who represent darkness, and the Gaia, humans that possess an affinity with nature. Each major installment of the game is referred to as an Epic. The current installment, which is the second part of Epic VII, is called Epic VII: Dimensions. The game was also published in Arabic for MENA gamers by the Emirati company Game Power 7. The game was released under a different title known as Hope of Nations (), and was launched on March 16, 2009.() # Street Gears is based on a persistent manga-style universe.  It is a massively multiplayer roller game where players can challenge each others in races or trick contests. As for how to use the tricks, its related to the context and environment of the game. This means that some tricks can only be used while skating on the ground and/or during a jump, while others can be used while in the air, on walls or when theres a barrier that requires bypassing.# IL: Soulbringer is a fantasy/anime MMORPG with a new concept of Postmodern RPG and Pioh System where Piohs (pet-type creatures) evolve at three stages that aid the player during the course of the game.  The game also has a randomized map system to add to gameplay variety. Website Design * Gala Web Inc. (Tokyo, Japan) - Gala Web Inc. was previously a systems development company called RIS Inc. when it was acquired by Gala Inc. in February of 2000.  Gala Web became the website and community systems provider for GALA Group, which was previously handled by Gala Inc.  The company offers a wide range of website and community services, such as:# Cyber Cops - Cyber Cops is an automatic moderation service that filters out objectionable content.  Clients work with Gala Web to create a list of objectionable or negative words for the Cyber Cops program to search for on various websites, forums and blogs.  When selected words are found, the client is alerted to where and when the content was posted about their company.# W-Cops - W-Cops adds to the Cyber Cops automatic search and filtration system looking for objectionable content by adding Gala Web employees to manually search websites and forums.  This adds an additional layer of quality and offers a better understanding of content being written about their clients. Data Mining * Gala Buzz Inc. (Tokyo, Japan) - Gala Buzz Inc. offers data mining and information analysis services for corporate clients through its e-mining and buzz reports.  The company was founded in December of 2007 after Gala Inc.s buzz research section split off from Gala Inc. to become a separate company. The company offers several data analysis services, such as:# E-mining - E-mining is a risk monitoring service that checks blobs and forums for libel or slanderous posts for companies.  Daily reports to public and investor relations representatives regarding any leaked information or rumors on the internet help companies work to improve their public image.# Buzz reports - Buzz reports give give additional analysis to the e-mining.  These reports help clients understand the effectiveness of their marketing campaigns.  The reports also include reasons and examples of why a campaigns effectiveness is successful or not.  This also allows clients to study product and service concepts to see whether there is a market for their ideas or not.# Net Risk Hotline - Net Risk Hotline is a consulting service that searches for illegal information posted on bulletin boards and blogs.  Illegal information could include inside information leaked by former employees.  This service also helps clients gain information regarding potential lawsuits through cooperation with clients lawyers. Game Portal To promote and publish games, GALA Group uses its gPotato portal. People can play or download games from the gPotato portal for free. gPotato services a large variety of games from the casual games/browser-based games to downloadable client-based games. The gPotato portal first launched in November of 2005 in the USA. The gPotato portal and brand is one of the main assets of GALA Group. Currently, gPotato portals are serviced by five subsidiary companies of Gala Inc.   Community As of September 2011, the global gPotato community has over 20 million registered members()() playing on 18 games globally.As with all free-to-play games or gaming communities, the number of registered users has to be differentiated from:* Unique users; i.e. the number of persons actually registered as differentiated from the number of accounts (a same user can make several accounts, all counted as a registered user).* Active users (users returning regularly).* Paying users (since all of gPotatos games are F2P, its possible to play without paying anything).There are no public numbers for unique, active, or paying users. Portal Features gPotato portals have a variety of features.  Each gPotato portal is designed and maintained based on the cultural trends where that gPotato portal is serviced so the features vary on each gPotato portal site.  In general, the portals offer:* Profile page* Achievements* gPotato balance and fill-up Currency The currency is called gPotatoes.  The gPotatoes can be used to obtain virtual game items via a premium item shop. Other users normally would not have access to these items or would have to spend more time in-game to obtain them. gPotatoes can be purchased using cards, PayPal, charging through the mobile phone, through gPotato pre-paid cards or through earning free gPotatoes by taking online surveys.  Payment methods differ from each gPotato portal based on the regional payment options available. Games  Games Developed  Games Licensed  Awards *In 2008, Gala Inc. placed 12th on the Deloitte Technology Fast 50 list for Japan.()*In 2008, Gala Inc. placed 135th on the Fast 500 list for the Asia Pacific region.()*In 2009, Gala Inc. placed 24th on the Deloitte Technology Fast 50 list for Japan.()*In 2010, Gala Inc. placed 41st on the Deloitte Technology Fast 50 list for Japan.()*In 2010, GALA Group CEO and Gala Inc. CEO Mr. Satoru Kikugawa was a finalist for the & Young Entrepreneur of the Year award for the Japan region.()Insider Trading IncidentIn 2006, three Gala Inc. employees were directed to pay fines for insider trading when they purchased stock with insider knowledge that Gala had secured a deal with Dentsu.()  On January 13th, 2006, it was announced that the three were the first employees in Japan ordered to pay fines under a new law created by the Services Agency of Japan.()  Group CEO Mr. Kikugawa gave a public apology regarding the insider trading.  Gala also released a statement outlining the changes to their compliance management system and procedures put in place to prevent insider trading from happening again.() References  Inc.Inc.Inc.Inc.ja:Inc.Inc.Inc.
31430702
Steamboat,_Douglas_County,_Oregon
Steamboat is an unincorporated community in Douglas County, Oregon, United States.() It is located about 39 miles east of Roseburg on Route 138, near the confluence of the Umpqua River with Steamboat Creek within the National Forest.()The name Steamboat was probably first applied to the creek sometime before the 1890s by area gold miners, after a term referring to disappointing mining claims.() There is no evidience any actual steamboats navigated the river at this locale.(References
